 How come those ants keep smiling and shaking hand with those willing to smile and shake hands with them.
(Indonesian: Sempat-sempatnya semut-semut itu saling senyum-senyum dan salam-salaman  sama semut-semut yang mau senyum-senyum dan salam-salaman sama semut-semut itu.)

 Kalim drowned, gasped, and waved his hand because his shirt drifted by the river flow.
(Javanese: Kalim klelep klagep klagep, klawe klawe merga klambine keli)

 Grey sparrow, why do you chatter away? Because I'm the king's grey sparrow chatterer.
(Portuguese: Pardal Pardo porque palras? 
Palro e palrarei, porque sou o pardal pardo, palrador d'el Rei!)

 Dogs make a noise. Why do they howl? Seldom do they make noise disturbing the gulls.
(Panjabi or Punjabi: Kutio kutio kutay karday. Kaoon kaon kay kion. Kadee kadee kaon kaon karkay kurian kolon khay kahy langday.)

 When a stringing stringer (someone who makes strings) must tune a string, He tunes six cordons (little strings) to tune the string, But if one of the cordons of the string come unstrung, The unstrung cordon make the string unstrung, The string that the stringing stringer had bad tuned.
(French: Quand un cordier cordant doit accorder sa corde, Pour sa corde accorder six cordons il accorde, Mais si l'un des cordons de la corde décorde, Le cordon décordé fait décorder la corde, Que le cordier cordant avait mal accordée.)

 Six waxed salmons in a waxed salmon box
(Swedish: Sex vaxade laxar i en vaxad laxask)

Sixty six bottles are standing on the street.
(Bulgarian: Шейсет и шест шишета стоят на шосето.)

Sixty-six bottles are drying on sixty-six streets.
(Bulgarian: Шесдесет и шест шишета се сушат на шестдесет и шест шосета.)

 one striped tiger and ten plates of wheattwo striped tigers and nine plates of wheatthree striped tigers and eight plates of wheatfour striped tigers and seven plates of wheatfive striped tigers and six plates of wheatsix striped tigers and five plates of wheatseven striped tigers and four plates of wheateight striped tigers and three plates of wheat nine striped tigers and two plates of wheatten striped tigers and one plate of wheat
(Portuguese: um tigre tigrado e dez pratos de trigodois tigres tigrados e nove pratos de trigotres tigres tigrados e oito pratos de trigoquatro tigres tigrados e sete pratos de trigocinco tigres tigrados e seis pratos de trigoseis tigres tigrados e cinco pratos de trigosete tigres tigrados e quatro pratos de trigooito tigres tigrados e tres pratos de trigonove tigres tigrados e dois pratos de trigodez tigres tigres tigrados e um prato de trigo)

 Such six as we five are, can't be found among four, because we three are the two only ones. German: Solche sechs wie wir fünf gibt es keine vier weil wir drei die zwei einzigen sind. Bayrische logik :-)
(German: Soiche sechse wia mia fünfe gibt's koane viere weil mia drei die zwoa oanzigen san.)











 At the Rezaces you could hear chains while they were cutting grass.
(Czech: U Řezáčů řinčel řetěz při řezání řezanky.)

 I climbed upon the mitsiria, the tsitsiria, the tsitsihomitsiria, to cut mitsira, tsitsira, tsitsimitsihotsira, and there broke the tsitsiria, the mitsiria, the tsitsimitsihotsiria and there fell the tsitsira, the mitsira, the tsitsihomitsihotsira.
(Greek, Modern: Aνέβηκα στη μιτσιριά στη τσιτσιριά στη τσιτσιχομιτσιριά να κόψω μίτσιρα τσίτσιρα τσιτσιχομιτσιχότσιρα και έσπασε η μιτσιριά η τσιτσιριά η τσιτσιχομιτσιριά και μου έπεσαν τα τσίτσιρα τα μίτσιρα τα τσιτσιχομιτσιχότσιρα.)

 Parra had a dog and Guerra had a grapevine. The dog of Parra broke the grapevine of Guerra. Then Guerra took a club and killed the dog of Parra.
(Spanish: Parra tenía una perra y Guerra tenía una parra. La perra de Parra rompió la parra de Guerra. Entonces Guerra cogió una porra y mató a la perra de Parra.)

 There once were two nightwatchmen, a before-midnight-nightwatchman and an after-midnight-nightwatchman. The before-midnight-nightwtchman said to the after-midnight-nightwatchman: "If you take the before-midnight-nightwatch, I'll take the after-midnight-nighttwatch." "Okay" said the after-midnight-nightwatchman to the before-midnight-nightwatchman "I'll take the before-midnight-nightwatch en then you take the after-midnight-nightwatch." and so it happened that the before-midnight-nightwatchman took the after-midnight-nightwatch and the after-midnight-nightwatchman took the before-midnight-nightwatch.
(Dutch: Er waren eens twee nachtwachten, een voor-middernacht-nachtwacht en een na-middernacht-nachtwacht.  De voor-middernacht-nachtwacht zei tegen de na-middernacht-nachtwacht: "Als jij de voor-middernacht-nachtwacht waakt, waak ik de na-middernacht-nachtwacht." "oke" zei de na-middernacht-nachtwacht tegen de voor-middernacht-nachtwacht  "Ik waak de voor-middernacht-nachtwacht en dan waak jij de na-middernacht-nachtwacht."  Zo kwam het dat de voor-middernacht-nachtwacht de na-middernacht-nachtwacht waakte  en de na-middernacht-nachtwacht de voor-middernacht-nachtwacht waakte.)

 Two grey-brown beavers were fooling in a mudhole. "Isn't it good, my friend?" - "Very good, my brother!"
(Ukrainian: Бавились в брудній баюрі два бобри брунатно-бурі.
- "Правда добре, друже бобре?"
- "Дуже добре, брате бобре!")

 Piu (common name), who was mason, when making a well lost a foot. His friend Pau (Paul) said, "Pol (another form for Paul), Piu has one foot in the well.
(Catalan: En Piu que manobra fou,
fent un pou va perdre un peu,
el seu amic Pau digué,
Pol en Piu té un peu al pou.)

 You have an earing in one ear only.
(Frisian: Do hast mar yn ien ear in earbel.)

 If I only had a "apografifotografat" (nonsense variation of the word "photocamera", non-translatable) then I would take some damn photographs.
(Norwegian: Hadde jeg bare hatt et apografifotografat hadde jeg fotogra-faenmeg-fert.)





 If Proculus were far from the bell, Proculos would be far from Proculus. German: Wenn Prokulus weit von der Glocke wäre, wäre Prokulus auch weit von Prokulus.
(Latin: SI PROCUL A PROCULO PROCULI CAMPANA FUISSET, NUNC PROCUL A PROCULO PROCULUS IPSE FORET.)



 The young people are eating by the fire and Jimmy the chatterbox is talking about the calves of a funny young girl from Chaca who whistles the whistle when the cold wind blows. Spanish: Come la gente joven junto a la hoguera y habla el parlanchín de Jaimito de las pantorrillas de la graciosa chiquilla de Jaca que toca el silbato cuando sopla aire frío.
(Aragonese: Chenta la chen choben chunto á la chera y charra o charraire Chaimet d'os charretes d'a chocante chiqueta de Chaca que chifla lo chuflo cuan sofla xufrina.)

 Six young men perched on six chairs were whispering this: wise huntsman, bald-headed, hot-blooded, bleary-eyed, you must learn to hunt the bald cat which hides under the rare stump of dried sage.
(French: Six jeunes gens juchés sur six chaises chuchotaient ceci: sage chasseur au front chauve, au sang chaud, aux yeux chassieux, sachez chasser le chat chauve qui se cache sous la chiche souche de sauge séchée.)

 At six (o'clock) I'm thirsty, the jar is empty, it is new and is still owed. Wordplay with the numbers.
Spanish: Se juega con los números: seis (sis), siete(set), ocho (vuit), nueve (nou)y diez (deu). También con los dos significados y misma pronunciación de: set: siete/sed, vuit/buit: ocho/vacío, nou: nueve/nuevo, deu: diez/debe (del verbo:deber). Tradución: A las seis tengo sed, el cántaro está vacío, es nuevo y todavía se debe.
(Catalan: A les sis tinc set el càntir és buit és nou i encara es deu.)

 It's unthinkable that God owes ten (10).
(Catalan: En cap cap hi cap que Déu en deu deu.)

 One rooster, two chicken, three ducks, four geese, five pigs, six cows, seven oxen, eight nuns, nine knobby, hunchbacked beggar women are spending the night with ten Costantinoplean bagpipe-maker assistants.
(German: Ein Hahn, zwei Hühner, drei Enten, vier Gänse, fünf Schweine, sechs Kühe, sieben Ochsen, acht Nonnen, neun huckelicke, buckelige Bettelmannsweiber übernachten bei zehn konstantinopolitanischen Dudelsackpfeifenmachergesellen.)

 A black claret-speckled cow was chewing grass, turning its muzzle.
(Polish: Czarna krowa w kropki bordo gryzie trawę kręcąc mordą.)

 cow's udder
(Dutch: koeienuier)

 We killed our spotted cow, Al-Borga family also killed their spotted cow. The soup made from the meat of the neck of our spotted cow came much tastier than the soup made from the meat of the neck of Dar Al-Borga's spotted cow !
(Arabic: Ihna Dabahna Bagretna elbarga, Dar el-borga dabaho bagrethom elbarga, telaat maraget lahmet ragbet bagretna elbarga atyab men maraget lahmet ragbet bagrethom elbarga)

 Who knows if Sasà got up.
(Sicilian: Sa si si susì Sasà.)

 To be able to talk,
You have to know,
Knowledge
gives you power
To be able to talk
Talking just to talk,
Without knowing
Takes away the power
To be able to talk
(Spanish: Para poder hablar,
Tienes que saber,
El saber te da poder,
Para poder hablar,
Hablar por hablar, sin saber
Te quita el poder
Para poder hablar.)

 The child saw a frog and ran, told the sibling to run away, the sibling refused to run away, took a stick to hit the frog, the frog ran away and hid under a stone.
(Kikuyu: Kana koona kora koora kera kana kao koore, kana kao karega kuura kooya kamuti karige kora, kora koora keehitha kahigaini.)

 They told me that you have said a saying, that they said I said. Who said that has lied, and if I would have said that saying that they said that I said, said and re-said is remains, and it would be well said that saying that they said I said.
(Spanish: Me han dicho que has dicho un dicho, que han dicho que he dicho yo. El que lo ha dicho mintió, y en caso que hubiese dicho ese dicho que han dicho que he dicho yo, dicho y redicho quedó, y estará bien dicho ese dicho que han dicho que he dicho yo.)

 If the archbishop of Costantinople would like to un-archbishop-of-constantinopolize himself, would you un-archbishop-of-constantinopolize yourself, to un-archbishop-of-constantinopolize him?
(Italian: Se l'arcivescovo di Costantinopoli, si volesse disarcivescoviscostantipolizzare, vi arcivescoviscostantinopolizzereste voi, per disarcivescoviscostantinopolizzare lui?)

 - When you Catalans speak, it seems like you break nuts. - Do you think I believe you?
(Catalan: - Els catalans parlant sembla que trenqueu nous. - Que te creus que te crec?)

 If the archbishop of Costantinople would like to un-archbishop-of-constantinopolize himself, would you un-archbishop-of-constantinopolize yourself, to un-archbishop-of-constantinopolize him?
(Italian: Se l'arcivescovo di Costantinopoli, si volesse disarcivescoviscostantipolizzare, vi arcivescoviscostantinopolizzereste voi, per disarcivescoviscostantinopolizzare lui?)

 That saying, that they said that you said that I said, that saying I didn't say, because if I would have said it would have been well said for having been said by me.
(Spanish: Ese dicho, que me han dicho, que tu has dicho, que yo he dicho, ese dicho no lo he dicho porque si lo hubiera dicho, ese dicho estaria bien dicho por haberlo dicho yo.)

 How much spawn would such an amphibian easily spawn, if an amphibian would spawn spawn.
(German: Sag wieviel Laich so ein Lurch leicht laicht,
wenn ein Lurch leicht Lurchlaich laicht.)

 If saws were seeing saws sawing, then saws would see saws sawing
(Dutch: Als zagen zagen zagen zagen zagen zagen zagen zagen.)

 If Proculus were far from the bell, Proculos would be far from Proculus. German: Wenn Prokulus weit von der Glocke wäre, wäre Prokulus auch weit von Prokulus.
(Latin: SI PROCUL A PROCULO PROCULI CAMPANA FUISSET, NUNC PROCUL A PROCULO PROCULUS IPSE FORET.)

 How much wood would a rodent gnaw, if rodents would gnaw wood?
(Spanish: ¿Cuánta madera roería un roedor si los roedores royeran madera?)

 Henry from the Hengen-House is chopping wood behind this high (big) house. He hears a hundred hungry rabbits from Holzem (village near-by) coughing.German: Henri Hengen hackt Holz hinter seinem hohen Haus. Er hört hundert hungrige Hasen aus Holzem husten.


(Letzeburgesch or Luxembourgish: Hengen hiren Haari heet Houltz
hannert hierem hei'gen Haus.
Hien hei'ert honnert hongrech
Holzemer Houe'sen houschten.)

 I saw six silly people sucking six hundred six sausages, six in sauce and six hundred without sauce.
(French: J'ai vu six sots suçant six cent six saucisses, six en sauce et six cents sans sauce.)

 Rat saw rice, Rat put paw on the brim, rat put paw on the rice, rice burnt paw of rat.
(French: Rat vit riz, Rat mit patte à ras, Rat mit patte à riz, Riz cuit patte à rat.)

 I saw six silly people sucking six hundred six sausages, six in sauce and six hundred without sauce.
(French: J'ai vu six sots suçant six cent six saucisses, six en sauce et six cents sans sauce.)

 On the butcher's shop sign the space between "Cheese" and "and" and "and" and "Sausage" was to small.
(German: Auf des Fleischhauers Schild war der Abstand zwischen "Käse" und "und" und "und" und "Wurst" zu klein geraten.)

 Between "or" and "and" and "and" and "and" and "and" and "or" there is always a space.
(German: Zwischen "oder" und "und" und "und" und "und" und "und" und "oder" ist immer ein Leerzeichen.)

 Gruel is always gruel, war-hatchet is always war-hatchet.
(German: Griesbrei bleibt Griesbrei, und Kriegsbeil bleibt Kriegsbeil)

 Twelve muttering speakers say "you" to twelve muttering speakers, which always say "you".
(German: Ein Dutzend nuschelnde Dutzer dutzen nuschelnd dutzende dutzender Nuschler nuschelnd.)

 Between "or" and "and" and "and" and "and" and "and" and "or" there is always a space.
(German: Zwischen "oder" und "und" und "und" und "und" und "und" und "oder" ist immer ein Leerzeichen.)

 I like your husband because your husband always smiles at me.
(Indonesian: Saya suka sama suami situ sebab suami situ suka senyum-senyum sama saya.)

 I like livers, you like livers.
(Czech: Já rád játra, ty rád játra.)

 In Rheinfelden under the right bridge over the river Rhein a rough liver of a roe deer is lying.
(German: Z' Rhyyfälde under der rächte Rhyybrugg liit e rauhi Rehläbere.)

 I crossed the bridge, took cordels (and) left cordels. Spanish: Pasé por el puente, cogí cordones (y) cordones dejé.
(Galician: Pola ponte pasín, collín cordóns cordóns deixín.)

 Mr and Mrs Lücke were walking over a bridge. When a mosquito came and stung Mrs Lücke in the back of the neck. Then Mr Lücke took his crutch and hit Mrs Lücke in the back of the neck. And therefor Mrs Lücke, with the mosquito and the crutch in the back of the neck, fell over dead.
(German: Herr und Frau Lücke gingen über eine Brücke. Da kam eine Mücke und stach Frau Lücke in's Genicke. Da nahm Herr Lücke seine Krücke und schlug Frau Lücke in's Genicke. Und deshalb fiel Frau Lücke mit der Mücke und der Krücke im Genicke tot um.)

 There is a boil of the back of the bishop's knee. But the bishop doesn't know there is a boil on the back of his knee.
(Irish: Tá neascóid ar ioscad an easpaig. Ach níl a fhios ag an easpaig go bhfuil neascóid ar a ioscaid.)

 Fighting-cows fight against cramps in their knees.
(German: Kampfkühe kämpfen gegen Kniekrämpfe.)

 On my knees collecting cotton being with you I collected cotton.
(Sicilian: A ginucchiuni cugghiannu cuttuni essennu cu ttia cuttuni cugghia.)

 On my knees quince I gathered; On my knees I gathered quince. Spanish: Arrodillado membrillos cogía, arrodillado cogía membrillos.
(Catalan: De genollons codonys collia, de genollons collia codonys.)

 On my knees knees, I gathered gathered, on my knees knees, I gathered quince; kneeled, quince jellies, and with fingers, gathered quinces.
(Catalan: De genollons genollons, collia collia, de genollons genollons, collia codonys; de genollades, codonyades, i amb els dits, codonys collits.)

 Two peppers in oil. Italian; Due peperoni all'olio.
(Italian: Dui purun bagnà nt'öli)

 If Julie won't oil it, then I will oil it.
(Czech: Nenaolejuje-li to Julie, naolejuju to já.)

 If Julie won't oil the rails, I'll oil them myself.
(Czech: Nenaolejuje-li koleje Julie, naolejuji je sám.)

 In the woods I tie the vines. On the cart I bring the vines. Goat, do not lick the vines. I'll punish you!
(Russian: Во лесу лозу вяжу.
На возу лозу везу.
Коза, лозу не лижи - Накажу!)

 Henry from the Hengen-House is chopping wood behind this high (big) house. He hears a hundred hungry rabbits from Holzem (village near-by) coughing.German: Henri Hengen hackt Holz hinter seinem hohen Haus. Er hört hundert hungrige Hasen aus Holzem husten.


(Letzeburgesch or Luxembourgish: Hengen hiren Haari heet Houltz
hannert hierem hei'gen Haus.
Hien hei'ert honnert hongrech
Holzemer Houe'sen houschten.)

 Hear the small wooden shoes click on the clinkers.
(Dutch: Hoor de kleine klompjes klepperen op de klinkers.)

 A dignified/noble woman, put on her shoe, locked the door in the face of her husband.
(Hebrew: ISHA NA'ALA, NA'ALA NA'ALA, NA'ALA ET HADELET BIFNEY BA'ALA.)

 Beloved Mita, half crazy, put half a pencil and a pencil in her pocket.
(Italian: L'amata Mita a metà ammattita mise metà matita e la matita in tasca.)

 I died because I needed some ointment for my wounds and I did not get it. I died because I yearned for my beloved and I could not get her.
(Hindi: mar ham bi gaye, marham ke liye, marham na mila.
ham dam se gaye, hamdam ke liye, hamdam na mila)

 If your kisser loves my kisserlike my kisser loves your kisser,let me have the biggest kissof the Province of Quebec!
(French: Si ton bec aime mon beccomme mon bec aime ton bec,donne-moi le plus gros becde la Province de Québec!)

 Our sugar canes broke our sugar canes' basket. Could your sugar canes brake your sugar canes' basket like our sugar canes did?
(Arabic: kasab afasna kasar afas asabna ye2dar asab afaskom yeksar afas asabkom zay ma asab afasna kasar afas asabna?)

 How do I eat? I eat like I eat!
(Portuguese: Como como? Como como como!)


 Max if you like wax masks then make wax masks!
(German: Max wenn du Wachsmasken magst dann mach Wachsmasken!)

 The wax mask maker makes wax masks out of wax mask wax.
(German: Der Wachsmaskenmacher macht Wachsmasken aus Wachsmaskenwachs.)

 Some spun thread to make twine.
(Jersey: Du fi filé pouor faithe du filin.)

 When flies fly and bees make love, the flies fly very quickly by the bees who are making love.
(Dutch: Als vliegen vliegen en bijen vrijen, vliegen de vliegen de vrijende bijen vliegensvlug voorbij.)

 Piu (common name), who was mason, when making a well lost a foot. His friend Pau (Paul) said, "Pol (another form for Paul), Piu has one foot in the well.
(Catalan: En Piu que manobra fou,
fent un pou va perdre un peu,
el seu amic Pau digué,
Pol en Piu té un peu al pou.)

 The mouse said to the walnut: give me time and i will perforate you.
(Sicilian: Ci rissi u succi a nuci rammi u tiampu ca ti spirtusu.)

 In Schwyz you presently have sunshine, and shoudn’t it shine in Schwyz for now, it will shine for some time at Brunnen. Schwyz is the capital of the Canton Schwyz. Brunnen is another Swiss town opposite to Schwyz,  separated by the Rigi.
(German: Z Schwyz am Zit schint d Sunne,
Und wänn si z Schwyz am Zit nüd schint,
So schint si e Zitlang z Brunne.)

 Did you have a good time?
(Croatian, Serbian and Bosnian: Razrahatleisasteli se?)

 Such six as we five are, can't be found among four, because we three are the two only ones. German: Solche sechs wie wir fünf gibt es keine vier weil wir drei die zwei einzigen sind. Bayrische logik :-)
(German: Soiche sechse wia mia fünfe gibt's koane viere weil mia drei die zwoa oanzigen san.)

 Between Illmitz and Apetlon (2 places in the Burgenland) hang two double-pointed plums. Wo can name the two duoble-pointed plums is a good man. German: Zwischen Illmitz und Apetlon (2 Ortschaften im Burgenland) hängen zwei zweigespitzte Pflaumen. Wer die zwei zweigespitzten Pflaumen nennen kann, der ist ein braver Mann.
(German: Zwisch'n Ümitz und Apetlo: hängen zwa zwidri'gspitzte Zwetschk'n dro:. Wer de zwa zwidri'gspitz'n Zwetschk'n nennen ko:, des is a braver Mo:.)

 Two mothers taking about a child: That it is allowed to do that! It is allowed to do that! German: Zwei Frauen reden über ein Kind: - "Das es (er/sie) dies darf!" - "Es (er/sie) darf das."
(German: Klein Erna fragt die eigene Mutter über ein im Matsch spielendes Kind:
- Daaf das das?
- Das darf das.)

 I gathered wood, kindling wood, I took and took and put it on my mother's roof.
(Turkish: Aldım odun kavlı odun aldım aldım anamın damına kodum.)

 When mother was doing the laundry, a bee joined (her), which (then) flew away, underneath the door, across the road.
(Dutch: Toen moeder aan de was was, kwam er een bij bij, die vloog onder de deur 'deur', over de weg weg.)

 The wheel rolls on the road; the road stays under the wheel.
(French: La roue sur la rue roule; la rue sous la roue reste.)

 "... you will be told what you are to do." This is what God said to Saul, later known as the Apostle Paul, on the road to Damascus.
(Greek, Ancient: ... λαληθησεται σοι τι σε δει ποιειν.)

 Two mothers taking about a child: Is she allowed to do that! She is allowed to do that! That she is allowed to do that ... German: Zwei Frauen reden über ein Kind: - "Darf sie das?" - "Sie darf das." - "Das sie dies darf!
(German: 1. Version)

 My mother has mamalyga (old name of thick corn porridge).
(Polish: Ma mama ma mamałygę.)

 You're not supposed to call Kalle for Kalle, even though Kalle's mother calls Kalle for Kalle, aren't you supposed to call Kalle for Kalle, because Kalle's real name is Karl
(Norwegian: Du ska ikkje kalle Kalle for Kalle, selv om moren til Kalle kallar Kalle for Kalle, ska'kje du kalle Kalle for Kalle, for Kalle hetar egentlig Karl.)

 cry because of fear
(Dutch: Angstschreeuw)

 Peter, don’t pepper the pork with pepper because you’ll over-pepper the pork with pepper.
(Polish: Nie pieprz Pietrze wieprza pieprzem, bo przepieprzysz wieprza pieprzem.)






 A cockroach went to shave a cochroach and found it had already been shaved by a shaved roach.
(Kikuyu: Nyenje yathire kwenja nyenje, igikora nyenje ni nyenje ni nyenje nyenje.)

 An inventor invented a cookie. After having invented the cookie, the inventor invented that the cookie was already invented as an invention.
(Finnish: Keksijä keksi keksin, keksin keksittyään keksijä keksi keksin keksityksi keksinnöksi.)

 Sister has picked vegetable to boil, younger sister has already picked boiled vegetable.
(Vietnamese: Chị nhặt rau rồi luộc em nhặt rau luộc rồi.)

 "I couldn't care less," my sister Sientje would say, "if I saw seven black swans swim on the Zuiderzee".
(Dutch: "'t zou me zo een zorg zijn"  zou m'n zuster Sientje zeggen, "als ik zeven zwarte zwanen in de Zuiderzee zag zwemmen.")

 That saying, that they said that you said that I said, that saying I didn't say, because if I would have said it would have been well said for having been said by me.
(Spanish: Ese dicho, que me han dicho, que tu has dicho, que yo he dicho, ese dicho no lo he dicho porque si lo hubiera dicho, ese dicho estaria bien dicho por haberlo dicho yo.)

 The morning clock wackes the baker because of the breads. He has to stretch, to move and to elongate because of the breads. Move, stretch, elongate yourself! bake, baker, breads for me!
(German: Wegen der Wecken weckt der Wecker den Bäcker. Er muss sich strecken, regen und recken wegen der Wecken. Rege, strecke, recke dich! Backe, Bäcker, Wecken für mich!)

 Paco Pino Ponte Pascual Perez paints precious paintings for wealthy people. For the poor he paints little because they pay low prices.
(Spanish: Paco Pino Ponte Pascual Pérez pinta pinturas preciosas para personas pudientes. Para pobres pinta poco porque pagan poco precio.)

 Because it wasn’t warm I used warm clothes.
(Japanese: 暖かくなったから、暖かい服を使った
(あたたかくなかったから、あたたかい　ふく　を　つかった))

 If the attendant doesn't serve as an attendant what use is that she serves as attendant that doesn't serve?
(Italian: Se la serva che ti serve non ti serve come serva a che serve che ti serva di una serva che non serve?)

 If the servant that serves you, doesn't serve as a servant, of what use is the service of a servant that doesn't serve.
(Spanish: Si la sierva que te sirve, no te sirve como sierva, de que sirve que te sirvas de una sierva que no sirve.)

 Knaap the handsome barber cuts well. But the servant of Knaap the handsome barber cuts and snips better than Knaap the handsome barber cuts and snips.
(Dutch: Knaap de knappe kapper kapt knap. Maar de knecht van Knaap de knappe kapper knipt en kapt knapper dan Knaap de knappe kapper knipt en kapt.)

 On a meadow, quietly and silently sat a cricket, quietly and silently - head cut off. German: Auf einer Wiese ganz ruhig und still eine Grille. Ganz still und ruhig - Kopf abgemäht.
(German: Auf ana Wiesn gaunz stad und stüll a grüll. Gaunz stüll und stad - Schedl o'gmaht.)

 My mother has put my hand in my sleeve.
(French: Même maman m'a mis ma main dans mon manchon.)

 Szczepan Szczygieł (Szczepan Goldfinch) from Grzmiące Bystrzyce (Roaring Streams) 
wanted to get a hair-cut before a baptism.
But since he wasn't used to trimming his hair by himself
he went to his brother-in-law: 'Dear brother-in-law!'
'Dear brother-in-law, would you please give me a quick hair-cut
because I have a baptism to attend in an hour'
'Piece of cake' - replied his brother-in-law.
'Wife, hand me a jagged razor!
Szczepan's hair will be trimmed into a stubble,
by this jagged razor.'
Having heard this terrible news,
Szczepan Szczygieł screamed 'Goodbye'.
And through flower beds beyond a highway
he fled away untrimmed.
(Polish: Szczepan Szczygieł z Grzmiących Bystrzyc
przed chrzcinami chciał się przystrzyc.)

 The smart mate of the smart hairdresser cuts and does hair in an even smarter way than the smart hairdresser cuts and does hair.
(Dutch: De knappe knecht van de knappe kapper knipt en kapt nog knapper dan de knappe kapper knipt en kapt.)

 A woodpecker cut the stump.
(Polish: Dzięcioł pień ciął.)

 The executor will despise cutting (off) your head using that sword.
(Czech: Kat se bude štítiti títi ti tím mečem hlavu.)

 What do they cut it when there is a party outside? The skin of pig.
(Italian: A fhanu fhelli fhelli quandu fhanu a fhera fhora, chi? A hrittula!)


 That sheep is hers, I take it.
(Romanian: Oaia aia e a ei, eu i-o iau.)

 Take two sets of three chicken cackles add them together and they make six chicken cackles.
(Japanese: Hyoko pyoko pyoko mi pyoko pyoko Awasete pyoko pyoko mu pyoko pyoko.)

 They met at the emergency room where six beds were.
(Czech: Sešli se na resuscitačním sále se šesti lůžky.)

 I saw six hundred Swiss, sucking six hundred sausages, six with sauce and six hundred without sauce
(French: J'ai vu six cent Suisses sucant six cent six saucisses dont six en sauce et six cent sans sauce)

 A lace of six broken teeth.
(Hebrew: SHARSHERET SHEL SHESH SHINAYIM SHVUROT.)

 If six hundred saws saw six hundred sausages, six hundred six saws will saw six hundred six [large] sausages
(French: Si six cent scies scient six cent saucisses, six cent six scies scieront six cent six saucissons)

 333 horsemen rode 333 times round the large round Rastenburger town hall.
(German: Dreihundertdreiunddreissig Reiter ritten dreihundertdreiunddreissig mal um das grosse runde Rastenburger Rathaus.)

 The Dung's in the east of the town has a gourd bigger than the
watermelon of the Si's in the west of the town. On the other hand, the
gourd of the Dung's is a little bit bigger than that of the Dung's [N.B.
another Dung] in the east of the town. 
Literally: someone (1-2) / say, rumour (3) / east of the town [the east gate]
(4-5) / Dung's [the family of Dung] (6-7) / [genitive word] (8) / gourd
['winter gourd'] (9-10) / bigger than (11-12) / west of the town [the west
gate] (13-14) / Si's [the family of Si] (15-16) / [genitive word] (17) /
water melon (18-19) / as well, also (20) / bigger than (21-22) / east of
the town [the east gate] (23-24) / Dung's [the family of Dung, N.B.
another Dung] (25-26) / [genitive word] (27) / gourd ['winter gourd']
(28-29) / [interjection, meaning scantily, a little bit]
(Chinese, Yue or Cantonese: 人地話︰東門董家個冬瓜大過西門施家個西瓜又大過東門東家個冬瓜0的。)

 Because I eat little coconut, I buy little coconut.
(Spanish: Como poco coco como, poco coco compro.)

 Children's rhyme with some nonsense adjectives about a goat and her little goats.
(Spanish: Tengo una chiva etica peletica pelin pin petica pelada, peluda pelin pin puda que tiene tres chivitos eticos peleticos pelin pin peticos pelados peludos pelin pin pudos. Si la chiva no fuese etica peletica pelin pin petica los chivitos no fueran eticos peleticos pelin pin peticos pelados peludos pelin pin pudos.)

 The goat jumps on the stone. The stone splits in four. May the goat's head split as the stone splits in four.
(Romanian: Capra neagră-n piatră sare. Piatra crapă-n patru. Crapă capul caprei negre precum piatra crapă-n patru.)

 Seven cats' heads in each sack.
(French Creole: Sèt tèt chat nan chak sak.)

 Four warm cats, five frozen dogs.
(Jersey: Quat' caûds cats, chînq tchians g'lés.)

 There once was a hunter on a tree stump that had shot five chamois. German: Es war einmal ein Jäger auf einem Baumstumpf, der fünf Gemse erlegt hatte.
(Rhaeto-Romance or Romansh: I d'eira ün chatschader sün üna tschücha chi vaiva tschüf tschinch chamuotschs.)

 Five heaps of hemp before the brook, five heaps of hemp across the brook.
(Czech: Před potokem pět kop konopí, za potokem pět kop konopí.)

 Four warm cats, five frozen dogs.
(Jersey: Quat' caûds cats, chînq tchians g'lés.)

 In wall decayed, a hole was made. A rat inside a cat espied. The rat then fled, the cat then sped, the rat was caught.
(French: Mur pourrit, trou s'y fit, rat s'y mit; chat l'y vit, rat s'enfuit; chat suivit, rat fut pris.)

 A rat has a tail like a cat has.
(Jersey: Rat' a coue, aînchîn' a cat.)

 Five dogs chase six cats.
(French: Cinq chiens chassent six chats.)

 Good day ms Sans-Soucis! How much are these saussages? These saussages are six hundred and six sous (old French monetary unit). If these saussages are six hundred and six sous, these saussages are six hundred and six sous too expensive!
(French: Bonjour madam Sans-Soucis! Combien sont ces saucissons-ci? Ces saucissons ci sont six cent six sous. Si ces saucissons ci sont six cent six sous, ces sausissons ci sont six cent six sous trop cher!)

 Six Saxonian drinkers pay ten Czech bar bills.
(German: Sechs sächsische Säufer zahlen zehn tschechische Zechen.)

 Six virgins on six stallions bear six bags of oats. German: Sechs Jungfrauen auf sechs Hengsten tragen sechs Säcke mit Hafer. French: Six vierges à six étalons portent six sacs d’avoine. Dutch: Zes maagden op zes hengsten dragen zes zakken haver.

(Breton: C’hwec’h merc’h gwerc’h war c’hwec’h marc’h kalloc’h o tougen c’hwec’h sac’h kerc’h.)

 Six skewers of liver each for six Rials (Iranian unit of money).
(Persian or Farsi: Shish sikh jigar sikhi shi shezar)

 Take two sets of three frog croaks add them together and they make six frog croaks
(Japanese: Kaeru pyoko-pyoko mi pyoko-pyoko awasete pyoko-pyoko mu pyoko-pyoko.)

 Six Saxons (German Romanians) in six sacks.
(Romanian: Şase saşi în şase saci.)

 Take the sack of salt out into the sun so that it can dry.
(Spanish: Zaca er zaco de za ar zo pa que ze zeque.)

 Uncle asked auntie to take out raw mango from a glass cabinet and to make salad from it.
(Gujarati: Kaka ae kaki ne kaach na kabat mathi kachi keri katdhi ne kachumber karava kahnyu.)

 The uncle's red pumpkins
(Bulgarian: Чичковите червенотиквеничковчета.)

 My uncle (maternal), uncle mine.
(Gujarati: Mara Mama, Mama Mara, ...)

 If your uncle shaves/cuts the hair your uncle, your uncle will be shaved/cut by your uncle.
(French: Si ton tonton tond ton tonton, ton tonton sera tondu par ton tonton.)

 Uncle asked auntie to take out raw mango from a glass cabinet and to make salad from it.
(Gujarati: Kaka ae kaki ne kaach na kabat mathi kachi keri katdhi ne kachumber karava kahnyu.)

 Many a penny makes a pound.
(Scots or Scottisch: Mony a mickle maks a muckle.)

 Many holes that the mungos dug. The mungos died and the holes are still there.
(Wolof: I kan y well gas Well ya da kan ya dess)

 Pancha irons with four irons. With how many irons does Pancha iron?
(Spanish: Pancha plancha con cuatro planchas. 
¿Con cuántas planchas Pancha plancha?)

 Peter asks Paul, how much are a pair of ducks; a pair of ducks are five nickels (fivers), five ducks (are) many nickels. German: Peter fragt Paul, wieviel kosten zwei Enten; zwei Enten fünf Fünfer, fünf Enten viele Fünfer.
(Croatian, Serbian and Bosnian: Petar pita Pavla pošto Pavle par pataka; par pataka pet petaka, pet pataka puno petaka.)

 My grandma made my mom; my mom made me.
(Finnish: Mun mummuni muni mun mammani, mun mammani muni mun.)

 Beneath a red wine barrel there is a spotted hen; when the red wine barrel leaks, the spotted hen clucks.
Spanish: Debajo de una barrica de vino tinto hay una gallina moteada; cuando la barrica de vino tinto gotea, la gallina moteada cacarea.
(Galician: Debaixo dunha pipa tinta hai unha pita pinta; cando a pipa tinta pinga, a pita pinta pia.)

 Pinxo asked Panxo, "Do you want me to pierce you with a punch?" And Panxo answered Pinxo "Pierce me, but not in my belly!" Spanish: Pinxo preguntó a Panxo: - Quieres que te clave un alfiler? Y Pinxo dijo a Panxo: - Clavamelo, pero no en la barriga.
(Catalan: En Pinxo va dir a en Panxo:- Vols que et punxi amb un punxó?I en Panxo va dir a en Pinxo:- Punxa'm, però a la panxa no!)

 If I go to Bueu I will go in a fishing boat, if I don't go to Bueu I won't go in a fishing boat. Spanish: Si voy a Bueu (pueblo costero cercano a Vigo)
(Galician: Se vou a Bueu vou nun bou, sen non vou a Bueu non vou nun bou.)

 In the box of the ship on sea the sea fish are held. Spanish: En el cubo del barco que va por el mar, los peces del mar estan encerrados.
(Basque, Euskara or Euskera: Itsasoan dabiltzan itsasontziaren ontzian, itsasoko itsazkiak, itxita daude.)

 Our Tony gave me a round fig because I gave him a good berry. You should see our Tony going up the Tintillu hill. 'Hey Ton, give me three tuna fish. Don't give me smelly tuna, give me good tuna, please Ton.'
(Maltese: Toni tagħna tani tina,
Talli tajtu tuta tajba.
Trid tarah lil Toni tagħna
tiela’ it-tela tat-Tintillu.
'Ta’ Toni, tin tlieta tonn.
Tatinix tonn tinten, tin tonn tajjeb,
ta’ Ton.')

 Between Illmitz and Apetlon (2 places in the Burgenland) hang two double-pointed plums. Wo can name the two duoble-pointed plums is a good man. German: Zwischen Illmitz und Apetlon (2 Ortschaften im Burgenland) hängen zwei zweigespitzte Pflaumen. Wer die zwei zweigespitzten Pflaumen nennen kann, der ist ein braver Mann.
(German: Zwisch'n Ümitz und Apetlo: hängen zwa zwidri'gspitzte Zwetschk'n dro:. Wer de zwa zwidri'gspitz'n Zwetschk'n nennen ko:, des is a braver Mo:.)

 Two mothers taking about a child: That it is allowed to do that! It is allowed to do that! German: Zwei Frauen reden über ein Kind: - "Das es (er/sie) dies darf!" - "Es (er/sie) darf das."
(German: Klein Erna fragt die eigene Mutter über ein im Matsch spielendes Kind:
- Daaf das das?
- Das darf das.)

 My mother has mamalyga (old name of thick corn porridge).
(Polish: Ma mama ma mamałygę.)

 Chandu's wise uncle fed a tasty pickle of tamarind to chandu's wicked aunt four times by polished silver spoon in the Chandni-chowk of Chalisgaon town.
(Marathi: )

 Such six as we five are, can't be found among four, because we three are the two only ones. German: Solche sechs wie wir fünf gibt es keine vier weil wir drei die zwei einzigen sind. Bayrische logik :-)
(German: Soiche sechse wia mia fünfe gibt's koane viere weil mia drei die zwoa oanzigen san.)

 Between two sharp rocks two hissing hiss-snakes where sitting and hissing.
(German: Zwischen zwei spitzen Steinen saßen zwei zischelnde Zischelschlangen und zischten.)

 Two astronauts chewed and chwed while the gathered blue-green moonstones.
(German: Zwei Astronauten kauten und kauten während sie blaugrüne Mondsteine klaubten.)

 About two Strings of a Guitar: The A-string is already (torn) off, The E-string is also (torn) off. German: Das A ist ohnehin ab, das E ist auch ab.
(German: 's A is eh o, 's E is a o.)

 Two mothers taking about a child: That it is allowed to do that! It is allowed to do that! German: Zwei Frauen reden über ein Kind: - "Das es (er/sie) dies darf!" - "Es (er/sie) darf das."
(German: Klein Erna fragt die eigene Mutter über ein im Matsch spielendes Kind:
- Daaf das das?
- Das darf das.)

 Fictional ancient Greek dish mentioned in Aristophanes' comedy "Assemblywomen" (Ἐκκλησιάζουσαι 1169); Name of a dish compounded of all kinds of dainties, fish, flesh, fowl, and sauces. (Henry George Liddell. Robert Scott. A Greek-English Lexicon. rev. and aug. throughout by. Sir Henry Stuart Jones. with the ass. of Roderick McKenzie. Oxford. Clarendon Press. 1940.)
(Greek, Ancient: λοπαδο-τεμαχο-σελαχο-γαλεο-κρανιο-λειψανο-δριμ-υπο-τριμματο-σιλφιο-
καραβο-μελιτο-κατακεχυ-μενο-κιχλ-επι-κοσσυφο-φαττο-περιστερ-αλεκτρυον-
οπτο-κεφαλλιο-κιγκλο-πελειο-λαγῳο-σιραιο-βαφη-τραγανο-πτερύγων)

 New pond fish for the native fishpond.
(German: Neue Teichfische für den heimischen Fischteich.)

 She is gone with your uncle, your Taine (a French writer) and your tuna fish.
(French: Elle est partie avec tonton, ton Taine et ton thon.)

 In the low water we lazily fished for burbot (a fish), In the low water we lazily fished for tench (a fish). Didn't you kindly ask me for love, The fogs of the estuary have lured me.
(Russian: На мели мы лениво ловили налима. На мели мы лениво ловили линя. О любви не меня ли вы мило молили, Туманы лимана манили меня.)

 Love loves love lovingly which loves love and loves love for love.
(Telugu: Premanu Preminchina Prema Premakai Preminchina Premanu Premaga Premistundi)

 Love is a crazy thing that only a priest can cure, but the priest who cures it comits a great error.
(Spanish: El amor es una locura que solo el cura lo cura, pero el cura que lo cura comete una gran locura.)

 The priest's goat in the clerk's meadow.
(Danish: Præstens ged i degnens eng)

 The priest and the baker have two pictures. Unfortunately both pictures are blue.
(Hungarian: A pap és a pék két képet kap. Kár. Mind két kép kék.)

 Miller Michael measure two sacks of flour for me an Matzke's Matz. German: Müllers Michael mißt mir und Matzkes Matz zwei Säckchen Mehl ab.
(Sorbian, Upper: Młynkec Michał měri mi a Mackec Motsej małej měškaj muki.)

 Two piles of bald worms plus two piles of bald worms equals four piles of bald worms.
(Hungarian: Két kupac kopasz kukac meg két kupac kopasz kukac az négy kupac kopasz kukac.)

 One peppercorn in a copper pan, two pepperkorns in a copper pan, two pepperkorns in a copper pan, ...
(Swedish: Ett pepparkorn i en kopparpanna, två pepparkorn i en kopparpanna, tre pepparkorn i en kopparpanna, fyra ..., fem ..., sex ..., sju ..., åtta ..., nio ....)

 German: ... wenn das Bein aus Schaumgummi der Kata (Katharina) in der Zelle unter dem
sechszinkigen Schloß sich ausbreitet ...
(Hungarian: Ha tágul a Kata latticel lába hatágu lakat alatti cellába.)

 She placed the Czech matchbox on the table. ...
(German: Sie stellte das Tschechische Streichholzschächtelchen auf den Tisch. Auf den Tisch stellte sie das Tschechische Streichholzschächtelchen.)

 In Ostróg (city) trumpeters were blowing their trumpets: tra ra ra ... (the sound of a trumpet)
(Polish: W Ostrogu na rogu trąbili trębacze: tra ra ra ...)

 Lion-Eating Poet in the Stone Room.
Mr. Shi, the poet from a stone room, likes to eat lions. He promises solemnly, that he will eat ten lions. Regularly he goes to the market to look at the lions. ...
(Chinese, Mandarin: 施氏食獅史
石室詩士施氏，嗜獅，誓食十獅。
氏時時適市視獅。
十時，適十獅適市。
是時，適施氏適市。
氏視是十獅，恃矢勢，使是十獅逝世。
氏拾是十獅屍，適石室。
石室濕，氏使侍拭石室。
石室拭，氏始試食是十獅。
食時，始識是十獅，實十石獅屍。
試釋是事。)

 Mr. von Hagen, may I dare to ask you what collar you were wearing as you lay ill of stomach in the city of Copenhagen.
(German: Herr von Hagen darf ich's wagen, sie zu fragen, welchen Kragen sie getragen, als sie lagen krank am Magen in der Stadt zu Kopenhagen.)

 Small Baby Cried asking for Banana
(Tamil: Pachai Kulanthai Vazhai pazhathirkaga vizhundhu vivizhundhu azhuthathu.)

 Pete, surely ask permission of your father to take part in an enterprise.
(Esperanto: Petro, vi la permeson de la patro nepre prenu por partopreni entreprenon.)

 My father has hair on his chest.
(Dutch: Mijn vader heeft haar op zijn borst.)

 Old vessels underneath chests, underneath chests old vessels
(Basque, Euskara or Euskera: Murku zar arkapeko, arkapeko murku zar.)

 We came to the tinker when the tinker was mending pots with his nine tinker's daughters and the the tinker's old woman was carrying water in a mended pot. French: Nous sommes allés chez le chaudronnier, quand le chaudronnier répare les chaudrons avec ses neuf fils de chaudronnier, mais la vieille femme du chaudronnier leur apporte de l'eau avec des chaudrons rapiécés.
(Croatian, Serbian and Bosnian: Odosmo u kotlokrpa, kad kotlokrp kotle krpi sa svojih devet kotlokrpica, a stara im kotlokrpovka kotlokrpavim kotlovima vodu nosi.)

 This sour (lemon) is an old sour (lemon).
(Turkish: Bu eksi eski eksi.)

 Put the sour vegetables (?) in the pocket of the policeman
(Arabic: Hutt el turschi bitschies el schurti)

 The painter Pere Peret, who was given a prize by Portugal, prints cans and mixtures to put spice pepper in.
(Catalan: En Pere Peret pintor, premiat per Portugal, pinta pots i potinguetes per posar pebre picant.)

 A dignified/noble woman, put on her shoe, locked the door in the face of her husband.
(Hebrew: ISHA NA'ALA, NA'ALA NA'ALA, NA'ALA ET HADELET BIFNEY BA'ALA.)

 The Cat saw the roast. The roast tempted the cat. The cat put a paw on the roast. The roast burned the paw of the cat. The cat left the roast.
(French: Chat vit rôtrôt tenta chatchat mit patte à rôtrôt brûla patte à chatchat quitta rôt.)

 Sasha put the loquat (fruit) there.
(Hebrew: SASHA SAM SHAM SHESEK.)

 Sasha walked down the highway and sucked on a dry (ring-shaped) cracker.
(Russian: Шла Саша по шоссе и сосала сушку.)

 Six dry sausages
(French: Six saucisses sèches)

 One lamb, "serella", "merella" [nonsense words which play with "mesell", green person], woolly, full of wool, head and
crowned has six little lambs serells, merells, woolly, full of wool, head and crowned. If the lamb hadn't been serella, merella, woolly, full of wool, head and crowned, its little lambs wouldn't have been serells, merells, woolly, full of wool, head and crowned.
(Catalan: Una ovella, serella, merella, llanuda, llanada cap i coronada tenia sis corderets serells, merells, llanuts, llanats, cap i coronats. Si la ovella no haguera sigut serella, merella, llanuda, llanada cap i coronada, els seus corderets no haurien sigut serells, merells, llanuts, llanats, cap i coronats.)

 A fat lady wanted to get through the thick dirt. Whereupon the fat lady asked the fat servant if the fat servant would carry the fat lady through the thick dirt. Then then fat servant carried the fat lady through the thick dirt, whereupon the fat lady thanked the fat servant for carrying the fat lady through the thick dirt.
(German: Eine dicke Dame wollte durch den dicken Dreck, da fragt die dicke Dame den dicken Diener, ob der dicke Diener die dicke Dame durch den dicken Dreck trägt. Da trug der dicke Diener die dicke Dame durch den dicken Dreck, da dankt die dicke Dame dem dicken Diener, daß der dicke Diener die dicke Dame durch den dicken Dreck trug.)

 The stupid Doffels The fat stupid Doffel carried the thin stupid Doffel through the deep thick village dirt. Whereupon the thin stupid Doffel thanked the fat stupid Doffel that the fat stupid Doffel carried the thin stupid Doffel through the deep thick village dirt.
(German: Die dummen Doffel)

 It is not boor who in a village was born, but who pastures of boorishness.
(Italian: Nun è villano chi a la villa nasce, ma è villano chi de villania se pasce.)

 If in Graven counts are digging counts' graves, counts are digging counts' graves. The 1st Graven is the name of a village; The 2nd graven is the plural form of graaf (count); gravengraven is the plural form of a graf (grave) for a graaf (count); The 3rd graven is the dutch verb for digging; The 4th graven is also the dutch verb for digging; The 5th graven is the plural form of graaf (count); The last gravengraven is the plural form of a graf (grave) for a graaf(count). Dutch: Als in Graven(het plaatsje Graven) graven(meervoud van graaf) gravengraven(meervoud van het graf voor een graaf) graven(werkwoord), graven(werkwoord) graven(meervoud van graaf) gravengraven(meervoud van het graf voor een graaf).
(Dutch: Als in Graven graven gravengraven graven, graven graven gravengraven.)

 Once upon a time, there was a man of faith who was selling liver in the town of Foix. He said, my faith (my God) it is the last time I am selling liver in the town of Foix.
(French: Il était une fois, un homme de foi qui vendait du foie dans la ville de Foix. Il dit ma foi, c'est la dernière fois que je vends du foie dans la ville de Foix.)

 At once, Klim, strike the wedge.
(Russian: В один, Клим, клин колоти.)

 I once knew one (woman), that had a child, which she had from someone, if she hadn't know him, she wouldn't have that child. German: Ich habe eine gekannt, die ein Kind hatte, das hatte sie von einem, wenn sie den nicht gekannt hätte, hätte sie auch das Kind nicht.
(German: I han amol oine kennt ket, dia hot a Kend ket, des hot se von oim ket, wenn se den it kennt het, het se au des Kend it ket.)

 This is a log. This is a log. A finely spliced log sent by Miss Meissner from Neisse and she lets say quite finely, that her husband is a busy log-splicer, who at night - before eating or biting anything - would have spliced a lot of logs.
(German: Dies ist ein Scheit. Dies ist ein Scheit. Es ist ein feingesplissner Spleißenscheit, den schickt Frau Meissner aus Neiße und läßt dazu sagen gar fein, daß ihr Mann ein fleißiger Scheitspleißer sei, der am Abend - ehe er etwas gegessen oder gebissen - hätte viele Scheite gesplissen.)

 If saws were seeing saws sawing, then saws would see saws sawing
(Dutch: Als zagen zagen zagen zagen zagen zagen zagen zagen.)

 A non-moist chocolate chip cookie that lived in non-moist chocolate chip cookie land saw a moist chocolate chip cookie from moist chocolate chip cookie land and wanted to become a moist chocolate chip cookie and so went to moist chocolate chip cookie land, but the gate-keeper of moist chocolate chip cookie land said, "You are not a moist chocolate chip cookie, but a non-moist chocolate chip cookie, so live in non-moist chocolate chip cookie land," so the non-moist chocolate chip cookie gave up on becoming a moist chocolate chip cookie and went back to non-moist chocolate chip cookie land.
(Korean: 안촉촉한 초코칩 나라에 살던 안촉촉한 초코칩이 촉촉한 초코칩 나라의 촉촉한 초코칩을 보고 촉촉한 초코칩이 되고 싶어서 촉촉한 초코칩 나라에 갔는데 촉촉한 초코칩 나라의 문지기가 "넌 촉촉한 초코칩이 아니고 안촉촉한 초코칩이니까 안촉촉한 초코칩 나라에서 살아"라고해서 안촉촉한 초코칩은 촉촉한 초코칩이 되는것을 포기하고 안촉촉한 초코칩 나라로 돌아갔다.)

 That saying, that they said that you said that I said, that saying I didn't say, because if I would have said it would have been well said for having been said by me.
(Spanish: Ese dicho, que me han dicho, que tu has dicho, que yo he dicho, ese dicho no lo he dicho porque si lo hubiera dicho, ese dicho estaria bien dicho por haberlo dicho yo.)

 The floor is chequered. Who will unchequere it? The unchequerer who could unchequere it would be a good unchequerer.
(Spanish: El suelo esta encuadriculado. ¿Quién lo desencuadriculará? El desencuadriculador que lo desencuadriculó buen desencuadriculador será.)

 Lord of Camels, You made me a camel in the first place. The slow mind of a camel can't compete with You. Your plan placed the camel-drinking pond far away last year. But you would be wrong, thinking, your old believer is blaming you, forgetting your great name. No! Take my camel soul shortly away. Since not having drunk from an earthly bucket, the sufferings of your camel are drawn to an end. By this, the camel breathed his last breath. (from a poem by Romhanyi Jozsef)
(Hungarian: Tevék ura! Te tevél tevévé engem eleve,  Teveled nem ér fel tevefej tétova veleje.
  Te terved veté a tevevedelő tavat tavaly távol,  de tévednél, vélvén,  vén híved neved feledve
  elvetemedve  vádol.
  Nem! Vidd te tevelelkem hovatovább tova,  mivel levet - vert vederbe
  feltekerve - nem vedelve  lett betelve  a te tevéd szenvedelme.
  Te nevedbe  legyen eme  neveletlen tevetetem  eltemetve!
)

 The floor is chequered. Who will unchequere it? The unchequerer who could unchequere it would be a good unchequerer.
(Spanish: El suelo esta encuadriculado. ¿Quién lo desencuadriculará? El desencuadriculador que lo desencuadriculó buen desencuadriculador será.)

 Good evening miss, what a beautiful evening this evening is, if tomorrow evening is a beautiful evening like this one, what a beautiful evening tomorrow evening will be.
(Italian: Buonasera signorina, che bea sera che l'è stasera, se doman de sera l'è na bea sera come stasera che bea sera che l'è doman de sera.)

 A rooster (whith the name of) Saghfe jumped on the second one (called Sagahfengah) and beat him up. Can the rooster Sgahfangah jump on the rooster Sagahfe and beat him up like the rooster Sagahfe beat the Sagahfangah?
(Arabic: Deak sagahfe we deak sagahfengah nat el deak el sagahfe nagah el deake el sagahfengah gahfe yakeder el deak el sagahfe yangahe el deak el sagahfengah zay el deak el sagahfengah nagh el deak el sagahfe gafe?)

 Her's to us! Who's like us? Dammn few and they are all dead.
(Scots or Scottisch: Here's tae us!Wha's like us?Dammn few, an they're all deid.)

 Cough like you coughed earlier.
(Welsh: Pesychwch fel y pesychasoch gynt.)

 I have a friend who likes to become friend with your friend who likes to become the friend of my friend, do you like to become friend of my friend who likes to become friend of your friend?
(Persian or Farsi: ،  یک دوست دارم که دوست داره با دوست تو که دوست داره با دوست من دوست بشه دوست بشه، تو دوست داری با دوست من که دوست داره با دوست تو دوست بشه دوست
بشی؟)

 The traditional names of the clan MacLean are like a dog slurping soup: (said under breath) Hector, Lachlann, Lachlann, Hector, Hector, Lachlann, Charles. Hector, Lachlann, Lachlann, Hector, Hector, Lachlann, Charles.
(Scottish Gaelic: Mar chù ag ol eanbhruich, tha ainmean Chloinn 'Ill Eathain: (fon anail) Eachann, Lachann, Lachann, Eachann, Eachann, Lachann, Teàrlach. Eachann, Lachann, Lachann, Eachann, Eachann, Lachann, Teàrlach.)

 When he wants sour, then she wants sweet,
When he wants flour, then she wants corn,
when he says finch, then she says sparrow
when he says dog, she says cat,
he wants soup, she wants meat,
he wants to stand, then she wants to sit,
is he there, then is she here
he shouts hu then she shouts ha!
(German: Will er suur, so wott si süess,
will er Mehl, so wott sie Griess,
will er Fink, so wott sie Spatz,
seit er Hund, so seit sie Chatz,
will er Suppe, so seit sie Mocke,
will er stah, so wott sie hocke,
isch er det, so isch sie da,
schreit er hu, so schreit sie ha!)

 my yellow cat pees on my keys
(Indonesian: kucing kuningku kencing di kunci-kunciku)

 The black cat's thick cheeks.
(Finnish: Mustan kissan paksut posket.)

 "I couldn't care less," my sister Sientje would say, "if I saw seven black swans swim on the Zuiderzee".
(Dutch: "'t zou me zo een zorg zijn"  zou m'n zuster Sientje zeggen, "als ik zeven zwarte zwanen in de Zuiderzee zag zwemmen.")

 I went on a hurdle race, but ended in Utrecht, then I drove to Goedereede (place in the south of Holland). There I saw seven flies fly, but there wasn't a honeybee there.
(Dutch: Ik ging de hinderlopen lopen, maar kwam in Utrecht terecht. Toen ben ik naar Goedereede gerede en zag daar zeven vliegen vliegen, er was geen één bij bij.)

 Down a ladder went a bifigafa with seven little bifigafos. A little bifigafo fell down. Because she went to get the little bifigafo, the bifigafa fell down.
(Spanish: Por una ladera abajo iba una bifigafa con siete bifigafitos. Se cayó un bifigafito. Por ir a coger al bifigafito se cayó la bifigafa.)

 The cuckoo bought a hood for the little cuckoo. The little cuckoo put on the hood, How funny he is, wearing the hood.
(Russian: Кукушка кукушонку купила капюшон. Надел кукушонок капюшон, Как в капюшоне он смешон.)

 Cook Abbas cooked (a) meal, but he cooked little.
(Azerbaijani or Azeri: Aşpaz Abbas aş asmış, asmışsa da az asmış.)

 The mottled quail is mottled but the little quail chickens are more mottled than the mottled quail.
(Romanian: E pestriţă prepeliţa pestriţă, dar mai pestriţi sunt puii prepeliţei pestriţe.)

 Pedro Pablo Pérez Pereira, poor portuguese painter paints pictures for little money to survive in Paris.
(Spanish: Pedro Pablo Pérez Pereira pobre pintor portugués pinta pinturas por poca plata para pasar por París.)

 Paco Peco, (a) rich kid, Insulted his uncle Fred like a madman, And (Fred) said, "Paco Peco, little by little, your little beak!" (that's slang for something like shut your mouth or I'll shut it for you)
(Spanish: Paco Peco, chico rico, insultaba como un loco a su tío Federico, y este dijo, - ¡Poco a poco, Paco Peco, poco pico!)

 Because I eat little coconut, I buy little coconut.
(Spanish: Como poco coco como, poco coco compro.)

 A little later, Aman will court wealthy Maya probably in front of many people.
(Tagalog or Filipino: Mayamaya'y mamamanhikan si Aman sa mayamang si Maya malamang sa harap ng maraming mamamayan.)

 Four black dirty little devils drew a drawing with black ink.
(Russian: Четыре чёрненких чумазеньких чертёнка чертили чёрными чернилами чертёж.)

 A black beast bathes in a black bathtub.
(French: Une bête noire se baigne dans une baignoire noire.)

 A black billy goat is chewing the thorny bush's black top; Don't chew, black billy goat, the thorny bush's black top. French: Un bouc noir broute le sommet noir d'un arbuste épineux; bouc noir, ne broute pas le sommet noir de l'arbuste épineux!
(Croatian, Serbian and Bosnian: Crni jarac crnom trnu crn vrh grize; ne grizi mi crni jarče, crnom trnu crn vrh!)

 Ten goats pulled ten hundredweight to the zoo.
(German: Zehn Ziegen zogen zehn Zentner Zucker zum Zoo.)

 Fabra has a goat over each tree.
(Catalan: En Fabra té una cabra sobre cada arbre.)

 No need for ladder for a small pine tree, needed for a tall pine tree; if needed, take it. Spanish: Pino pequeño no necesita escalera, pino alto si que la necesita, si la necesita llévala.

(Catalan: A pi xic escala no cal, a pi alt escala cal; si cal du-li.)

 A small worm is sitting on a tower, with a small umbrella in his arm. A small storm comes up, throws the small worm with the small umbrella in his small arm from the small tower.
(German: Sitzt e Wermsche uff'm Termsche mit 'em Schermsche unnerm Ermsche. Kimmt e Stermsche, werft des Wermsche mit'm Scherme unnerm Ermsche vom Termsche.)

 The little worm called Irmchen carrying a little umbrella below its little arm is standing on the top of a little tower. There appears a weak storm that blows away the little worm called Irmchen with the little umbrella below its little arm away from the little tower, that poor little worm called Irmchen. German: Das Würmchen Irmchen steht mit dem Schirmchen unter dem Ärmchen auf dem Türmchen. Da kommt ein Stürmchen und weht das Würmchen Irmchen mit dem Schirmchen unter dem Ärmchen von seinem Türmchen, das arme Würmchen Irmchen.
(German: 's Wermche Ermche schdehd mimm Scherrmche unnerm Ärmche uwwm Dermche. Kommd e Schdermche unn bloosd's Wermche Ermche mimm Schermche unnerm Ärmche vumm Dermche, 's arm Wermche Ermche.)

 Bunches of (a kind of) bananas with drying tips are carried to and fro for a day; then only one comb is left.
(Thai: กล้วยตานีปลายหวีเหี่ยว หิ้วหวีไป หิ้วหวีมา เหลือหวีเดียว)

 From the north comes a dumb (person), carrying a trumpet at his waist.
From the south comes a monk, holding a sole (fish) in his hand.
The sole holding monk wants to trade his sole against the trumpet carrying dumb's trumpet. The trumpet carrying dumb doesn't want to trade his trumpet against the sole holding monk's sole. Not only does the trumpet carrying dumb hit the sole holding monk with his
trumpet, but also the sole holding monk hits the trumpet carrying dumb with his sole. The monk goes home and stews the sole. The dumb (plays) didi da da (on) the trumpet.
(Chinese, Mandarin: 打南边来了个哑巴, 腰里憋着个喇叭
打北边来了个喇嘛, 手里提了个鳎犸
提着鳎犸的喇嘛要拿鳎犸换憋着喇叭的哑巴的喇叭.
憋着喇叭的哑巴不愿那喇叭换提这鳎犸的喇嘛的鳎犸.
不仅憋着喇叭的哑巴打了提着鳎犸的喇嘛一喇叭.
还是提着鳎犸的喇嘛打了憋着喇叭的哑巴一鳎犸,
喇嘛回家炖鳎犸.
哑巴嘀嘀哒哒吹喇叭.)

 This fool never should drink wine, a short and dumb life he will live if he drinks.
(Spanish: Ese bobo vino nunca beber debe, vida boba y breve vivirá si bebe.)

 What did the donkey drink at the lake? The donkey drank water at the lake.
(French: Qu'a bu l'âne au lac? L'âne au lac a bu l'eau.)

 If we wash-women knew where to find warm water, we wash-women would wash white laundry. German: Wenn wir Waschweiber wüssten wo warmes Wasser wäre, würden wir Waschweiber weiße Wäsche waschen.
(German: Wann wie Woschwiewa wusste wou wormet Wota wia, wurde wie Woschwiewa witte Wosch wosche.)

 We Viennese Washerwomen would wash white laundry, if we knew where warm soft water was.
(German: Wir Wiener Wäscheweiber wäschten weisse Wäsche, Wenn wir wüssten, wo warmes, weiches Wasser wär.)

 Water barrel, water barrel who tied you down with water? The son of the cooper (?) tied me down. If I had the tools of the son of the cooper (?) I would had tied you down better.
(Greek, Modern: Βαρέλι, ωεροβάρελοποιος σε νεροβαρελόδεσε;Ο γιος του νεροβαρελοδέτη με νεροβαρελοβάρεσεΝα ΄χα γω τα σύνεργατου γιού του νεροβαρελοδετή,καλύτερα θα σε νεροβαρελόδενα)

 If the snail had a face as it has a spiral, (it) would be a face, would be a cabbage, would be a snail with a face.
(Spanish: Si el caracol tuviera cara como tiene el caracol, fuera cara, fuera col, fuera caracol con cara.)

 The floor is chequered. Who will unchequere it? The unchequerer who could unchequere it would be a good unchequerer.
(Spanish: El suelo esta encuadriculado. ¿Quién lo desencuadriculará? El desencuadriculador que lo desencuadriculó buen desencuadriculador será.)

 I´m so hungry, sleepy and thirsty, that I don´t eat, nor sleep, nor drink, if I ate, slept and drank, hunger, sleep and thirst would be over, but as I don´t eat, nor sleep, nor drink, hunger, sleep and thirst are still with me.
(Catalan: Tinc una gana, una son i una set, que no menjo, ni dormo, ni bec, si menjava, dormia i bevia, la gana, la son i la set em passarien, però com que no menjo, ni dormo, ni bec, no em passa ni la gana, ni la son, ni la set.)

 Water barrel, water barrel who tied you down with water? The son of the cooper (?) tied me down. If I had the tools of the son of the cooper (?) I would had tied you down better.
(Greek, Modern: Βαρέλι, ωεροβάρελοποιος σε νεροβαρελόδεσε;Ο γιος του νεροβαρελοδέτη με νεροβαρελοβάρεσεΝα ΄χα γω τα σύνεργατου γιού του νεροβαρελοδετή,καλύτερα θα σε νεροβαρελόδενα)

 I'm wetting my elbows, my elbows are getting wet, am I wetting my elbows?
I'm wetting my elbows, my elbows are getting wet, would you be able to say it?
(French: J'mouille mes coudes,
mes coudes s'mouillent,
est-ce que j'mouille mes coudes?
J'mouille mes coudes,
mes coudes s'mouillent,
saurais-tu le dire?)

 get rid of the nephews
(Italian: I niputi putali)

 Two bakers would like to get two blue pictures.
(Hungarian: Két pék két szép kék képet kér.)

 Small small ones, hardworking twos, lazy threes, beaten fours, steady working fives, gold stolen sixes, sevens ate my meals, hopscotched the eigths, faded the nines as doctors, tens the red tongs.
(Turkish: Mini mini birlerÇalışkan ikilerTembel üçlerDayak yiyen dörtlerBeşler makine gibi işlerAltılar altını çaldılarYediler yemeğimi yedilerSekizler seksek olup gittilerDokuzlar toktor olup gittilerOnlar kırmızı donlar.)

 One a tied knot, two tie a knot, three a tied knot, four tie a knot, ...
(Vietnamese: Một nút thắt, hai thắt nút, ba nút thắt, bốn thắt nút, ...)

 Such six as we five are, can't be found among four, because we three are the two only ones. German: Solche sechs wie wir fünf gibt es keine vier weil wir drei die zwei einzigen sind. Bayrische logik :-)
(German: Soiche sechse wia mia fünfe gibt's koane viere weil mia drei die zwoa oanzigen san.)

 The plants from my kitchen garden - leek, radishes, peppermint, estragon. If I like them, why don't you like them. German: Die (Küchen)kräuter meines Gartens - Porree (Lauch), Radieschen. Pfefferminz, Estragon, wenn sie mir gefallen, warum gefallen sie dir nicht.
(Georgian or Kartveli: ჩემი ბაღის მწვანილი, პრასა, ბოლოკი, პიტნა, ტარხუნა-თუკი მე მეპრას, მებოლოკ, მეპიტნატარხუნება, შენ რატომ არ გეპრას, გებოლოკ, გეპიტნატარხუნება.)

 Parra had a dog, Guerra had a grapevine. Parra's dog climbed on Guerra's grapevine. Guerra hit Parra's dog with a club. And Parra said to Guerra: "Why has Guerra hit Parra's dog with a club?" And Guerra answered: "If Parra's dog wouldn't have climbed on the grapevine of Guerra, Guerra wouldn't have hit Parra's dog with a club.
(Spanish: Parra tenía una perra. Guerra tenía una parra. La perra de Parra subió a la parra de Guerra. Guerra pegó con la porra a la perra de Parra. Y Parra le dijo a Guerra: -¿Por qué ha pegado Guerra con la porra a la perra de Parra? Y Guerra le contestó: -Si la perra de Parra no hubiera subido a la parra de Guerra, Guerra no hubiese pegado con la porra a la perra de Parra.)

 She/he said tell her/him if she/he told her/him,she/he said that I told her/him to tell her/him!
(Albanian: Thuaj tha m'i thënë a i ka thënë thuaj,tha i kam thënë thuaj m'i thënë!)

 A very hard-to-say-fast saying is a saying to be said fast, a only hard-to-say-fast saying is called a saying to be said fast.
(German: Ein sehr schwer sehr schnell zu sprechender Spruch ist ein Schnellsprechspruch, auch ein nur schwer schnell zu sprechender Spruch heißt Schnellsprechspruch.)

 Look at that! said the tumor and grew on.
(Finnish: Kas vain! sanoi kasvain ja kasvoi vain.)

 Has anybody actually said anything? German: Hat jemand vielleicht etwas gesagt?
(German: Håt epper epper eppes gsågg?)

 He knocked on the door He said, "Who?" He said, "Amin" He said, "What's your problem?" He said, "The old woman" He said, "What's her problem?" He said, "She's dead" He said, "Really?!" He said, "Really" He said, "Follow me!" He said, "Let's go!
(Arabic: Daq al-bab Kaloo, "Mean?" Kaloo, "Amin" Kaloo, "Malak?" Kaloo, "l-hajji" Kaloo, "Malha?" Kaloo, "Mawtat" Kaloo, "Balla?!" Kaloo, "Walla." Kaloo, "Hakni!" Kaloo, "Yalla!)

 The chubby woman Ba sells rice cake on the sea shore.
(Vietnamese: Bà ba béo bán bánh bèo bên bờ biển.)

 George the locksmith sells locks in the locksmith.
(Spanish: Jorge el cerrajero vende cerrajes en la cerrajería.)

 Come to the match factory, George, let's light a candle!
(Hungarian: Gyere, Gyuri, a gyufagyárba, gyertyát gyújtsunk!)

 Let's collect the Bokul flowers scattered in the grass and distribute them. Bokul is a small white flower with a beautiful fragrance (perhaps a camellia?).
(Assamese: Bokul Bagorise Bobosa Bonote Butoli Bilawngoi Bola)

 Little girl with your beautiful mouth do you have to go along with your Mum?
(Dutch: Meisje met je mooie mondje moet je met je maatje mee?)

 A small piece of bread that a little child called Fritzle (typical Swabian boy's name) has lost is lying in the yard. Then a small (in swabian everything is small) rooster comes and eats up the piece of bread.
(German: Em Hefele em Eckele do leit a gloines Breckele vom Fritzele seim Weckele em Hefele em Eckele. Do kommt a gloines Geckele ond frisst des gloine Breckele vom Fritzele seim Weckele em Hefele em Eckele.)

 Nicholas' child saw a little frog hide, when the little frog saw Nicholas' child hide, the little frog hid.
(Kikuyu: Kana ka Nikora kona kora kora, nako kora kona kana ka Nikora kora.)

 A child saw a frog and ran and a frog saw a child and ran.
(Kikuyu: Kana kona kora kora nako kora kona kana kora.)

 The child saw a frog and ran, told the sibling to run away, the sibling refused to run away, took a stick to hit the frog, the frog ran away and hid under a stone.
(Kikuyu: Kana koona kora koora kera kana kao koore, kana kao karega kuura kooya kamuti karige kora, kora koora keehitha kahigaini.)

 I saw a saw and where I saw (it) there was only a saw by a saw.
(Swedish: Jag såg en såg och vart jag såg så såg jag bara såg vid såg.)

 I bought few glasses (of beer or wine), few glasses I bought, as I only bought a few glasses I only payed for a few.
(Spanish: Compré pocas copas, pocas copas compré y como compré pocas copas, pocas copas pagué.)

 Six Saxonian drinkers pay ten Czech bar bills.
(German: Sechs sächsische Säufer zahlen zehn tschechische Zechen.)

 Godd day Madame Sans-Souci. How much are the marigolds here? Six sous, the marigolds here. Six sous?! That's too expensive Madame Sans-Souci.
(French: - Bonjour Madame Sans-Souci. Combien sont ces soucis-ci?- Six sous, ces soucis-ci.- Six sous?!  C'est trop cher, Madame Sans-Souci.)

 Six skewers of liver each for six Rials (Iranian unit of money).
(Persian or Farsi: Shish sikh jigar sikhi shi shezar)

 Good day ms Sans-Soucis! How much are these saussages? These saussages are six hundred and six sous (old French monetary unit). If these saussages are six hundred and six sous, these saussages are six hundred and six sous too expensive!
(French: Bonjour madam Sans-Soucis! Combien sont ces saucissons-ci? Ces saucissons ci sont six cent six sous. Si ces saucissons ci sont six cent six sous, ces sausissons ci sont six cent six sous trop cher!)

 How much wood would a woodchuck chuck if a woodchuck could chuck wood?
(Italian: Quanti rami di rovere roderebbe un roditore se un roditore potesse rodere rami di rovere?)

 (A) puff-adder has been killed, coco-yam has been spread (for sale). Because I was watching the killing of the puff-adder I could not collect some coco-yam.
(Hausa: An kashe kasa an kasa gwaza.
Garin kallon kisan kasa na kasa kwashe kashin gwaza.)

 Don't confuse a platypus with an otolaryngologist, a platypus with an ornithologist. Because platypus is platypus, otolaryngologist is otolaryngologist, and ornithologist is ornithologist.
(Portuguese: Não confunda Ornitorrinco com Otorrinolaringologista, Ornitorrinco com ornitologista, Ornitologista com Otorrinolaringologista, Porque ornitorrinco É ornitorrinco, Ornitologista é ornitologista E otorrinolaringologista é Otorrinolaringologista.)

 Nelly the Nanny fools Molly the Granny, because Jenny and Lenny the fools insist that Nelly can fool the Granny. But Molly calls Polly the funny one, and Polly the funny one fools Jenny and Lenny the fools. Jenny and Lenny the fools call Nelly the Nanny for help, but Molly the Granny and Polly the funny one are now helped by Benny from Bonn, who now fools Jenny and Lenny the fools and Nelly the Nanny too.
(German: Nelly die Nanny narrt Molly die Granny, da Jenny und Lenny die Narren beharren, dass Nelly die Granny narren kann. Doch Molly ruft Polly die Drollige an, worauf Polly die Drollige Jenny und Lenny die Narren narren kann. Jenny und Lenny die Narren rufen Nelly die Nanny zu Hilf, doch Molly der Granny und Polly der Drolligen hilft nun der Benny aus Bonn, der Jenny und Lenny die Narren und Nelly die Nanny nun mitnarren kann.)

 Grey sparrow, why do you chatter away? Because I'm the king's grey sparrow chatterer.
(Portuguese: Pardal Pardo porque palras? 
Palro e palrarei, porque sou o pardal pardo, palrador d'el Rei!)

 That saying, that they said that you said that I said, that saying I didn't say, because if I would have said it would have been well said for having been said by me.
(Spanish: Ese dicho, que me han dicho, que tu has dicho, que yo he dicho, ese dicho no lo he dicho porque si lo hubiera dicho, ese dicho estaria bien dicho por haberlo dicho yo.)

 (A) puff-adder has been killed, coco-yam has been spread (for sale). Because I was watching the killing of the puff-adder I could not collect some coco-yam.
(Hausa: An kashe kasa an kasa gwaza.
Garin kallon kisan kasa na kasa kwashe kashin gwaza.)

 Uncle shut aunty in the cupboard because she cut up his important papers from the cupboard with a pair of scissors.

(Marathi: Kakane Kakula Kapatat Kondle Karan Kakune Kakachya Kapatatle Kamache Kagad Katrine Karakara Kapun Kaadhle.)

 - Friend, buy me coconut. - Friend, I don't buy coconut, because I don't eat much coconut therefor I don't buy much coconut.
(Spanish: - Compadre, cómpreme un coco. - Compadre, no compro coco, porque poco coco como poco coco compro.)

 I have so much blood that at five I'm sleepy. Spanish: Tengo tanta sangre que a las cinco tengo sueño.
(Catalan: Tinc tanta sang que a les cinc tinc son.)

 On my knees quince I gathered; On my knees I gathered quince. Spanish: Arrodillado membrillos cogía, arrodillado cogía membrillos.
(Catalan: De genollons codonys collia, de genollons collia codonys.)

 in those, of masculine gender, who aren't gathering enough wood sorrel by themselves anymore
(Lithuanian: nebeprisikiškiakopūsteliaujančiuosiuose)

 The night watchman is tooting. And when he has tooted enough, he puts his tooter back into the tooter-box.
(German: Tuten tut der Nachtwächter. Und wenn er genug getutet hat, tut er seine Tute wieder in den Tutkasten rein.)

 When the tackling dachshund tackled a dachshund, the tackled dachshund tackled the tackling dachshund back.
(Dutch: Toen de tackelende tekkel een tekkel tackelde, tackelde de getackelde tekkel de tackelende tekkel terug.)

 The bricklayer Boeckl carried a pick and a pack on his back. Behind him walked the tramp Baeckl with his dog Bockl. Suddenly Baeckl's Bockl snapped at Boeckl's pack and togetehr with the pick tore it of his back.
(German: Der Maurer Böckl trug auf seinem Buckl einen Pickel und ein Packl. Hinterdrein ging der Bummler Bäckl mit seinem Hund Bockl. Auf einmal packte dem Bäckl sein Bockl dem Böckl das Packl und riss es im samt dem Pickel vom Buckl.)

 This is a log, a spliced log, A well-spliced spliced log. And this well-spliced spliced log belongs to Mrs. Scheitschleißer, and Mrs. Scheitschleißer is sitting behind the house and splicing logs.
(German: Dies ist ein Scheit, dies ist ein Schleißenscheit, ein wohlgeschlissenes Schleißenscheit. Und dieses wohlgeschlissene Schleißenscheit gehört Frau Scheitschleißer, und Frau Scheitschleißer sitzt hinter dem Haus und schleißt Scheite.)

 Behind that palace there is a poor mad dog. Give a piece of bread to that poor mad dog.
(Italian: Dietro a quel palazzo c'è un povero cane pazzo. Date un pezzo di pane a quel povero pazzo cane.)

 I'll give you a blow on one of your eyes and on your other eye I'll also give you a blow.
(German: Isch haach der aans uff dei aan Aach un uff dei anner Aach haach isch der aach aans.)

 ... you are blind in your ears, your mind and your eyes.
(Greek, Modern: ... τυφλός τα τ' ώτα, τον τε νουν, τα τ' όμματ' εί.)

 Boy, let down your blinds (shutters). German: Junge las deinen Rolladen herunter rollen.
(German: Bou dou dein Rollolodn rorolln loun.)

 Those who report to the police those who let the thieves escape will receive a reward!
(German: Die, die die, die die Diebe ausreißen ließen, der Polizei melden, bekommen eine Belohnung!)

 Grandma, let me play La Paloma again. German: Oma lass mich noch mal La Paloma laufen lassen.
(German: Oma lo ma nomal La Paloma lope lote.)

 The gift which I sent you, have you received it? When you receive the gift, let me know that you received the gift.
(Urdu: jo ponchi main ne bhaiji the woh ponchi aap ko ponchi hay agar ponchay to keh dena keh ponchi ponchi hum ko ponchi hay.)

 Grandma, let me play La Paloma again. German: Oma lass mich noch mal La Paloma laufen lassen.
(German: Oma lo ma nomal La Paloma lope lote.)

 Let's move your box, because your box is bothering us.
(French: Ecartons ton carton car ton carton nous gêne.)

 Lena barely ate. She thus ate because of laziness.
(Russian: Лена ела еле-еле. Лена ела так от лени.)

 cry because of fear
(Dutch: Angstschreeuw)

 Because it wasn’t warm I used warm clothes.
(Japanese: 暖かくなったから、暖かい服を使った
(あたたかくなかったから、あたたかい　ふく　を　つかった))

 The tomato farmer Matute killed the smuggler Mot becaus Mota the smuggler took a tomato from the tomato field. Because of one tomate, the tomato farmer Matute killed the smuggler Mota.
(Spanish: El tomatero Matute mató al matutero Mota porque Mota el matutero tomó de su tomatera un tomate. Por eso, por un tomate, mató el tomatero Matute al matutero Mota.)

 Three sad tigers were swallowing wheat on a wheat field.
(Spanish: Tres tristes tigres tragaban trigo en un trigal.)

 Behind the triple trapeze from Tripoli, climbed trigonomically three sad triumviri, troglodytes, mixed up and transplanted, by/for the tremendous tretralcatrapense.
(Spanish: Tras el triple trapecio de Trípoli trepaban trigonométricamente tres triste triunviros trogloditas trastocados y traspuestos por el tremendo tretralcatrapense.)

 Behind grandmother's little hut seven beetroots grow very close together.
(Dutch: Achter grootmoeders hutje groeien zeven krootjes op een klutje.)

 In the reeds of Junqueria, Julian was collecting reeds. Juan joined him to collect them and together they collected reeds.
(Spanish: En un juncal de Junqueira, juncos juntaba Julián. Juntóse Juan a juntarlos y juntos juncos juntaron.)

 In the garden of Brother Andrew, Brother Simon leaves was collecting. In the garden of Brother Simon, Brother Andrew was collecting leaves.
(Italian: Nel giardin di Frate Andrea, Fra' Simon foglion cogliea. Nel giardin di Fra' Simon, Frate Andrea cogliea foglion.)

 Brother Arkadij slaughtered a grey cow on the Ararat mountains.
(Russian: Брат Аркадий зарезал бурую корову на горах Араратских.)

 In the garden of Brother Andrew, Brother Simon leaves was collecting. In the garden of Brother Simon, Brother Andrew was collecting leaves.
(Italian: Nel giardin di Frate Andrea, Fra' Simon foglion cogliea. Nel giardin di Fra' Simon, Frate Andrea cogliea foglion.)

 In (Mr) Niwa's garden, two chickens suddenly ate a crocodile.
(Japanese: Niwa no niwa ni wa, niwa no niwatori wa niwaka ni wani wo tabeta.)

 A black ox ate a raw egg in heaven.
(Irish: D'ith damh dubh ubh amh ar neamh.)

 Four black dirty little devils drew a drawing with black ink.
(Russian: Четыре чёрненких чумазеньких чертёнка чертили чёрными чернилами чертёж.)

 Little daughter of inhabitant of Constantinople
(Polish: Konstantynopolitańczykowianeczka)

 Little pot of butter, when will you unlittlepotofbutterize yourself? I will unlittlepotofbutterize myself when you unlittlepotofbutterize yourself.
(French: Petit pot de beurre, quand te dépetitpotdebeurreriseras-tu? Je me dépetitpotdebeurreriserai quand tu te dépetitpotdebeurreriseras.)

 lump of butter
(Dutch: Boterklontje, boterklontje, boterklontje, ...)

 Butter, rye bread and green cheese: those who unable to say this are not real Frisians
(Frisian: Bûter, brea en griene tsiis
Hwa dat net sizze kin
is gjin oprjochte Fries.)

 One lamb, "serella", "merella" [nonsense words which play with "mesell", green person], woolly, full of wool, head and
crowned has six little lambs serells, merells, woolly, full of wool, head and crowned. If the lamb hadn't been serella, merella, woolly, full of wool, head and crowned, its little lambs wouldn't have been serells, merells, woolly, full of wool, head and crowned.
(Catalan: Una ovella, serella, merella, llanuda, llanada cap i coronada tenia sis corderets serells, merells, llanuts, llanats, cap i coronats. Si la ovella no haguera sigut serella, merella, llanuda, llanada cap i coronada, els seus corderets no haurien sigut serells, merells, llanuts, llanats, cap i coronats.)

 I went, I played, I fell.
(Guarani: à aha ya ha à ha ya à)

 A hunter who knows how to hunt went out without his hunting dog.
(French: Un chasseur sachant chasser chassait sans son chien de chasse.)

 Eve gives the grape to Ava, Ava gives the egg to Eve, now Eve is without the grape in the mean time Ava is without the egg.
(Italian: Eva dava l'uva ad Ava, Ava dava le uova ad Eva, ora Eva è senza uva mentre Ava è senza uova.)

 David go back to Buddo, the time to go to Buddo is now!
(Ganda or Luganda: Dawudi dda eBuddo obudde obudda eBuddo butuuse!)

 George came back already from the cage of the giant.
(Maltese: Ġorġ raġa’ ġà mill-gaġġa tal-ġgant.)

 French: Les quatre perroquets attrapés par To‘ti sont dans la cage.
(Uzbek: To‘ti tutgan to‘rtta to‘ti to‘rda turibdi.)

 James lowers the cage.
(Spanish: Jaime baja la jaula.)

 this is the key to the house the house is in the plaza in the house there's a room in the room there's a floor on the floor is a table on the table there's a cage inside the cage there's a bird that sings and says: from bird in cage to, cage to table, table to floor, floor to room room to house, house to plaza "this is the key to the house".
(Spanish: Esta es la llave de la casa! la casa está en la plaza, en la casa hay un cuarto, dentro de el cuarto hay un piso, ensima de el piso hay una mesa, encima de la mesa hay una jaula, dentro de la jaula hay loro que canta y dice: de loro en jaula, jaula en mesa, mesa en piso, piso en cuarto, cuarto en casa, casa en la plaza "esta es la llave de la casa".)

 Moszkvics (a car) ignition key, beach volleyball; hey! I've put a great deal of deo on me.
(Hungarian: Moszkvics-slusszkulcs, strandröplabda, sej, de bedezodoroztam magam)

 i've seen the sun sink in sea.
(Dutch: Ik heb de zon in de zee zien zakken.)

 Did you ever happen to wake up without a cent when sun goes up?
(Italian: T'è mai capitat' d'alzart' senza 'n sold' quan' s'alza 'l sole?)

 Once upon a time there was a king who had 3 sons the first one was called Skrat, the second Skratskratterat and the third Skratskratteratskratteskriumskrat. In a neighbouring kingdom lived a king who had 3 daughters, the first one
was called Sip, the second one Sipsippenip, and the third one Sipsippenipsipsirumsip. when time came they got married to eachother. Skrat to Sip, Skratskratterat to Sipsippenip and Skratskratteratskratskrirumskrat to
Sipsippenipsipsirumsip. And they lived happily ever after. German: Dies ist eigentlich ein Märchen aus West Juteland. Die männlichen Namen spielen mit dem Wort "skratte": kreischen, schrill ertönen, quietschen, krächzen; krächzend lachen, laut auflachen. Die weiblichen spielen mit dem Wort "sippenippe": zartes Weib; Xanthippe.
(Danish: Der var en gang en konge, der havde tre sønner. Den ene hed Skrat, den anden Skratskratterat, og den tredie Skratskratteratskratskrirumskrat. Der var også en anden konge, der havde tre døtre. Den ene hed Sip, den anden Sipsippenip, og den tredje Sipsippenipsipsirumsip. Da de var blevet voksne, giftede den ene konges sønner sig med den anden konges døtre. Skrat fik Sip, Skratskratterat fik Sipsippenip, og Skratskratteratskratskrirumskrat fik Sipsippenipsipsirumsip. Og de levede lykkeligt til deres dages ende.)

 There was once a girl called Barbara.  Barbara had a greengrocery, and she sold rhubarb. Therefore everyone called her Rhubarb Barbara.  Later on she opened a cafe with a bar. It was written on the window: Rhubarb Barbara's Bar. Some wild men, real barbarians, came to visit: the Rhubarb Barbara's Bar Barbarians. Oh, what long beards those men had! They called the beards Rhubarb Barbara's Bar Barbarians' Beards. And the barber who had to trim the beards was the Rhubarb Barbara's Bar Barbarians' Beard
Barber!
(Dutch: Er was eens een meisje, dat heette Barbara. Barbara had een groentenwinkel en verkocht rabarber. Daarom noemden alle mensen dat meisje: Rabarberbarbara. Later begon Barbara een cafe met een bar. Op het raam stond: Rabarberbarbarabar. Daar kwamen wilde mannen op bezoek, echte barbaren: de Rabarberbarbarabarbarbaren. O, wat hadden die mannen lange baarden! Die baarden noemden ze: Rabarberbarbarabarbarbarenbaarden. En de barbier die die lange baarden moest knippen was de: Rabarberbarbarabarbarbarenbaardenbarbier!)

 Suddenly 'si Botak' cough on the bricks.
(Indonesian: Tiba-tiba, Si Botak batuk-batuk di atas batu bata.)

 There was once a girl called Barbara.  Barbara had a greengrocery, and she sold rhubarb. Therefore everyone called her Rhubarb Barbara.  Later on she opened a cafe with a bar. It was written on the window: Rhubarb Barbara's Bar. Some wild men, real barbarians, came to visit: the Rhubarb Barbara's Bar Barbarians. Oh, what long beards those men had! They called the beards Rhubarb Barbara's Bar Barbarians' Beards. And the barber who had to trim the beards was the Rhubarb Barbara's Bar Barbarians' Beard
Barber!
(Dutch: Er was eens een meisje, dat heette Barbara. Barbara had een groentenwinkel en verkocht rabarber. Daarom noemden alle mensen dat meisje: Rabarberbarbara. Later begon Barbara een cafe met een bar. Op het raam stond: Rabarberbarbarabar. Daar kwamen wilde mannen op bezoek, echte barbaren: de Rabarberbarbarabarbarbaren. O, wat hadden die mannen lange baarden! Die baarden noemden ze: Rabarberbarbarabarbarbarenbaarden. En de barbier die die lange baarden moest knippen was de: Rabarberbarbarabarbarbarenbaardenbarbier!)

 The long line run alongside the rented building.
(French: La longue ligne longe le local loue.)

 Behind a big long pew I sit down and keep laughing for a long while.
(Guarani: Apyka puku kupépe, aguapy apuka puku.)

 Is a small piece of a ship (wouden) with a long name, found in a nautical museum in The Netherlands. It is used for the anker-chain.
(Dutch: Azijnzuurhoutenankerkettingsluitingslothoutje)

 Six salmons in a small laquered wooden box
(Swedish: Sex laxar i en lackask)

 Small violet flannel rags
(German: Lilaflanelläppchen)

 A cloak climbs-climbs four layers of rags. When the cloak climbs-climbs, four layers of rags climb-climb.
(Spanish: Una capa trepa-trepa cuatro capas de trapito. Cuando la capa trepa-trepa, trepan-trepan cuatro capas de trapito.)

 News has come from China that four Chinese policeman have arrested four chinese children for licking sugar from a spoon at 4:44.
(Urdu: Cheen say khabar ayee hay kay char cheeni sepahi nay char buj kur chuvalees minut pur char cheeni bachoon ko chumach say cheeni chatthay howay girifthar kur lia.)

 Six red lorries, four black lorries
(Telugu: Aaru yarra laariloo, naalugu nalla laareelu)

 Five dogs chase six cats.
(French: Cinq chiens chassent six chats.)

 When a stringing stringer (someone who makes strings) must tune a string, He tunes six cordons (little strings) to tune the string, But if one of the cordons of the string come unstrung, The unstrung cordon make the string unstrung, The string that the stringing stringer had bad tuned.
(French: Quand un cordier cordant doit accorder sa corde, Pour sa corde accorder six cordons il accorde, Mais si l'un des cordons de la corde décorde, Le cordon décordé fait décorder la corde, Que le cordier cordant avait mal accordée.)

 A plug/cork with agood waist will plug/fit, a plug/cork with a bad waist will not plug/fit.
French: Bouchon de bonne taille bouchera, bouchon de mauvaise taille ne bouchera pas.
(Occitan or Gascon: Tap tarat taparà, tap pas tarat taparà pas.)

 Where there is love, there is no toil, but if there is toil, the toil is love. French: Quand on aime, on n'a pas de mal, et si on a du mal, on aime cet effort.
(Latin: Ubi amatur, non laboratur
Aut si laboratur, labor amatur.)

 When suffering my only confort was love.
(German: Bei Leid lieh stets Heil die Lieb'.)

 Well, it really rains, Paul, but it only rains a little.
(Catalan: Com a ploure, prou que plou, Pau, però plou poc.)

 Paco Peco, (a) rich kid, Insulted his uncle Fred like a madman, And (Fred) said, "Paco Peco, little by little, your little beak!" (that's slang for something like shut your mouth or I'll shut it for you)
(Spanish: Paco Peco, chico rico, insultaba como un loco a su tío Federico, y este dijo, - ¡Poco a poco, Paco Peco, poco pico!)

 Cold dew falls from the sky; the little kitten is cold; it sneezes and sneezes; its tiny nose is cold.
German: Kalter Tau fällt vom Himmel, dem kleinen Kätzchen ist es kalt, es niest und niest, seine klitzekleine Nase ist erkältet.
(Georgian or Kartveli: ცივი ცვარი ცვივა ციდან, სცივა, სცივა ციდა ცინდალს. ცხიკდა ცხიკო აცემინებს, ციცქნა ცხვირი გაუცივდა.)

 The dentist that drew the teeth out of swollen jaws outside, let the teeth, that had fallen to pieces fall into a pool, because he was pinched.
(Turkish: Dışarıda şişmiş çenelerden diş çeken dişçi, çimdiklerdiği için didik didik dişleri su birikintisine düşürdü.)

 Never give grandpa opium, because opium kills grandpa
(German: Gib niemals Opi Opium, denn Opium bringt Opi um.)

 Lady Tailor, are you crying because the hen laid an egg on the dress you made that is lying on the bed? (Akwa=Bed, Akwa=Dress, Akwa=Crying, Akwa=Egg, ikwa-akwa=to make dresses, ikwa-akwa=to cry, iyi-akwa=to lay eggs)
(Igbo or Ibo: Nwanyi n'akwa akwa, ina-akwa akwa na okuko yili akwa nenu akwa ikwalakwa di nenu akwa?)

 In wall decayed, a hole was made. A rat inside a cat espied. The rat then fled, the cat then sped, the rat was caught.
(French: Mur pourrit, trou s'y fit, rat s'y mit; chat l'y vit, rat s'enfuit; chat suivit, rat fut pris.)

 As time passed, the wall decayed, a hole appeared in which a rat settled; A cat saw it, the rat fled, the cat followed, the rat was caught.
(French: Temps passa, mur usa, creux s'y fit, rat s'y mit; chat l'y vit, rat s'enfuit; chat suivit, rat fut pris.)

 If saws were seeing saws sawing, then saws would see saws sawing
(Dutch: Als zagen zagen zagen zagen zagen zagen zagen zagen.)

 What a weather, I almost fly of the road, I could better be in the storage, packing boxes, I see a lot of flying flies but there is no bee there.
(Dutch: Wat een weer weer, ik waai bijna van de weg weg, ik kon beter in het magazijn zijn, pakken pakken, ik zie een heleboel vliegen vliegen maar er is geen een bij bij.)

 Because of the clatter of hoofs dust flies over the field.
(Russian: От топота копыт пыль по полю летит.)

 A madman was on the train, sitting next to him was a guard, the madman was pleased, because sitting next to him was a guard.
(Hungarian: A vonaton egy őrült, mellette egy őr ült, örült az őrült, hogy mellette egy őr ült.)


 Because of the clatter of hoofs dust flies over the field.
(Russian: От топота копыт пыль по полю летит.)

 This year the corn has come out green in our field. (To be said many times)
(Basque, Euskara or Euskera: Aurten gure ortuan artoa berde erne da.)

 Because of the clatter of hoofs dust flies over the field.
(Russian: От топота копыт пыль по полю летит.)

 The dirty flying fish fly after the bird.
(Dutch: De vliegende vieze vis vliegt de vogel achterna.)

 If six hundred serrated knives cut six hundred six sausages in six, the kitchen is dirty.
(French: Si six cents couteaux-scies scient, en six, six cent six saucisses, la cuisine est sale.)

 If six hundred saws saw six hundred sausages, six hundred six saws will saw six hundred six [large] sausages
(French: Si six cent scies scient six cent saucisses, six cent six scies scieront six cent six saucissons)

 Don't have one hundred roubles, but have one hundred friends.
(Russian: Не имей сто рублей, а имей сто друзей.)

 The enemy of my enemy is my friend.
(French: L'ennemi de mon ennemi est mon ami.)

 Friend buy me a coconut. Friend, I don't buy coconut, since the one who eats little coconut buys little coconut. Because I eat little coccnut I buy little coconut.
(Spanish: Compadre, cómprame un coco. Compadre, coco no compro, que el que poco coco come, poco coco compra. Yo como poco coco como poco coco compro.)

 Down a ladder went a bifigafa with seven little bifigafos. A little bifigafo fell down. Because she went to get the little bifigafo, the bifigafa fell down.
(Spanish: Por una ladera abajo iba una bifigafa con siete bifigafitos. Se cayó un bifigafito. Por ir a coger al bifigafito se cayó la bifigafa.)

 The rich women of the parish doesn't wear wig because she regrets.
(Catalan: La rica de la parròquia no duu perruca perquè li raca.)

 Because godfathers asked for the roast, we roasted turkey for the godfathers. Could offer turkey-roast to the godfathers, because we had roasted turkey - like the godfathers had requested.
(German: Weil die Paten um den Braten baten,
taten Puten wir den Paten braten.
konnten Paten Putenbraten bieten,
weil wir Puten - wie die Paten baten - brieten.)

 Buddy, buy few grey capes, because one who buys few grey capes, few grey capes spends. I bought a few grey capes, and few grey cape I spent.
(Portuguese: Compadre compre pouca capa parda porque quem pouca capa parda compra pouca capa parda gasta. Eu pouca capa parda comprei e pouca capa parda gastei.)

 How much sand can a man eat on all the days of a week if on each day of the week a man can eat half a kilo of sand?
(Hebrew: KAMA CHOL YACHOL ADAM LE'ECOL BECHOL YEMOT HACHOL IM BECHOL YOM CHOL YACHOL ADAM LE'ECHOL CHETZI KILO CHOL?)

 A pastry chef who made pastries at the house of a tapestry maker who papered, said one day to the tapestry maker who papered: is it better to make pastries at a tapestry maker's who papers or to paper at a pastry chef's who makes pastries.
(French: Un pâtissier qui pâtissait chez un tapissier qui tapissait, dit un jour au tapissier qui tapissait: vaut-il mieux pâtisser chez un tapissier qui tapisse ou tapisser chez un pâtissier qui pâtisse?)

 Lord of Camels, You made me a camel in the first place. The slow mind of a camel can't compete with You. Your plan placed the camel-drinking pond far away last year. But you would be wrong, thinking, your old believer is blaming you, forgetting your great name. No! Take my camel soul shortly away. Since not having drunk from an earthly bucket, the sufferings of your camel are drawn to an end. By this, the camel breathed his last breath. (from a poem by Romhanyi Jozsef)
(Hungarian: Tevék ura! Te tevél tevévé engem eleve,  Teveled nem ér fel tevefej tétova veleje.
  Te terved veté a tevevedelő tavat tavaly távol,  de tévednél, vélvén,  vén híved neved feledve
  elvetemedve  vádol.
  Nem! Vidd te tevelelkem hovatovább tova,  mivel levet - vert vederbe
  feltekerve - nem vedelve  lett betelve  a te tevéd szenvedelme.
  Te nevedbe  legyen eme  neveletlen tevetetem  eltemetve!
)

 If it snowed here, we would ski.
(Portuguese: Se cá nevasse, fazia-se cá esqui.)

 If the archbishop of Costantinople would like to un-archbishop-of-constantinopolize himself, would you un-archbishop-of-constantinopolize yourself, to un-archbishop-of-constantinopolize him?
(Italian: Se l'arcivescovo di Costantinopoli, si volesse disarcivescoviscostantipolizzare, vi arcivescoviscostantinopolizzereste voi, per disarcivescoviscostantinopolizzare lui?)

 Our sugar canes broke our sugar canes' basket. Could your sugar canes brake your sugar canes' basket like our sugar canes did?
(Arabic: kasab afasna kasar afas asabna ye2dar asab afaskom yeksar afas asabkom zay ma asab afasna kasar afas asabna?)

 Why, cut it off! Going on like this: you irritate me, you irritate him/her, and you irritate yourself!
(Italian: Ma smettila un po'! Facendo così... Ti m'iriti mi. Ti l'iriti le e ti t'iriti ti!)

 If you go with Jesuits, you are not going with Jesus.
(Latin: Si itis cum Iesuitis, non cum Iesu itis.)

 Where are you going? To the cinema. To see what? "Quo Vadis?" What does it mean? Where are you going? ...
(Italian: Ndo vai?Al cinema.A vede che? "Quo Vadis?"E che vo rdi?
Ndo vai?Al cinema.A vede che? "Quo Vadis?" ...)

 Sister Sarah, didn't you stopped by last night to see how the meat is being salted?
(Romanian: Soră Sară, n-ai sărit asară să vezi carnea cum se sară?)

 Osip is howling, Arkhip isn't stopping - who will howl louder than the other. Osip fell asleep. Arkhip became hoarse.
(Russian: Осип орёт, Архип не отстаёт - кто кого переорёт. Осип осип, Архип охрип.)

 Such six as we five are, can't be found among four, because we three are the two only ones. German: Solche sechs wie wir fünf gibt es keine vier weil wir drei die zwei einzigen sind. Bayrische logik :-)
(German: Soiche sechse wia mia fünfe gibt's koane viere weil mia drei die zwoa oanzigen san.)

 Family dispute among slivovits slurping, top, twistung and perspirating twittering sisters.
(German: Geschwisterzwist zwischen Slivovic schlürfenden, spitzen, twistenden und schwitzenden Zwitscherschwestern.)

 From the top of the sky, falls the crane's egg, smashes five pieces of marble, marble with black paint, black marble.
(Greek, Modern: Από τα ύψη τ΄ ουρανού
πέφτει τ΄ αυγό του γερανού,
τσακίζει πέντε μάρμαρα,
μαρμαρομαυρομάρμαρα, μαυρομάρμαρα.)

 Overthere, there is a raven. It has a bald, large black beak. German: Dort drüben ist eine Krähe. Es hat einen kahlen, dicken und schwarzen Schnabel.
(Turkish: Şu karşıda bir karga var. Ne anam kuru kaba kara gagagı var.)

 Literal Translation: "Arepo the sower holds the wheels at work."

The literal translation signifies nothing. This was an acrostic puzzle used by the early church in Rome. At its centre is a cross formed by the vertical and horizontal intersection of the word "TENET", which translates into English as belief or ideology. This is the first level of the cryptogram: belief in the cross of Jesus.

There is, however, another, deeper, level to the puzzle. The whole thing unwraps into a large single-stranded cross consisting of the word "APATERNOSTERO" in both the vertical and horizontal directions, intersecting in the letter "N". There are no letters left over. The word "PATERNOSTER" (Our Father) was not exclusively Christian, being used by the Romans to refer to their god Jupiter, and sometimes to the Emperor. However, the positioning of the "A" at the front and the "O" at the back, tie it uniquely to Christianity. "A" and the "O" signify the Greek letters Alpha (Α) and Omega (Ω), the beginning and the end, a phrase used by Jesus to communicate the infinite nature of the existence of the one and true God. So this deeper level represents God ("Our Father") stretched between the beginning (A) and the end (O) of creation, and again formed into the shape of the cross of Jesus. Explanation by Steve Cathcart

(Latin: Sator arepo tenet opera rotas.)

 (A) Roman knight attacked Rome. He robbed and rumbled in the gardens of Rome. How many R are there in that?

(Icelandic: Rómversku riddari réðist inn í Rómaborg. Rændi þar og ruplaði, rabbabara og rófum. Hvað eru mörg R í því?)

 R with R cigar, R with R barrel, swift roll the wagons carrying sugar to the train.
(Spanish: Erre con erre cigarro erre con erre barril Rápido ruedan los carros cargados de azúcar al ferrocarril.)

 The stupid Doffels The fat stupid Doffel carried the thin stupid Doffel through the deep thick village dirt. Whereupon the thin stupid Doffel thanked the fat stupid Doffel that the fat stupid Doffel carried the thin stupid Doffel through the deep thick village dirt.
(German: Die dummen Doffel)

 The fat priest ate thick lentil soup. Why, fat priest, did you eat thick lentil soup?
(Greek, Modern: Ο παπάς ο παχύς έφαγε παχιά φακή. Γιατί, παπά παχύ, έφαγες παχιά φακή;)

 In (Mr) Niwa's garden, two chickens suddenly ate a crocodile.
(Japanese: Niwa no niwa ni wa, niwa no niwatori wa niwaka ni wani wo tabeta.)

 Two bakers would like to get two blue pictures.
(Hungarian: Két pék két szép kék képet kér.)

 I would have liked to see you dare and remain standing and looking!
(Dutch: Ik zou jou wel eens hebben willen zien durven blijven staan kijken!)

 How do you want me to like you if the one I want to like me doesn't like me as I want him to like me. French: Comment veux-tu que je t'aime si celui que je veux qui m'aime ne m'aime pas comme je voudrais qu'il m'aime.
(Spanish: Cómo quieres que te quiera si el que quiero que me quiera no me quiere como quiero que me quiera.)

 The plants from my kitchen garden - leek, radishes, peppermint, estragon. If I like them, why don't you like them. German: Die (Küchen)kräuter meines Gartens - Porree (Lauch), Radieschen. Pfefferminz, Estragon, wenn sie mir gefallen, warum gefallen sie dir nicht.
(Georgian or Kartveli: ჩემი ბაღის მწვანილი, პრასა, ბოლოკი, პიტნა, ტარხუნა-თუკი მე მეპრას, მებოლოკ, მეპიტნატარხუნება, შენ რატომ არ გეპრას, გებოლოკ, გეპიტნატარხუნება.)

 Grey sparrow, why do you chatter away? Because I'm the king's grey sparrow chatterer.
(Portuguese: Pardal Pardo porque palras?Palro e palrarei, porque sou o pardal pardo, palrador de el-rei!)

 I'm eating meatballs. Suddenly it knocks. I look, gape and wonder. Suddenly it (the door) opens. And who is standing there? It's me.
(German: Ick esse Klops
uff eenmal klopt's
ick kicke, staune, wunda mir
uff eenmal jeet se uff, die Tür.
Ick geh' raus und kicke,
wer steht draussen?
Icke.)

 I'm wetting my elbows, my elbows are getting wet, am I wetting my elbows?
I'm wetting my elbows, my elbows are getting wet, would you be able to say it?
(French: J'mouille mes coudes,
mes coudes s'mouillent,
est-ce que j'mouille mes coudes?
J'mouille mes coudes,
mes coudes s'mouillent,
saurais-tu le dire?)

 I'm looking for Serge.
(French: Je cherche Serge.)

 Grey sparrow, why do you chatter away? Because I'm the king's grey sparrow chatterer.
(Portuguese: Pardal Pardo porque palras? 
Palro e palrarei, porque sou o pardal pardo, palrador d'el Rei!)

 Grey sparrow, why do you chatter away? Because I'm the king's grey sparrow chatterer.
(Portuguese: Pardal Pardo porque palras?Palro e palrarei, porque sou o pardal pardo, palrador de el-rei!)

 I died because I needed some ointment for my wounds and I did not get it. I died because I yearned for my beloved and I could not get her.
(Hindi: mar ham bi gaye, marham ke liye, marham na mila.
ham dam se gaye, hamdam ke liye, hamdam na mila)

 When (you) go up the mountain to get bamboo to make a shed (you) need to watch for flood water.
(Vietnamese: Lúc nào lên núi lấy nứa về làm  lán nên lưu ý nước lũ.)

 Can you tell me where you are going?
(Italian: Me diì 'ndù nd'é?)

 The green worm is going towards the green glass.
(French: Le ver vert va vers le verre vert.)

 Little girl with your beautiful mouth do you have to go along with your Mum?
(Dutch: Meisje met je mooie mondje moet je met je maatje mee?)

 He knocked on the door He said, "Who?" He said, "Amin" He said, "What's your problem?" He said, "The old woman" He said, "What's her problem?" He said, "She's dead" He said, "Really?!" He said, "Really" He said, "Follow me!" He said, "Let's go!
(Arabic: Daq al-bab Kaloo, "Mean?" Kaloo, "Amin" Kaloo, "Malak?" Kaloo, "l-hajji" Kaloo, "Malha?" Kaloo, "Mawtat" Kaloo, "Balla?!" Kaloo, "Walla." Kaloo, "Hakni!" Kaloo, "Yalla!)

 "Nice singing! An alt hisses for a long time," said uncle.
(Dutch: "Mooie zang! 'N alt sist lang na," zei oom.)

 We long for 88 beautiful nights by 88 beautiful canals.
(Dutch: Wij smachten naar achtentachtig prachtige nachten bij achtentachtig prachtige grachten.)

 Black cat's long, thick cheeks.
(Finnish: Mustan kissan pitkät, paksut posket.)

 Five dogs chase six cats.
(French: Cinq chiens chassent six chats.)

 Five sacks of dry woods dried by sunlight in the attic are valued at home too.
(Lombard: Hich hach de hoch hech hecacc al hul höl höl è car aca a ca.)

 Five caterpillers stuck on the side of a hill.
(Mizo, Lushai or Lusei: Tlang panga pangang panga bet.)

 Five sacks of dry woods dried by sunlight in the attic are valued at home too.
(Lombard: Hich hach de hoch hech hecacc al hul höl höl è car aca a ca.)

 I go to wood and I look for mistletoe, and I live by mistletoe I look for. Spanish: Voy al bosque a por muérdago, y vivo del muérdago que busco en el bosque.
(Catalan: Vaig al bosc i busco vesc i visc del vesc que busco al bosc.)

 If it is sunny Milá turns over. Spanish: Si hace sol Milá se revuelca. Frase construida con los nombres de las notas musicales.
(Catalan: Si fa sol Milá redòla.)

 The beardless Spaniards on canvas were painting a Spanish army in panic.
(Greek, Modern: Οι σπανοί Ισπανοί εις πανί εζωγράφισαν ισπανικόν στρατόν εις πανικόν.)

 In which inkpot does Tony have ink? Spanish: En que tintero tiene tinta Antonio. Juego de palabras con sonidos que imitan una campana
(Catalan: En quin tinter te tinta en Ton?)

 On my knees quince I gathered; On my knees I gathered quince. Spanish: Arrodillado membrillos cogía, arrodillado cogía membrillos.
(Catalan: De genollons codonys collia, de genollons collia codonys.)

 Beneath a red wine barrel there is a spotted hen; when the red wine barrel leaks, the spotted hen clucks.
Spanish: Debajo de una barrica de vino tinto hay una gallina moteada; cuando la barrica de vino tinto gotea, la gallina moteada cacarea.
(Galician: Debaixo dunha pipa tinta hai unha pita pinta; cando a pipa tinta pinga, a pita pinta pia.)

 This fool never should drink wine, a short and dumb life he will live if he drinks.
(Spanish: Ese bobo vino nunca beber debe, vida boba y breve vivirá si bebe.)

 Kumaran, the son of Kuppusamy who lives in Kundur, poked the backside of a horse that was bathing in a pool. The horse could not stop jumping.
(Tamil: Kundooril kudiyirukkum Kuppusamiyin Kumaran Kuppan, Kulathhil Kulithhuk-kondirukkum Kuthirayin Kundiyai Kuchhiyaal Kuthhinaan. Kuthirai Kuthiyo Kuthiyendru Kuthithathu.)

 Our caretaker's name is Mouse. Most of the time he lives in the cellar. People say he shags/steals.
(German: Unser Hausmeister
Maus heißt er
Im Keller meist haust er
Wie es heißt maust er.)

 People whose sound to be shrunk in Shemsi Pasha shopping arcade (?).
(Turkish: Şemsi Paşa pasajı'nda sesi büzüşesiceler.)

 Who ate the rum omelet? Cosaks, equal in beauty, smoking like Swiss people and strong at their post.
(French: Quies qui jam angelum laetorum? Sed equos ac ego ambo te, fumans cum de suis et solido post.
"Qui est-ce qui a mangé l'omelette au rhum? C'est des cosaques, égaux en beauté, fumant comme des suisses et solides au poste.")

 - When you Catalans speak, it seems like you break nuts. - Do you think I believe you?
(Catalan: - Els catalans parlant sembla que trenqueu nous. - Que te creus que te crec?)

 Good evening miss, what a beautiful evening this evening is, if tomorrow evening is a beautiful evening like this one, what a beautiful evening tomorrow evening will be.
(Italian: Buonasera signorina, che bea sera che l'è stasera, se doman de sera l'è na bea sera come stasera che bea sera che l'è doman de sera.)

 The white cranes are spreading (their wings) wide sitting on the sand in the evening.
(Assamese: Bogakoi Bogoli Boholai Bohise Bolukat Biyoli Bela.)

 Uncle Adam seeing a peacock with wide open mouth shaking its leg also turns into a peacock.

(Hungarian: Ádám bátyámpávát látvánszáját tátvánlábát rázvánpávává vált.)

 Uncle Fritz is fishing for fresh fish
(German: Onkel Fritz fischt frische Fische.)

 Fishermen that go fishing for fish and fishermen who fish often catch flounders. The fish that the fishing fishermen fish for, find fishermen that go fishing annoying and beastly.
(Dutch: Vissende vissers die vissen naar vissen, maar vissende vissers die vangen vaak bot. De vis waar de vissende vissers naar vissen vindt vissende vissers vervelend en rot.)

 Walking unsteady over the field, going towards home, wearing nothing but socks on your feet and eat a salami.

(Norwegian: RaLejaLe hemmat i høssølæssom å naumøLa spikkjipørse.)

 The socks of the archduchess are they dry? Extra dry!
(French: Les chaussettes de l'archiduchesse sont-elles sèches? Archi-sèches!)

 That was close, said the priest, when the priest's horse stepped on the sock of the priest.
(Norwegian: Det var nesten, sa presten, da hesten til presten tråkket på lesten til presten.)

 I say that you told Didi what I said Thursday.
(French: Je dis que tu l'as dit à Didi ce que j'ai dit jeudi.)

 She/he said tell her/him if she/he told her/him,she/he said that I told her/him to tell her/him!
(Albanian: Thuaj tha m'i thënë a i ka thënë thuaj,tha i kam thënë thuaj m'i thënë!)

 When you tell stories count how many
(Spanish: Cuando cuentes cuentos, cuenta cuantos cuentos cuentas, cuando cuentes cuentos.)

 When you tell tales, count how many tales you are telling, because if you don't count the tales that you are telling, you won´t know how many tales you are telling.
(Spanish: Cuando cuentes cuentos, cuenta cuantos cuentos cuentas por que si no cuentas los cuentos que cuentas no sabrás cuantos cuentos cuentas.)

 Chandu's wise uncle fed a tasty pickle of tamarind to chandu's wicked aunt four times by polished silver spoon in the Chandni-chowk of Chalisgaon town.
(Marathi: )

 a town in Poland
(Polish: Ołdrzychowice Kłodzkie)

 333 horsemen rode 333 times round the large round Rastenburger town hall.
(German: Dreihundertdreiunddreissig Reiter ritten dreihundertdreiunddreissig mal um das grosse runde Rastenburger Rathaus.)

 The shops in our town were close when we still opened ours.
(Indonesian: Toko-toko di kota kita tutup ketika kita tetap buka toko kita.)

 Open the cabinet and take the spirit, set down the spirit and close the cabinet. Italian: Apri lo stipetto e prendi l'alcool, posa l'alcool e chiudi lo stipetto.
(Italian: Rapa u stipu e pia u spiritu, posa u spiritu e chiuda u stipu.)

 Italian: Ti do una testata e ti riduco la testa come un cavolo rapa.
(Sardinian: Ti dongu unu corp''e conca e ti fatzu sa conca comenti unu calieconca.)

 Shall I jump on your back or shall I mount by jumping?
Italian: Ti salto in spalla o ti monto a saltelli?
(Sardinian: Ti brinco a coddos o ti coddo a brincos?)

 At Kumbakonam monkeys were pricked by stick so the monkeys jumped into the pond and rejoiced.
(Tamil: Kumbakonathil kurangugal kuchiyal kuthiyathal kurangugal kulathil kubirena kuthithu kumalmittana.)

 The goat jumps on the stone. The stone splits in four. May the goat's head split as the stone splits in four.
(Romanian: Capra neagră-n piatră sare. Piatra crapă-n patru. Crapă capul caprei negre precum piatra crapă-n patru.)

 John is splitting hard wood behind the high house.
(German: Hinter'm hohen Haus hackt Hans hartes Holz. Hartes Holz hackt Hans hinter'm hohen Haus.)

 The magpie nests high. The goose nests low. The owl nests neither high nor low.
(French: La pie niche en haut,L'oie niche en bas,L'hibou niche ni haut ni bas.)

 A magpie sat on the fence (of felled trees), picking frozen (mountain) cranberries under the snow.
(Norwegian: Det satt ei skattu på hafeilla å plukka tælla tyting onde sjoggen.)

 The snake picked some cherries.
(Jersey: La tchilieuvre a tchilyi tchiques tchoeurs.)

 I went to the sea to pick shoelaces. I came from the the sea, shoelaces I picked.
(Portuguese: Fui ao mar colher cordões, vim do mar cordões colhi.)

 The (kavros?) was licking eggs behind an asfaka (plant). I went to hide a big flask and I ordered the asfaka: asfaka keep an eye on the flask.
(Greek, Modern: Ο καβρός αυγά'γλειφεαπό πίσω από μια σφάκα πήγα κέκρυψα μια φλάσκα και παράγγειλα της σφάκας, σφάκα βλέπε μου τη φλάσκα.)

 The King of Clinking Plates went to buy some plain plates; So in Clinking Plates he didn't get plain plates. If he went to buy plain plates away from his homeplace Clinking plates.

(Maltese: Ir-re ta’ Batti Platti,
mar biex jixtri l-platti catti;
mela f'Batti Platti m'andux platti catti
biex mar jixtri l-platti catti
bod minn artu Batti Platti.)

 Grey sparrow, why do you chatter away? Because I'm the king's grey sparrow chatterer.
(Portuguese: Pardal Pardo porque palras?Palro e palrarei, porque sou o pardal pardo, palrador de el-rei!)

 In Germany a square's been dekrauted, because a mine has exploded.
(Dutch: In Duitsland is een plein ontmoft, want er is een mijn ontploft.)

 A madman was on the train, sitting next to him was a guard, the madman was pleased, because sitting next to him was a guard.
(Hungarian: A vonaton egy őrült, mellette egy őr ült, örült az őrült, hogy mellette egy őr ült.)

 I enter a train with wheat with you, a train with wheat I enter with you.
(Spanish: Contigo entro un tren con trigo un tren con trigo contigo entro.)

 Through a Przemysl (a city in south eastern Poland) wheat (field) came a smuggled (bootleg) through a pass of wheat prioress of a leading order.
(Polish: Przez przemyską pszenicę przeszła przemycona przez przaśną przełęcz przeorysza przedniego zakonu.)

 The (kavros?) was licking eggs behind an asfaka (plant). I went to hide a big flask and I ordered the asfaka: asfaka keep an eye on the flask.
(Greek, Modern: Ο καβρός αυγά'γλειφεαπό πίσω από μια σφάκα πήγα κέκρυψα μια φλάσκα και παράγγειλα της σφάκας, σφάκα βλέπε μου τη φλάσκα.)

 Thievish parakeet
got into a hat.
The hat was made of hay,
He got into a box.
The box was made of cardboard,
He got into a big box.
The big box was made of pine,
and he got into a cucumber.
The cucumber matured,
and the parakeet escaped.
(Spanish: Periquito, el bandolero,
se metió en un sombrero,
El sombrero era de paja,
Se metió en una caja,
La caja era de cartón,
Se metió en un cajón,
El cajón era de pino,
y se metió en un pepino,
El pepino maduró,
y Periquito se salvó.)

 She says she's got hot flush and she says she's sweating a lot during the night. German>/EM>: Eine große Hitze, sagt sie, habe sie und in der Nacht so schwitzen müsse sie, sagt sie, würde sie.
(German: A großa Hitze, saedse, häbse und in d'r Nacht so schwitza miaßtse, saedse, dädse.)

 A feather was found on the work bench in the night. German: Eine Feder wurde auf dem Arbeitstisch in der Nacht gefunden.
(Finnish: Höyhen löytyi yöllä työpöydältä.)

 This is a log. This is a log. A finely spliced log sent by Miss Meissner from Neisse and she lets say quite finely, that her husband is a busy log-splicer, who at night - before eating or biting anything - would have spliced a lot of logs.
(German: Dies ist ein Scheit. Dies ist ein Scheit. Es ist ein feingesplissner Spleißenscheit, den schickt Frau Meissner aus Neiße und läßt dazu sagen gar fein, daß ihr Mann ein fleißiger Scheitspleißer sei, der am Abend - ehe er etwas gegessen oder gebissen - hätte viele Scheite gesplissen.)

 Did you already know that it can lead to irritations for listeners when in a speech "Walzwerke" (rolling mills) and "Waldzwerge" (forest dwarfs) are mentioned, as it is phonetically not quite easy to distinguish whether this is about Walzwerke or Waldzwerge. Thank God it is relatively rare that a Waldzwerg visits a Walzwerk or a Walzwerk is set up in the surroundings of Waldzwerge. If, however, a Waldzwerg builds a Walzwerk, this is would be a Waldzwergwalzwerk (forest dwarf rolling mill). If he also works in it, he is obviously a Walzwerkwaldzwerg (rolling mill forest dwarf).
(German: Wußten sie schon, daß wenn in Reden von Walzwerken und Waldzwergen die Rede ist, es zu Irritationen beim Hörer führt, da es phonetisch nicht ganz leicht ist zu unterscheiden, ob es sich um Walzwerke oder Waldzwerge handelt. Gott sei Dank, ist es aber relativ selten, das ein Waldzwerg ein Walzwerk besucht oder Walzwerke in der Umgebung der Waldzwerge erbaut werden. wenn allerdings Waldzwerg ein Walzwerk baut, handelt es sich demzufolge um ein Waldzwergwalzwerk. Wenn dieser dann auch noch darin arbeitet ist es dann offensichtlich ein Walzwerkwaldzwerg.)

 Fear of fruit flesh leads to flight from fruit flesh.
(German: Furcht vor Fruchtfleisch führt zu Flucht vor Fruchtfleisch.)

 Freshly picked fruit the fruit picker picks fresh.
The fruit picker picks freshly picked fruit.
(German: Pflückfrische Früchte pflückt frisch der Früchtepflücker.
Der Früchtepflücker pflückt pflückfrische Früchte.)

 The old pioneer is sure to become hungry if he forgets to bring nutmeg fruits.
(Indonesian: Pelopor tua pula bakal lapar apabila lupa bawa buah pala.)

 Who knows where William Wouter lives? William Wouter lives where warm water becomes wine. Who knows where warm water becomes wine? Warm water becomes wine where west winds blow. Who knows where west winds blow? West winds blow where Wies washes clothes.
(Afrikaans: Wie weet waar Willem Wouter woon? Willem Wouter woon waar warm water wyn word.)

 Twenty green worms drinking wine upside-down from a glass made of glass during winter.
(French: Vingt vers verts buvant du vin, à l'envers dans un verre en verre pendant l'hiver.)

 Behind my house there is an umbu tree giving fruit. Green umbu, ripe umbu, dry umbu, drying umbu.
(Portuguese: Lá de trás de minha casa Tem um pé de umbu butando Umbu verde, umbu maduro, Umbu seco, umbu secando.)

 Water your cactus, otherwise it will dry up!
(German: Giess dei Kakdus, sonst verderrterder!)

 The horseherd from Csetnek water on the river Tisza. There is a tinkling bell made of earthenware on the neck of the silent horse of the pretty horseherd from Csetnek.
(Hungarian: Itat a csetneki csikós a Tiszán.Sárga cserépből csinált csengő csenga csinos csetneki csikóscsöndes csikaja nyakán.)

 Belmira Barbara Bras Bahian bordadeira, embroidered in a boat beautiful white blouse, approaches the boat in a small boat, baritone voice Brejeiro, Bertoldo Barreto Brito, and says to Belmira: "Bravo, lovely, pretty blouse"
(Portuguese: Belmira Barbara Bras bordadeira baiana, bordava num barco bela blusa branca, aborda o barco num bote, o barítono Brejeiro, Bertoldo Barreto Brito, e brada a Belmira: "Bravo, beleza, bonita blusa!")

 Bright white stone, brighter than the sun.
(Greek, Modern: Άσπρη πέτρα ξέξασπρη κι απ' τον ήλιο ξεξασπρότερη.)

 For me is not important that the sun shines. Wordplay with the musical scores.
(Catalan: A mi si que re m'hi fa que faci sol.)

 The shining of the moon already seemed nice.
(German: Der Mondschein schien schon schön.)

 Today already is yesterday, and yesterday is today, the day has already arrived and today is today.
(Spanish: Hoy ya es ayer y ayer ya es hoy, ya llegó el dia, y hoy es hoy.)

 One night, yesterday night there was unrest in the city of Sham (Damascus). The glasses were scared and wet themselves so much that they broke up into 6660 pieces.
(Persian or Farsi: Shab shabi dishab shabi da shahre sham ashub shod. shishehgar shashido as shashash shisheha shish hesaro sheshsado shast tikke shod.)

 A feather was found on the work bench in the night. German: Eine Feder wurde auf dem Arbeitstisch in der Nacht gefunden.
(Finnish: Höyhen löytyi yöllä työpöydältä.)

 Anticipation of the thundery night
(Estonian: Koueööaimdus)

 Travelling hyenas during the night. Travelling hyenas during the day.
(Wolof: Tuki fuki buki gudi Tuki fuki buki becheck)

 These days can't be called cold, they should be called hot.

(Swedish: Dessa dagar kan man inte kalla kalla, de borde heta heta.)

 The feeling you'll experience when you splash hot water on the stove in the sauna.
(Finnish: Löylyn lyömä)

 Water your cactus, otherwise it will dry up!
(German: Giess dei Kakdus, sonst verderrterder!)

 On the bridge of Rapperswil there are three thin, dry, long, empty, hollow tubes, and through these three thin, dry, long, empty, hollow tubes people lern to speak properly. German: Auf der Rapperswiler Brücke (am Züricher See) stehen drei dünne, dürre, lange, leere, hohle Röhrchen, und durch diese drei dünnen, dürren, langen, leeren, hohlen Röhren lernen die Leute richtig sprechen.
(German: Uf de Rapperswiler Brugg schtönd drü dünni, dürri, langi, lääri, hohli Röhrli, und dur die drü dünne dürre, lange, lääre, hohle Röhrli lehred d'Lüüt rächt rede.)

 Four thousand four hundred eighty-four frogs are croaking below the bridge.
(Avar or Avaric: ункъазаралда ункънуcиялда ункъоялда ункъо къверкъ къвакъвалебуго кьода гъоркь)

 One, two, three, four, five, scythe, bran, ripe, crow, arm, spark, shot, bang
(Basque, Euskara or Euskera: Baga, biga, higa, laga, boga, sega, zahi, zohi, bele, harma, zixpa, tiro, punp)

 A big face has a pimple. 
Two pimples grow on a face. 
A big face has three pimples. 
Four pimples grow on a face.
(Vietnamese: Mặt mập mọc một mụt mụn bọc
Hai mụt mụn bọc mọc mặt mập
Mặt mập mọc ba mụt mụn bọc
Bốn  mụt mụn bọc mọc mặt mập)

 Two men that load shop blinds in front of a chocolate shop blind, invite shop-blind girls to dinner.
(German: Zwei Männer, die vor einem Schokoladenladenladen Ladenladen laden, laden Ladenladenmädchen zum Essen ein.)

 It is "le la". Two articles (Lojban has a separate article for proper names) quoted twice. Lojban distinguishes whether the string being quoted is grammatically complete.
(Loglan or Lojban: lo'u lu le la li'u le'u)

 One a tied knot, two tie a knot, three a tied knot, four tie a knot, ...
(Vietnamese: Một nút thắt, hai thắt nút, ba nút thắt, bốn thắt nút, ...)

 Lulu read the letter read to Lili, and Lola went to Lille where Lala ties the lilac.
(French: Lulu lit la lettre lue à Lili et Lola alla à Lille où Lala lie le lilas.)

 I went to Lione collecting cotton, I came running collecting cotton.
(Italian: Andavo a Lione cogliendo cotone, tornavo correndo cotone cogliendo.)

 The salesmen went to Deventer and then man was there.
(Dutch: De venter ging naar Deventer, toen was de vent er.)

 Prokop came - the dill is cooking, Propok went - the dill is cooking. With Prokop the dill cooks, an without Prokop the dill cooks.
(Russian: Пришёл Прокоп - кипит укроп, Ушёл Прокоп - кипит укроп; И при Прокопе кипит укроп, и без Прокопа кипит укроп.)

 We cooked our dish in your kitchen.
(Arabic: Tabakhna fi matbahkum tabkhatna.)

 While doing the dishes the ash-tray fell into the sink.
(Dutch: Onder de afwas viel de asbak in de afwasbak.)

 Seven swans swam in the Zuiderzee (southern sea), they could see the sun sink and that was a beautiful sight.
(Dutch: Er zwommen zeven zwanen al in de Zuiderzee, ze konden de zon in zee zien zinken en dat was een zalig gezicht zeg.)

 A fat boar sleeps by the beautiful port of Bordeaux.
(French: Un gros porc dors au bords le beau port du Bordeaux.)

 Jan Janssens will lay Sjakie to sleep in the evening.
(Dutch: Jan Janssens zal s'avonds Sjakie slapen leggen.)

 Understand wisdom by wisdom. Understanding wisdom by being wise is true wisdom. Who does not understand wisdom even after understanding it, He is...what? Unwise.
(Hindi: Samajh samajh ke samajh ko samjho. Samajh samajh ke samajh ko samajhna hi samajh hai. Jo samajh ko samajh kar bhi na samajhe Voh....kya hai? Nasamajh hai.)

 Wax mask, change of measurement ...
(German: Wachsmaske, Messwechsel, Wachsmaske, Messwechsel, Wachsmaske, Messwechsel, ...)

 Sasha walked down the dry street. ...
(Polish: Szedł Sasza suchą szosą, bo gdy susza szosa sucha.)

 Dried meat from a spotted goat.
(Lombard: Chjarn sechja det cháura cechja.)

 A goat climbed upon a stone, so that the stone broke in four pieces; May the goat's head break in four as the stone broke in four. German: Die Ziege ist auf den Stein gestiegen, so ist der Stein in vier Teile gebrochen; So wie der Stein soll auch der Kopf der Ziege in vier Teile brechen.
(Romanian: S-a suit capra pe piatra si a spart-o-n patru, de s-ar sparge capul caprei ca si piatra-n patru.)

 The goat walks on the stone.
The stone breaks in four.
I wish the goat's head would break,
As did the stone in four.

(Romanian: Capra calca piatra.
Piatra crapa-n patru.
Crapa-i-ar capul caprei
Cum a crapat piatra-n patru.)

 I'm wetting my elbows, my elbows are getting wet, am I wetting my elbows?
I'm wetting my elbows, my elbows are getting wet, would you be able to say it?
(French: J'mouille mes coudes,
mes coudes s'mouillent,
est-ce que j'mouille mes coudes?
J'mouille mes coudes,
mes coudes s'mouillent,
saurais-tu le dire?)

 I'm rubbing a willow.
(Czech: Drbu vrbu.)

 A Greek asked me how many rivers there are in Greece, and I told him that I'm not Greek to tell him how many rivers there are in Greece.
(Czech: Jeden Řek mi řek, kolik je v Řecku řeckých řek a já mu řek, že nejsem Řek, abych mu řek, kolik je v Řecku řeckých řek.)

 If you look for me, I'm not here! Halfcircles are not "C"s.
(Italian: Se mi cerchi non ci sono! Semicerchi non "c" sono.)

 Look at that cow that's going in that house.
(Emilian and Romagnol: Guèrda c'la vacca là c'la và in c'la ca' là.)

 Can you tell me where you are going?
(Italian: Me diì 'ndù nd'é?)

 I say and I know that he says, "go there he says". But he doesn't know that I know that he says, "go there he says.
(Italian: Mi si dise, so dise, che lu dise, va la dise. Ma no lu sa che mi dise che lu dise va la dise.)

 When you tell tales, count how many tales you are telling, because if you don't count the tales that you are telling, you won´t know how many tales you are telling.
(Spanish: Cuando cuentes cuentos, cuenta cuantos cuentos cuentas por que si no cuentas los cuentos que cuentas no sabrás cuantos cuentos cuentas.)

 Our Tony gave me a round fig because I gave him a good berry. You should see our Tony going up the Tintillu hill. 'Hey Ton, give me three tuna fish. Don't give me smelly tuna, give me good tuna, please Ton.'
(Maltese: Toni tagħna tani tina,
Talli tajtu tuta tajba.
Trid tarah lil Toni tagħna
tiela’ it-tela tat-Tintillu.
'Ta’ Toni, tin tlieta tonn.
Tatinix tonn tinten, tin tonn tajjeb,
ta’ Ton.')

 Nine ever-lasting summer coconuts for this child, nine ever-lasting summer coconuts for that child, too.
(Japanese: Kono ko ni tokonatsu no kokonatsu kokonotsu, ano ko nimo tokonatsu no kokonatsu kokonotsu.)

 Because I eat little coconut, I buy little coconut.
(Spanish: Como poco coco como, poco coco compro.)

 Snails are shocked when they lick other snails because for many snails it is shocking that for some snails snails are not tasty.
(German: Schnecken erschrecken wenn sie an Schnecken schlecken denn zum Schrecken vieler Schnecken manche Schnecken, Schnecken nicht schmecken.)

 (?) This is door, where always every one find the right door,after watching many doors, he comes on the door of Heder (Imam Ali´s door).
(Urdu: ye der he wo der, jis der pe seda, mita he her be der ko der, yani der be der, phir ker der der, Aata he heder ke der per)

 I like your husband because your husband always smiles at me.
(Indonesian: Saya suka sama suami situ sebab suami situ suka senyum-senyum sama saya.)

 (?) This is door, where always every one find the right door,after watching many doors, he comes on the door of Heder (Imam Ali´s door).
(Urdu: ye der he wo der, jis der pe seda, mita he her be der ko der, yani der be der, phir ker der der, Aata he heder ke der per)

 Right behind that jar there is a rare spider. The spider scratches the jar as much as the jar scratches the spider.
(Portuguese: Lá atrás daquela jarra tem uma aranha rara. Tanto a aranha arranha a jarra quanto a jarra arranha a aranha.)

 Behind Hermann Hanne´s house a hundred shirts are hanging out. A hundred shirts are hanging out behind Hermann Hanne´s house.
(German: Hinter Hermann Hannes Haus hängen hundert Hemden raus. Hundert Hemden hängen raus, hinter Hermann Hanne´s Haus!)

 Are the archduchess' shirts dry or super dry?
(French: Les chemises de l'archiduchesse sont-elles sèches ou archi-sèches?)

 School boys' dog Latin: "Caesar had some jam for tea, Brutus had a rat. Caesar sick in omnibus, Brutus sick in hat."
(Latin: Caesar adsum iam forte,
Brutus aderat.
Caesar sic in omnibus
Brutus sic inat.)

 Uncle, did your tea get rid of your cough?
(French: Tonton, ton thé t'a-t-il ôté ta toux?)

 Aunt, your tea has cured your cough, said the tortoise to the tattoo. But at all, said the tattoo, I cough so much that you can hear me from Tahiti to Timbuktu.
(French: Tatie, ton thé t'a-t-il ôté ta toux, disait la tortue au tatou. Mais pas du tout, dit le tatou, Je tousse tant que l'on m'entend  de Tahiti à Tombouctou.)

 Chandu's wise uncle fed a tasty pickle of tamarind to chandu's wicked aunt four times by polished silver spoon in the Chandni-chowk of Chalisgaon town.
(Marathi: )

 Nail-toe-cook(n)-older sibling-my grandfather-kok= a word in passing-stiff-bro/sis? Why are my grandfather's brother's cook's toe nails so stiff, Bro?
(Indonesian: Kuku kaki koki kakak kakekku kok kaku-kaku, kak?)

 No, I do not have a grandfather.
(Italian: No, non ho un nonno.)

 Hello, grandfather, do you wish to eat a fowl?
(Latin: Ave ave aves esse aves?)

 Based on traditional legend dedicated to my grandfather Tola Ram who made it posible.
(Hindi: tola ram tala tol ke tel mein tul gaya tula hua tola tale ke tale hue tel mein tala gaya)

 The cap was not sown as a cap. The bell was made not as a bell. The cap needs to be remade. The bell needs to be remade.
(Russian: Сшит коплак не по-колпаковски, вылит колокол не по-колоколовски.
Надо колпак перколпаковать, перевыколпаковать.
Надо колокол переколоколовать, перевыколоколовать.)

 I have a leather wine bottle. Does it hve a cap? It has a cap. Does it have a cap and a stopper? Cap and stopper it has. Spanish: La bota de vino, tiene vino. Tiene tapón? Tapón tiene. Tiene tapón y taponcito? Tapón y taponcito tiene.
(Catalan: La boteta de vi vi té.Té tap?Tap té.Té tap i tapó?Tap i tapó té.)

 Sixty-six bottles are drying on sixty-six streets.
(Bulgarian: Шесдесет и шест шишета се сушат на шестдесет и шест шосета.)

 Şinasi (man's name), that water bottle is your last chance.
(Turkish: Şinasi, şu su şişesi son şansın.)

 In the low water we lazily fished for burbot (a fish), In the low water we lazily fished for tench (a fish). Didn't you kindly ask me for love, The fogs of the estuary have lured me.
(Russian: На мели мы лениво ловили налима. На мели мы лениво ловили линя. О любви не меня ли вы мило молили, Туманы лимана манили меня.)

 In a taxi the dachshund asked the taxi driver about the fare. The taxi driver replied, "The ride for dachshunds is free."
(Russian: Сев в такси спросила такса: "За проезд какая такса?"
А таксист ответил так: "Возим такс мы просто так-с.")

 If your dachshund calls my dachshund a dachhund again, your dachshund will be slapped so hard by my dachshund that he will not be able to say "dachshund" anymore.
(German: Wenn dein Dackel zu mein Dackel noch mal Dackel sagt, kriegt dein Dackel von mein Dackel so eine gedackelt, daß dein Dackel nicht mehr "Dackel" sagen kann.)

 In the road called Kesthur, a fellow named "Kasthur Rangaray" had a wound due to a pistol and got tired and died.
(Kannada or Kanarese: kesthur rastheli kasthur rangarayaru pistul etu tindu susthagi sathbiddru)

 There was once a girl called Barbara.  Barbara had a greengrocery, and she sold rhubarb. Therefore everyone called her Rhubarb Barbara.  Later on she opened a cafe with a bar. It was written on the window: Rhubarb Barbara's Bar. Some wild men, real barbarians, came to visit: the Rhubarb Barbara's Bar Barbarians. Oh, what long beards those men had! They called the beards Rhubarb Barbara's Bar Barbarians' Beards. And the barber who had to trim the beards was the Rhubarb Barbara's Bar Barbarians' Beard
Barber!
(Dutch: Er was eens een meisje, dat heette Barbara. Barbara had een groentenwinkel en verkocht rabarber. Daarom noemden alle mensen dat meisje: Rabarberbarbara. Later begon Barbara een cafe met een bar. Op het raam stond: Rabarberbarbarabar. Daar kwamen wilde mannen op bezoek, echte barbaren: de Rabarberbarbarabarbarbaren. O, wat hadden die mannen lange baarden! Die baarden noemden ze: Rabarberbarbarabarbarbarenbaarden. En de barbier die die lange baarden moest knippen was de: Rabarberbarbarabarbarbarenbaardenbarbier!)

 I saw a bearded hamster. It was lapping syrup. If a hamster is lapping syrup, it will be seized with a hamster-clamp.
(Hungarian: Láttam szőrös hörcsögöt. Éppen szörpöt szörcsögött. Ha a hörcsög szörpöt szörcsög rátörnek a hörcsög görcsök.)

 I saw in the orchard a bloody crow eating the hide of the body of the dead pig.
(Spanish: Yo vi en un huerto un cuervo cruento comerse el cuero del cuerpo del puerco muerto.)

 What a riot it is to see a shrimp smashed on the tie of a dead man in a crevasse.
(French: Que c'est crevant de voir crever une crevette sur la cravate d'un homme crevé dans une crevasse.)

 Our Tony gave me a round fig because I gave him a good berry. You should see our Tony going up the Tintillu hill. 'Hey Ton, give me three tuna fish. Don't give me smelly tuna, give me good tuna, please Ton.'
(Maltese: Toni tagħna tani tina,
Talli tajtu tuta tajba.
Trid tarah lil Toni tagħna
tiela’ it-tela tat-Tintillu.
'Ta’ Toni, tin tlieta tonn.
Tatinix tonn tinten, tin tonn tajjeb,
ta’ Ton.')

 Three chickens round feathered. Three feathered chickens round.
(Spanish: Tres pollos bolos peludos. Tres peludos pollos bolos.)

 How can the feather of peacock belong to a rooster?
(Telugu: Kekeeka kekiki kaaka kaakiki vuntundaa?)

 A starling sat on the starling-house and sang to the rooster: "You cannot sing like I do, I cannot sing like you do!
(Ukrainian: Сів шпак на шпаківню, заспівав шпак півню:
„Ти не вмієш так, як я, - так, як ти, не вмію я!”)

 Who ate the rum omelet? Cosaks, equal in beauty, smoking like Swiss people and strong at their post.
(French: Quies qui jam angelum laetorum? Sed equos ac ego ambo te, fumans cum de suis et solido post.
"Qui est-ce qui a mangé l'omelette au rhum? C'est des cosaques, égaux en beauté, fumant comme des suisses et solides au poste.")

 A black ox ate a raw egg in heaven.
(Irish: D'ith damh dubh ubh amh ar neamh.)

 Raw wheat, raw rice, and raw egg
(Japanese: Nama mugi, nama gome, nama tamago.)

 I have laid one egg every year anyway. German: Ich habe sowieso jedes Jahr ein Ei hinunter gelegt.
(German: I ho eh oe joa a oa oi.)

 Does she always blush at every occasion? German: Errötet sie immer bei jeder Gelegenheit?
(Esperanto: Ĉu ŝi ĉiam ĉe ĉio ruĝiĝas?)

 Twelve muttering speakers say "you" to twelve muttering speakers, which always say "you".
(German: Ein Dutzend nuschelnde Dutzer dutzen nuschelnd dutzende dutzender Nuschler nuschelnd.)

 A drop fell from the sky, plop, on my forehead, plop on my mother's forehead, plop, on my forehead, plop on my mother's forehead, plop, on my forehead, plop on my mother's forehead, ... German: Vom Himmel tropfte ein Tropfen, blub auf meinen Stirn, blub auf den Stirn meiner Mutter, blub auf meinen Stirn, blub auf den Stirn meiner Mutter, ...
(Turkish: Gökten bir damla düstü, sip benim alnıma, sip anamın alnına, sip benim alnıma, sip anamın alnına, sip benim alnıma, sip anamın alnına, ...)

 Fat nieces are composing poetry in thick spruce thicket, ...
(German: Dicke Nichten dichten im dichten Fichtendickicht. Im dichten Fichtendickicht dichten dicke Nichten.)

 kucing=cat, kuning=yellow, kencing=pee, ...
(Indonesian: kucing kuning kencing, kucing kuning kencing, ...)

 One peppercorn in a copper pan, two pepperkorns in a copper pan, two pepperkorns in a copper pan, ...
(Swedish: Ett pepparkorn i en kopparpanna, två pepparkorn i en kopparpanna, tre pepparkorn i en kopparpanna, fyra ..., fem ..., sex ..., sju ..., åtta ..., nio ....)

 One a tied knot, two tie a knot, three a tied knot, four tie a knot, ...
(Vietnamese: Một nút thắt, hai thắt nút, ba nút thắt, bốn thắt nút, ...)

 Four fine white fishes on a fine white fish plate/tray.
(Norwegian: Fire fine hvite fisker på et fint hvitt fiske-fat.)

 If you take one fish paral (Poondius maricola) and roll it into a ball and place it on an ural, will the paral roll or will the ural roll?
(Malayalam: Oru paral urulan paraline eduthu urutty oru uralinmel vachal uralurulumo? paralurulumo?)

 Chandu's wise uncle fed a tasty pickle of tamarind to chandu's wicked aunt four times by polished silver spoon in the Chandni-chowk of Chalisgaon town.
(Marathi: )

 Beneath a red wine barrel there is a spotted hen; when the red wine barrel leaks, the spotted hen clucks.
Spanish: Debajo de una barrica de vino tinto hay una gallina moteada; cuando la barrica de vino tinto gotea, la gallina moteada cacarea.
(Galician: Debaixo dunha pipa tinta hai unha pita pinta; cando a pipa tinta pinga, a pita pinta pia.)

 The green bowl is turned down in the morning; The white bowl is turned down in the evening.
(Thai: ชามเขียวคว่ำเช้า ชามขาวคว่ำค่ำ.)

 The smart mate of the smart hairdresser cuts and does hair in an even smarter way than the smart hairdresser cuts and does hair.
(Dutch: De knappe knecht van de knappe kapper knipt en kapt nog knapper dan de knappe kapper knipt en kapt.)

 The King's daughter has red curly hair.
(Norwegian: Piken til kongen har rødt krøllete hår.)

 Red poppy in the ditch
(Hungarian: Piros pipacs az árokban)

 A red (male) Russian snores. Red (female) Russian, do you snore, too?
(Italian: Un russo rosso russa. Russa rossa, russi anche tu?)

 Beneath a red wine barrel there is a spotted hen; when the red wine barrel leaks, the spotted hen clucks.
Spanish: Debajo de una barrica de vino tinto hay una gallina moteada; cuando la barrica de vino tinto gotea, la gallina moteada cacarea.
(Galician: Debaixo dunha pipa tinta hai unha pita pinta; cando a pipa tinta pinga, a pita pinta pia.)

 The spotted chicken crows over and over; a stool falls upon it that it (the chicken) tumbles upside down.
(Javanese: Pitik blurik kluruk bolak balik ketiban dingklik tiba njempalik.)

 The pine-tree fell on Thursday, the pine-tree falls down on Thursday.
(Greek, Modern: Πέφτη έπεσε το πεύκο, Πέφτη πέφτει ο πεύκος κάτω.)

 A drop fell from the sky, plop, on my forehead, plop on my mother's forehead, plop, on my forehead, plop on my mother's forehead, plop, on my forehead, plop on my mother's forehead, ... German: Vom Himmel tropfte ein Tropfen, blub auf meinen Stirn, blub auf den Stirn meiner Mutter, blub auf meinen Stirn, blub auf den Stirn meiner Mutter, ...
(Turkish: Gökten bir damla düstü, sip benim alnıma, sip anamın alnına, sip benim alnıma, sip anamın alnına, sip benim alnıma, sip anamın alnına, ...)

 I gathered wood, kindling wood, I took and took and put it on my mother's roof.
(Turkish: Aldım odun kavlı odun aldım aldım anamın damına kodum.)

 What a colossal cauliflower that crazy man put in that place. What a colossal cauliflower that crazy man put in that place.
(Spanish: Que col colosal colocó en aquel local el loco aquél. Que colosal col colocó el loco aquél en aquel local.)

 Pepe put a peso on the bottom of the well. On the bottom of the well Pepe put a peso.
(Spanish: Pepe puso un peso en el piso del pozo. En el piso del pozo Pepe puso un peso.)

 The night watchman is tooting. And when he has tooted enough, he puts his tooter back into the tooter-box.
(German: Tuten tut der Nachtwächter. Und wenn er genug getutet hat, tut er seine Tute wieder in den Tutkasten rein.)

 Should we put this yoghurt away after adding garlic to it, or before adding garlic to it?
(Turkish: Bu yoğurdu sarımsaklasak da mı saklasak, sarımsaklamasak da mı saklasak?)

 Children's rhyme with some nonsense adjectives about a goat and her little goats.
(Spanish: Tengo una chiva etica peletica pelin pin petica pelada, peluda pelin pin puda que tiene tres chivitos eticos peleticos pelin pin peticos pelados peludos pelin pin pudos. Si la chiva no fuese etica peletica pelin pin petica los chivitos no fueran eticos peleticos pelin pin peticos pelados peludos pelin pin pudos.)

 Since I eat littel coconut, little coconut I buy.
(Portuguese: Como pouco coco como, pouco coco compro.)

 A black sweatshirt and a little black bag with sixtysix sausages in Sächsische Straße (a street in Berlin).
(German: Ein schwarzes Sweatshirt und ein schwarzes Täschchen mit sechsundsechzig Würstchen in der Sächsischen Straße.)

 Dialogue: (A) Did the rabbit pass through the door? (B) It did. (A) Did you catch it? (B) I did. (A) Did you carve it? (B) I did. (A) Did you salt it? (B) I did. (A) Did you cook it? (B) I did. (A) Did you leave some for me? (B) I did. (A) Which cupboard did you put it in? (B) The click-click one. (A) So bring it? (B) I can't. (A) Why? (B) Black cats have eaten it. (A) uhh..ohh..Meuww.
(Turkish: Kapıdan tavşan geçti mi?GeçtiTuttun mu?TuttumKestin mi?KestimTuzladım mı?TuzladımPişirdin mi?PişirdimBana ayırdın mı?AyırdımHangi dolaba koydun?Çık çık dolaba koydumHaydi al getirGetirememNeden getirimezsin?Kara kediler yemiş.Vayı vay, miyav.)

 Put the mare in the stable in Stöllet (a village in western Sweden) instead you nut!

(Swedish: Ställ stoet i stallet i Stöllet istället din stolle !)


 I climbed upon the mitsiria, the tsitsiria, the tsitsihomitsiria, to cut mitsira, tsitsira, tsitsimitsihotsira, and there broke the tsitsiria, the mitsiria, the tsitsimitsihotsiria and there fell the tsitsira, the mitsira, the tsitsihomitsihotsira.
(Greek, Modern: Aνέβηκα στη μιτσιριά στη τσιτσιριά στη τσιτσιχομιτσιριά να κόψω μίτσιρα τσίτσιρα τσιτσιχομιτσιχότσιρα και έσπασε η μιτσιριά η τσιτσιριά η τσιτσιχομιτσιριά και μου έπεσαν τα τσίτσιρα τα μίτσιρα τα τσιτσιχομιτσιχότσιρα.)

 Once upon a time there was a beetle...
(Russian: Жил-был жук, жук жил-был.)

 Once upon a time there was a king who had 3 sons the first one was called Skrat, the second Skratskratterat and the third Skratskratteratskratteskriumskrat. In a neighbouring kingdom lived a king who had 3 daughters, the first one
was called Sip, the second one Sipsippenip, and the third one Sipsippenipsipsirumsip. when time came they got married to eachother. Skrat to Sip, Skratskratterat to Sipsippenip and Skratskratteratskratskrirumskrat to
Sipsippenipsipsirumsip. And they lived happily ever after. German: Dies ist eigentlich ein Märchen aus West Juteland. Die männlichen Namen spielen mit dem Wort "skratte": kreischen, schrill ertönen, quietschen, krächzen; krächzend lachen, laut auflachen. Die weiblichen spielen mit dem Wort "sippenippe": zartes Weib; Xanthippe.
(Danish: Der var en gang en konge, der havde tre sønner. Den ene hed Skrat, den anden Skratskratterat, og den tredie Skratskratteratskratskrirumskrat. Der var også en anden konge, der havde tre døtre. Den ene hed Sip, den anden Sipsippenip, og den tredje Sipsippenipsipsirumsip. Da de var blevet voksne, giftede den ene konges sønner sig med den anden konges døtre. Skrat fik Sip, Skratskratterat fik Sipsippenip, og Skratskratteratskratskrirumskrat fik Sipsippenipsipsirumsip. Og de levede lykkeligt til deres dages ende.)

 Yes yes it is time that it is finished. Dutch: Ja ja het is tijd dat het gedaan is.

(Dutch: Toet toet te tit tat tut es.)

 Aunt Tove took early the train to Thisted. The journey took time, it took two hours.
(Danish: Tante Tove tog tidligt toget til Thisted. Turen tog tid, thi toget tog to timer.)

 Two grey-brown beavers were fooling in a mudhole. "Isn't it good, my friend?" - "Very good, my brother!"
(Ukrainian: Бавились в брудній баюрі два бобри брунатно-бурі.
- "Правда добре, друже бобре?"
- "Дуже добре, брате бобре!")

 One who favours domestic market: - Remember, don't  taste anything from other countries!
(Finnish: Kotimaista suosiva: - Muista, älä maista muista maista tulevaa!)

 Koottam koodi= collected people, many came together. Koottaan kootti= tasted a dish, collected to collect.
koottaan = a dish, to taste, to collect three meanings to the same word at different context "came together and tasted a dish, to taste the dish came together".


(Malayalam: Koottam Koodi koottaan kootti, koottaan koottaan koottam koodi.)

 George came back already from the cage of the giant.
(Maltese: Ġorġ raġa’ ġà mill-gaġġa tal-ġgant.)

 I went to the sea to pick shoelaces. I came from the the sea, shoelaces I picked.
(Portuguese: Fui ao mar colher cordões, vim do mar cordões colhi.)

 A cockroach went to shave a cochroach and found it had already been shaved by a shaved roach.
(Kikuyu: Nyenje yathire kwenja nyenje, igikora nyenje ni nyenje ni nyenje nyenje.)

 If cockroaches crap behind Interlaken, cockroaches crap behind Interlaken.
(German: Wenn hinter Interlaken Kakerlaken kacken, kacken Kakerlaken hinter Interlaken.)

 Behind the Roman church three dry towels are hanging.
(Dutch: Achter de Roomse kerk hangen drie droge doeken.)

 Before they arrive at church, sweep the ants with Svosve's broom.
(Shona: Vasati vasvika paSvondo, tsvaira masvosve nemutsvairo waSvosve.)

 This is a log. This is a log. A finely spliced log sent by Miss Meissner from Neisse and she lets say quite finely, that her husband is a busy log-splicer, who at night - before eating or biting anything - would have spliced a lot of logs.
(German: Dies ist ein Scheit. Dies ist ein Scheit. Es ist ein feingesplissner Spleißenscheit, den schickt Frau Meissner aus Neiße und läßt dazu sagen gar fein, daß ihr Mann ein fleißiger Scheitspleißer sei, der am Abend - ehe er etwas gegessen oder gebissen - hätte viele Scheite gesplissen.)

 Grandma, let me play La Paloma again. German: Oma lass mich noch mal La Paloma laufen lassen.
(German: Oma lo ma nomal La Paloma lope lote.)

 If your kisser loves my kisserlike my kisser loves your kisser,let me have the biggest kissof the Province of Quebec!
(French: Si ton bec aime mon beccomme mon bec aime ton bec,donne-moi le plus gros becde la Province de Québec!)

 Tam thought I loved Tu since April but in thruth I loved Tam, so I tied to tell Tam that.
(Vietnamese: Tâm tưởng tôi tỏ tình tới Tú từ tháng tư, thú thật, tôi thương Tâm thì tôi thì thầm thử Tâm thế thôị.)

 Didì said to Didò: "Didò tell Didù to tell Didì what Didì told Didò".
(Italian: Didì disse a Didò: "Didò dì a Didù di dire a Didì ciò che Didì disse a Didò".)

 She/he said tell her/him if she/he told her/him,she/he said that I told her/him to tell her/him!
(Albanian: Thuaj tha m'i thënë a i ka thënë thuaj,tha i kam thënë thuaj m'i thënë!)

 On the love-trip the giant (of body) said "rub it Lisa" and she rubbed it silently.
(German: Auf der Liebesreise 
sprach der Leibesriese 
"reib es Liese" 
und sie rieb es leise.)

 Seven fools from Zaventem will swim six sundays in the summer without swimming trousers. The dead sister of fat Julien said: "Such fools, they are nuts, they'll sink!
(Dutch: Zeven Zaventemse zotten zullen zes zomerse zondagen zwemmen zonder zwembroek. Zware Julien zijn zuster zaliger zei: "Zo'n zeveraars! Ze zijn zijle zeker zot zeg! Ze zullen zinken!)

 Six Saxons (German Romanians) reap six sacks full
(Romanian: Şase saşi cosaş cosesc şase saci săseşti.)

 I saw six silly people sucking six hundred six sausages, six in sauce and six hundred without sauce.
(French: J'ai vu six sots suçant six cent six saucisses, six en sauce et six cents sans sauce.)

 I saw two flies fly, a bee joined them, they flew under the door, over the path away.
(Dutch: Ik zag twee vliegen vliegen, toen kwam er een bij bij, ze vlogen onder de deur deur, en over de weg weg.)

 I saw six silly people sucking six hundred six sausages, six in sauce and six hundred without sauce.
(French: J'ai vu six sots suçant six cent six saucisses, six en sauce et six cents sans sauce.)

 Five hundred saints without blood are healthy without care
(French: Cinq cents saints sans sang sont sains sans soin.)

 Four multiplied by four five times is more than five multiplied by five four times.
(German: Vier fünfmal vervierfacht macht mehr als fünf viermal verfünffacht.)

 Once upon a time there was a king who had 3 sons the first one was called Skrat, the second Skratskratterat and the third Skratskratteratskratteskriumskrat. In a neighbouring kingdom lived a king who had 3 daughters, the first one
was called Sip, the second one Sipsippenip, and the third one Sipsippenipsipsirumsip. when time came they got married to eachother. Skrat to Sip, Skratskratterat to Sipsippenip and Skratskratteratskratskrirumskrat to
Sipsippenipsipsirumsip. And they lived happily ever after. German: Dies ist eigentlich ein Märchen aus West Juteland. Die männlichen Namen spielen mit dem Wort "skratte": kreischen, schrill ertönen, quietschen, krächzen; krächzend lachen, laut auflachen. Die weiblichen spielen mit dem Wort "sippenippe": zartes Weib; Xanthippe.
(Danish: Der var en gang en konge, der havde tre sønner. Den ene hed Skrat, den anden Skratskratterat, og den tredie Skratskratteratskratskrirumskrat. Der var også en anden konge, der havde tre døtre. Den ene hed Sip, den anden Sipsippenip, og den tredje Sipsippenipsipsirumsip. Da de var blevet voksne, giftede den ene konges sønner sig med den anden konges døtre. Skrat fik Sip, Skratskratterat fik Sipsippenip, og Skratskratteratskratskrirumskrat fik Sipsippenipsipsirumsip. Og de levede lykkeligt til deres dages ende.)

 Fox´s big mind unbuttoned-buttoned? This way and the other is full of mule lines. Fox´s tale seven times unbuttoned-buttoned.
(Greek, Modern: Της αλεπούς ο νούρλαρος πως δεν εξεκαυκαλοξεκουμποθηλυκαθρώθη;
Τουτη η στράτα κι΄ άλλη μία, όλο μουλαραχναριά.
Της αλεπούς η ουρά εφτά φορές εξεφηκαροκομπομανικοθηλυκώθηκε.)

 Seven swans swam in the Zuiderzee (southern sea), they could see the sun sink and that was a beautiful sight.
(Dutch: Er zwommen zeven zwanen al in de Zuiderzee, ze konden de zon in zee zien zinken en dat was een zalig gezicht zeg.)

 one striped tiger and ten plates of wheattwo striped tigers and nine plates of wheatthree striped tigers and eight plates of wheatfour striped tigers and seven plates of wheatfive striped tigers and six plates of wheatsix striped tigers and five plates of wheatseven striped tigers and four plates of wheateight striped tigers and three plates of wheat nine striped tigers and two plates of wheatten striped tigers and one plate of wheat
(Portuguese: um tigre tigrado e dez pratos de trigodois tigres tigrados e nove pratos de trigotres tigres tigrados e oito pratos de trigoquatro tigres tigrados e sete pratos de trigocinco tigres tigrados e seis pratos de trigoseis tigres tigrados e cinco pratos de trigosete tigres tigrados e quatro pratos de trigooito tigres tigrados e tres pratos de trigonove tigres tigrados e dois pratos de trigodez tigres tigres tigrados e um prato de trigo)

 Six salmons in a small laquered wooden box
(Swedish: Sex laxar i en lackask)

 Daddy piles up cardboard boxes.
(Norwegian: Pappa pakker pappkasser.)

 The Queen's cushions. The Sultan's boxes. What cushions! What boxes! In what box do they go?
(Spanish: Los cojines de la Reina. Los cajones del Sultán. ¡Qué cojines! ¡Qué cajones! ¿En qué cajonera van?)

 Peter go on the road by lorry with stones, to make a carric, carrac, carric, carrac.
(Catalan: En Pere va per la carretera amb un carro carregat de rocs, que fa carric, carrac, carric, carrac.)

 Lift the stone and if you find me under it, you will clean me.
(Greek, Modern: Ανασήκωσε την πλάκα κι αν με εύρεις απο κάτω ανεμιδιγάδισέ με.)

 Within the Quarter Pounder with Cheese, you'll find sauce, onion,
cucumber, also cheese, lettuce and sesame - everyone who has tried this will be jolly!
Literally: 
Quarter Pounder with Cheese (1-7) / sauce (8-9) / onion (10-11) / hold
in between (12) / cucumber (14) / cheese (15-16) / lettuce (17-18) / plus,
add (19) / sesame (20-21) / everybody (22-23) / have tried, have eaten
(24-25) / laugh (26) / [interjection, sounding HAHA] (27)
(Chinese, Yue or Cantonese: 雙層牛肉巨無霸，
醬汁洋蔥夾青瓜，
芝士生菜加芝麻，
人人食過笑哈哈。)

 If we wash-women knew where to find warm water, we wash-women would wash white laundry. German: Wenn wir Waschweiber wüssten wo warmes Wasser wäre, würden wir Waschweiber weiße Wäsche waschen.
(German: Wann wie Woschwiewa wusste wou wormet Wota wia, wurde wie Woschwiewa witte Wosch wosche.)

 My mother with the white fur, my mother with the black fur, the white and black fur and the little fur.
(Greek, Modern: Η μάννα μου η ασπρογούνα,η μάννα μου η μαυρογούνα,άσπρο μαύρο το γουνί τηςκαι το παραγούνι της.)

 What bad weather again. You are almost blown off the road. You would be better off in the storehouse, with a little box of strawberries.
(Dutch: Wat een weer weer. Je waait haast van de weg weg. Je kunt beter in het magazijn zijn, met een doosje aardbeien bij je.)

 Little John: I havent seen a billy goat with horns as twisted as Matarrapeis one. (To be said time after time)
(Basque, Euskara or Euskera: Juanikotxu: akerra Matarrapeiko aker adar okerragorik eztot nik ikusi.)

 My mother with the white fur, my mother with the black fur, the white and black fur and the little fur.
(Greek, Modern: Η μάννα μου η ασπρογούνα,η μάννα μου η μαυρογούνα,άσπρο μαύρο το γουνί τηςκαι το παραγούνι της.)

 Children's rhyme with some nonsense adjectives about a hen and her little chicks.
(Spanish: Tengo una gallina pinta pipiripinta gorda pipirigorda pipiripintiva y sorda que tiene tres pollitos pintos pipiripintos gordos pipirigordos pipiripintivos y sordos. Si la gallina no hubiera sido pinta pipiripinta gorda pipirigorda pipiripintiva y sorda los pollitos no hubieran sido pintos pipiripintos gordos pipirigordos pipiripintivos y sordos.)

 Little children cannot crack cherry stones.
(German: Kleine Kinder können keine kleinen Kirschkerne knacken. Kleine Kirschkerne können kleine Kinder keine knacken.)

 If it rains, it rains little. French: S'il pleut, il pleut peu.
(Occitan or Gascon: Se plau, plau plan pauc.)

 What bad weather again. You are almost blown off the road. You would be better off in the storehouse, with a little box of strawberries.
(Dutch: Wat een weer weer. Je waait haast van de weg weg. Je kunt beter in het magazijn zijn, met een doosje aardbeien bij je.)

 Four black dirty little devils drew a drawing with black ink.
(Russian: Четыре чёрненких чумазеньких чертёнка чертили чёрными чернилами чертёж.)

 One rooster, two chicken, three ducks, four geese, five pigs, six cows, seven oxen, eight nuns, nine knobby, hunchbacked beggar women are spending the night with ten Costantinoplean bagpipe-maker assistants.
(German: Ein Hahn, zwei Hühner, drei Enten, vier Gänse, fünf Schweine, sechs Kühe, sieben Ochsen, acht Nonnen, neun huckelicke, buckelige Bettelmannsweiber übernachten bei zehn konstantinopolitanischen Dudelsackpfeifenmachergesellen.)

 Appila vicarage's assistant pastor's beanpot is steaming and boiling on the stove.
(Finnish: Appilan pappilan apupapin papupata pankolla porisee ja kuohuu.)

 Eighty eight little stoves.
(Dutch: Achtentachtig kacheltjes.)

 Little pot of butter, when will you unlittlepotofbutterize yourself? I will unlittlepotofbutterize myself when you unlittlepotofbutterize yourself.
(French: Petit pot de beurre, quand te dépetitpotdebeurreriseras-tu? Je me dépetitpotdebeurreriserai quand tu te dépetitpotdebeurreriseras.)

 Little daughter of inhabitant of Constantinople
(Polish: Konstantynopolitańczykowianeczka)

 A quarter of moon fell into the water of the marsh. White, plentiful, ripe fruit of the night: the frogs have eaten it, the swimmer frogs. Now, however, the frogs are groaning, the crazy frogs, little frogs ... In the unpleasant night the frogs of the marsh, ai ei! miss the moon.
(Basque, Euskara or Euskera: Aintziko urerat ilargi laurden bat erori zan. Zuri, jori, gauko zitu zori: igelek jan dute, igeltto igeldariek. Orain, berriz, intzirika dagoz igel igelttoak, igel igeltto xoroak ... Gau minean aintziko igelek dute, ai ei! ilargi-min.)

 A lot of frogs have plenty of brains.
(Yoruba: Opo lopo opolo lo ni opolo lopo lopo.)

 Shalom payed a lot of money that is a lot of money (?)
(Hebrew: SHALOM SHILEM MECHIR GDOL SHESHILSHEL SHILSULIM SHEL HARBE CESEF)

 What a weather, I almost fly of the road, I could better be in the storage, packing boxes, I see a lot of flying flies but there is no bee there.
(Dutch: Wat een weer weer, ik waai bijna van de weg weg, ik kon beter in het magazijn zijn, pakken pakken, ik zie een heleboel vliegen vliegen maar er is geen een bij bij.)

 A Turk rolls the barrel, the barrel pushes the Turk. It is better for the barrel to push the Turk, than that the Turk roll the barrel (away).
(Croatian, Serbian and Bosnian: Ture bure valja, bolje bure Ture neg Ture bure.)

 Push a finger through the throat.
(Czech: Strč prst skrz krk.)

 Push into this boat a hedgehog or eight boxes of figs.
(Polish: Pchnij w tę łódź jeża lub ośm skrzyń fig.)

 The boats manoeuvred, manoeuvred, but they didn't succeed (to outmanoeuvre).
(Russian: Корабли лавировали, лавировали, да не вылавировали.)

 Early morning it was foggy, Sau Sau went on a boat, crossed the river
and see lottery results.
(Vietnamese: Sáng sớm sương xuống, Sáu Sậu xuống xuồng sang sông xem xổ số)

 I went to somewhere and saw the barber's son hurting another barber's son. I asked why the first barber's son was hurting the other barber's son. He answered if that barber's son  had not hurt his barber's son before, his barber's son would not bee hurting that barber's son then.
(Azerbaijani or Azeri: Getdim gordum bir derede bir berber bir berberi ber-ber byirdir. Dedim ay berber niye bu berberi ber-ber beyirdirsen? Dedi buberber oglu men berber oglun ber-ber beyirdmeseydi men berber oglu bu berber oglun ber-ber beyirdmezdim.)

 Pinxo asked Panxo, "Do you want me to pierce you with a punch?" And Panxo answered Pinxo "Pierce me, but not in my belly!" Spanish: Pinxo preguntó a Panxo: - Quieres que te clave un alfiler? Y Pinxo dijo a Panxo: - Clavamelo, pero no en la barriga.
(Catalan: En Pinxo va dir a en Panxo:- Vols que et punxi amb un punxó?I en Panxo va dir a en Pinxo:- Punxa'm, però a la panxa no!)

 - Friend, buy me coconut. - Friend, I don't buy coconut, because I don't eat much coconut therefor I don't buy much coconut.
(Spanish: - Compadre, cómpreme un coco. - Compadre, no compro coco, porque poco coco como poco coco compro.)

 Who buys the expensive "paca", will pay for the expensive "paca". "Paca" is a little mammal from South America.
(Portuguese: Quem a paca cara compra, paca cara pagará.)

 Mail carriages you can buy in a shop that sells mail carriages.
(Dutch: Koetspoets koop je in de postkoetskoetspoetswinkel)

 The chubby woman Ba sells rice cake on the sea shore.
(Vietnamese: Bà ba béo bán bánh bèo bên bờ biển.)

 That is bound to be a funny supper
when our mother bakes cakes
and the father jumps around
and takes the cakes away from us
(German: Das git mir es luschtigs Znacht,
we üsi Muetter Chüechli bacht
u de Vater umespringt
u üs allne d Chüechli nimmt.)

 Take two sets of three frog croaks add them together and they make six frog croaks
(Japanese: Kaeru pyoko-pyoko mi pyoko-pyoko awasete pyoko-pyoko mu pyoko-pyoko.)

 One rooster, two chicken, three ducks, four geese, five pigs, six cows, seven oxen, eight nuns, nine knobby, hunchbacked beggar women are spending the night with ten Costantinoplean bagpipe-maker assistants.
(German: Ein Hahn, zwei Hühner, drei Enten, vier Gänse, fünf Schweine, sechs Kühe, sieben Ochsen, acht Nonnen, neun huckelicke, buckelige Bettelmannsweiber übernachten bei zehn konstantinopolitanischen Dudelsackpfeifenmachergesellen.)

 Seven seasick seamen were nursed by seventeen beautiful nurses. German: Sieben seekranke Seemänner wurden von siebzehn schönen Krankenschwestern gepflegt.
(Swedish: Sju sjösjukliga sjömän sköttes av sjutton sköna sjuksköterskor.)

 The maidservant cut seven crooked slices of bread.
(Dutch: De meid sneed zeven scheve sneden brood.)

 You have got to chew your bread well, so that you excrements get really brown.
(German: Du mußt dein Brot schön kauen, dann wird dein Kot schön braun.)

 Did Kaka [Tamil for crow] get its name as "Kaka" because it cries kaka? or does it cry kaka because it has the name Kaka?
(Tamil: kaka kakaka nu kathranala kaka nu peru vandatha?
kaka nu peru vandanala kaka kakaka nu kathutha?)

 Mary say "r", I won't because you will laugh at me.
(Czech: Mařeno řekni "ř", neřeknu vy byste se mi řehtali.)

 The cook cooks in the kitchen and says that the cook lies down and is silent because his cousin does not say that she likes to cook in the kitchen with the cook.
(Italian: Il cuoco cuoce in cucina e dice che la cuoca giace e tace perchè sua cugina non dica che le piace cuocere in cucina col cuoco.)

 I would like to see you once dare to stand to stand watch.
(Dutch: Ik had je wel eens hebben willen zien durven blijven staan kijken.)

 There once were two nightwatchmen, a before-midnight-nightwatchman and an after-midnight-nightwatchman. The before-midnight-nightwtchman said to the after-midnight-nightwatchman: "If you take the before-midnight-nightwatch, I'll take the after-midnight-nighttwatch." "Okay" said the after-midnight-nightwatchman to the before-midnight-nightwatchman "I'll take the before-midnight-nightwatch en then you take the after-midnight-nightwatch." and so it happened that the before-midnight-nightwatchman took the after-midnight-nightwatch and the after-midnight-nightwatchman took the before-midnight-nightwatch.
(Dutch: Er waren eens twee nachtwachten, een voor-middernacht-nachtwacht en een na-middernacht-nachtwacht.  De voor-middernacht-nachtwacht zei tegen de na-middernacht-nachtwacht: "Als jij de voor-middernacht-nachtwacht waakt, waak ik de na-middernacht-nachtwacht." "oke" zei de na-middernacht-nachtwacht tegen de voor-middernacht-nachtwacht  "Ik waak de voor-middernacht-nachtwacht en dan waak jij de na-middernacht-nachtwacht."  Zo kwam het dat de voor-middernacht-nachtwacht de na-middernacht-nachtwacht waakte  en de na-middernacht-nachtwacht de voor-middernacht-nachtwacht waakte.)

 Paco Peco, (a) rich kid, Insulted his uncle Fred like a madman, And (Fred) said, "Paco Peco, little by little, your little beak!" (that's slang for something like shut your mouth or I'll shut it for you)
(Spanish: Paco Peco, chico rico, insultaba como un loco a su tío Federico, y este dijo, - ¡Poco a poco, Paco Peco, poco pico!)

 Pio Pietro Paolo Pula an artist from Palermo, paints a painting for little money. You haughty people, pay  Pio Pietro Paolo Pula promptly so he'll leave for Palermo - his hometown.
(Italian: Pio Pietro Paolo Pula pittore Palermitano, pinse pittura per poco prezzo. Prepotenti popolo pagate presto Pio Pietro Paolo Pula per partire per Palermo propria patria.)

 Paco Pino Ponte Pascual Perez paints precious paintings for wealthy people. For the poor he paints little because they pay low prices.
(Spanish: Paco Pino Ponte Pascual Pérez pinta pinturas preciosas para personas pudientes. Para pobres pinta poco porque pagan poco precio.)

 Brother of the brown gown, don't buy anymore brown gown, because who buy many brown gowns, pays for many brown gowns. I who bought many brown gowns, paid for many brwon gowns.
(Spanish: Compadre de la capa parda, no compre usted mas capa parda, que el que mucha capa parda compra, mucha capa parda paga. Yo que mucha capa parda compré, mucha capa parda pagué.)

 Kalim drowned, gasped, and waved his hand because his shirt drifted by the river flow.
(Javanese: Kalim klelep klagep klagep, klawe klawe merga klambine keli)

 Pedro Perez barber prefers Piramid combs because Piramid combs comb perfectly. You should prefer (ask for) Piramid!
(Spanish: Pedro Perez peluquero prefiere peines Piramide por que peines Piramide peinan perfectamente. Prefiera peines Piramide!)

 There was once a girl called Barbara.  Barbara had a greengrocery, and she sold rhubarb. Therefore everyone called her Rhubarb Barbara.  Later on she opened a cafe with a bar. It was written on the window: Rhubarb Barbara's Bar. Some wild men, real barbarians, came to visit: the Rhubarb Barbara's Bar Barbarians. Oh, what long beards those men had! They called the beards Rhubarb Barbara's Bar Barbarians' Beards. And the barber who had to trim the beards was the Rhubarb Barbara's Bar Barbarians' Beard
Barber!
(Dutch: Er was eens een meisje, dat heette Barbara. Barbara had een groentenwinkel en verkocht rabarber. Daarom noemden alle mensen dat meisje: Rabarberbarbara. Later begon Barbara een cafe met een bar. Op het raam stond: Rabarberbarbarabar. Daar kwamen wilde mannen op bezoek, echte barbaren: de Rabarberbarbarabarbarbaren. O, wat hadden die mannen lange baarden! Die baarden noemden ze: Rabarberbarbarabarbarbarenbaarden. En de barbier die die lange baarden moest knippen was de: Rabarberbarbarabarbarbarenbaardenbarbier!)

 In an understanding way, understand the understanding.  Understanding the understanding is an understanding in itself.  He who doesn't understand the understanding, in my understanding, is a 'non-understander' (oblivious, dumb, stupid).

(Urdu: Samajh Samajh Ke Samajh Ko Samjho
Samjh Samjhana Bhee Ek Samajh Hai
Samajh Samjh Ke Jo Na Samjhe
Meri Samjh Mein Wo Naasamajh Hai)

 Fox´s big mind unbuttoned-buttoned? This way and the other is full of mule lines. Fox´s tale seven times unbuttoned-buttoned.
(Greek, Modern: Της αλεπούς ο νούρλαρος πως δεν εξεκαυκαλοξεκουμποθηλυκαθρώθη;
Τουτη η στράτα κι΄ άλλη μία, όλο μουλαραχναριά.
Της αλεπούς η ουρά εφτά φορές εξεφηκαροκομπομανικοθηλυκώθηκε.)

 Down a ladder went a bifigafa with seven little bifigafos. A little bifigafo fell down. Because she went to get the little bifigafo, the bifigafa fell down.
(Spanish: Por una ladera abajo iba una bifigafa con siete bifigafitos. Se cayó un bifigafito. Por ir a coger al bifigafito se cayó la bifigafa.)

 Three axe blades (or Three sharp axes), cut three old poplars, the third poplar had little pitch.
(Albanian: Tri sopata lata, presin tre plepa pleq, i treti plep pak palce kishte pasur.)

 A little bit of pepper, salt, and soy sauce
(Japanese: Koshou shoushou, shio shoushou, shouyu shoushou.)

 The painter Pere Peret, who was given a prize by Portugal, prints cans and mixtures to put spice pepper in.
(Catalan: En Pere Peret pintor, premiat per Portugal, pinta pots i potinguetes per posar pebre picant.)

 Sam put a drug there.
(Hebrew: SAM SAM SHAM SAM.)

 Pepe put a peso on the bottom of the well. On the bottom of the well Pepe put a peso.
(Spanish: Pepe puso un peso en el piso del pozo. En el piso del pozo Pepe puso un peso.)

 The little mice prepared dried food. The little mice invited the cats.
(Russian: Мышки сушек насушили. Мышки кошек пригласили.)

 What bad weather again. You are almost blown off the road. You would be better off in the storehouse, with a little box of strawberries.
(Dutch: Wat een weer weer. Je waait haast van de weg weg. Je kunt beter in het magazijn zijn, met een doosje aardbeien bij je.)

 A pastry chef who made pastries at the house of a tapestry maker who papered, said one day to the tapestry maker who papered: is it better to make pastries at a tapestry maker's who papers or to paper at a pastry chef's who makes pastries.
(French: Un pâtissier qui pâtissait chez un tapissier qui tapissait, dit un jour au tapissier qui tapissait: vaut-il mieux pâtisser chez un tapissier qui tapisse ou tapisser chez un pâtissier qui pâtisse?)

 Uncle asked auntie to take out raw mango from a glass cabinet and to make salad from it.
(Gujarati: Kaka ae kaki ne kaach na kabat mathi kachi keri katdhi ne kachumber karava kahnyu.)

 Take the cassette to the market and the chair to the pastor.
(Finnish: Tuo lipas torille ja tuoli pastorille.)

 That sheep is hers, I take it.
(Romanian: Oaia aia e a ei, eu i-o iau.)

 I would very much like to take the grilled dishes.
(Dutch: Ik wil graag de gegrilde gerechten krijgen.)

 Galo arrive at the lake and join later Lugo the ignorant tattler, who arrived at the lake from very far.
(Spanish: Llega Galo al lago y liga luego al lego de Lugo muy largo en lengua que al lago llega tras luengas leguas.)

 Notice in a mountain shelter in Austria: Who upon arrival gives no information on his origin in the future will not receive accomodation.
(German: Auf eine Berghütte in Österreich:)

 Those who report to the police those who let the thieves escape will receive a reward!
(German: Die, die die, die die Diebe ausreißen ließen, der Polizei melden, bekommen eine Belohnung!)

 Bourvil and de Funès are trying to escape the German soldiers during WWII, they find gliders in a hangar and Bourvil says what could be translated as: "There is no more propeller, alas! We've hit another snag."
(French: Il n'y a plus d'hélice hélas, c'est là qu'est l'os.)

 A toothbrush chirps/twitters something to another toothbrush in a briefcase.
(Polish: Szczoteczka szczoteczce szczebioce coś w teczce.)

 The Dung's in the east of the town has a gourd bigger than the
watermelon of the Si's in the west of the town. On the other hand, the
gourd of the Dung's is a little bit bigger than that of the Dung's [N.B.
another Dung] in the east of the town. 
Literally: someone (1-2) / say, rumour (3) / east of the town [the east gate]
(4-5) / Dung's [the family of Dung] (6-7) / [genitive word] (8) / gourd
['winter gourd'] (9-10) / bigger than (11-12) / west of the town [the west
gate] (13-14) / Si's [the family of Si] (15-16) / [genitive word] (17) /
water melon (18-19) / as well, also (20) / bigger than (21-22) / east of
the town [the east gate] (23-24) / Dung's [the family of Dung, N.B.
another Dung] (25-26) / [genitive word] (27) / gourd ['winter gourd']
(28-29) / [interjection, meaning scantily, a little bit]
(Chinese, Yue or Cantonese: 人地話︰東門董家個冬瓜大過西門施家個西瓜又大過東門東家個冬瓜0的。)

 Pepe put a peso on the bottom of the well. On the bottom of the well Pepe put a peso.
(Spanish: Pepe puso un peso en el piso del pozo. En el piso del pozo Pepe puso un peso.)

 A crab squats with its bottom facing up, in the toliet, bitten by a centipede, and runs helter-skelter.
(Javanese: Piting njengking ning jedhing kecokot luwing mlayu pontang-panting.)

 The crab is cutting the fish
(Bulgarian: Рачо реже риба.)

 The executor will despise cutting (off) your head using that sword.
(Czech: Kat se bude štítiti títi ti tím mečem hlavu.)

 If the rabbit takes your garlic away, take the garglic back and cut his claws.
(Italian: Se il coniglio gli agli ti piglia, togligli gli agli a tagliagli gli artigli.)

 The crab is cutting the fish
(Bulgarian: Рачо реже риба.)

 The maidservant cut seven crooked slices of bread.
(Dutch: De meid sneed zeven scheve sneden brood.)

 On a meadow, quietly and silently sat a cricket, quietly and silently - head cut off. German: Auf einer Wiese ganz ruhig und still eine Grille. Ganz still und ruhig - Kopf abgemäht.
(German: Auf ana Wiesn gaunz stad und stüll a grüll. Gaunz stüll und stad - Schedl o'gmaht.)

 Gorbachev - Secretary-general
(Japanese: Gorbachovshokichou)

 - Friend, buy me coconut. - Friend, I don't buy coconut, because I don't eat much coconut therefor I don't buy much coconut.
(Spanish: - Compadre, cómpreme un coco. - Compadre, no compro coco, porque poco coco como poco coco compro.)

 Mail carriages you can buy in a shop that sells mail carriages.
(Dutch: Koetspoets koop je in de postkoetskoetspoetswinkel)

 Mail it to Poen Papenfus (personal name) using speed-mail.
(Afrikaans: Pos vir Poen Papenfus met spoedpos.)

 Of course you shall get your talented daughters used to your aunt's acquaintances!
(Finnish: Totta kai totutat taitavat tyttösi tätisi tuttaviin.)

 Do you get angry? So do it!
(Italian: Ti ci stizzisci? E stizziscitici pure!)

 I'm wetting my elbows, my elbows are getting wet, am I wetting my elbows?
I'm wetting my elbows, my elbows are getting wet, would you be able to say it?
(French: J'mouille mes coudes,
mes coudes s'mouillent,
est-ce que j'mouille mes coudes?
J'mouille mes coudes,
mes coudes s'mouillent,
saurais-tu le dire?)

 Dudung, please get me the dandang (Indonesian traditional rice cooker) that is hanging on the wall.
(Indonesian: Dudung, ambilkan dandang di dinding dong, Dung!)

 Our Tony gave me a round fig because I gave him a good berry. You should see our Tony going up the Tintillu hill. 'Hey Ton, give me three tuna fish. Don't give me smelly tuna, give me good tuna, please Ton.'
(Maltese: Toni tagħna tani tina,
Talli tajtu tuta tajba.
Trid tarah lil Toni tagħna
tiela’ it-tela tat-Tintillu.
'Ta’ Toni, tin tlieta tonn.
Tatinix tonn tinten, tin tonn tajjeb,
ta’ Ton.')

 Where are you going? To the cinema. To see what? "Quo Vadis?" What does it mean? Where are you going? ...
(Italian: Ndo vai?Al cinema.A vede che? "Quo Vadis?"E che vo rdi?
Ndo vai?Al cinema.A vede che? "Quo Vadis?" ...)

 Crocodile cradle/swing lizard, crocodile cradle/swing lizard, ...
(Malay: Buaya buaian biawak, buaya buaian biawak, ...)

 Hey! ... are you messing with Netturaan
(Malayalam: hum! ... ee netturaanodanoda ninde kali.)

 Hey, are you getting off Baba?
(Tagalog or Filipino: Aba, bababa kaba Baba?)

 Two bakers would like to get two blue pictures.
(Hungarian: Két pék két szép kék képet kér.)

 I'm driving over the pot-holes, I cannot get out of the pot-holes
(Russian: Еду я по выбоинам, из выбоин не выеду я.)

 Of course you shall get your talented daughters used to your aunt's acquaintances!
(Finnish: Totta kai totutat taitavat tyttösi tätisi tuttaviin.)

 My aunt offered my uncle some pickle in a silver spoon.
(Panjabi or Punjabi: Chachi nay chacha ko chandi kay chumuch say chutni chuttai.)

 He had been attentive to the pathetic attempt of murder on the aunt of the Hottentots’ potentate.
(French: Il avait été attentif à la pathétique tentative d’attentat contre la tante du potentat des Hottentots.)

 If my favorite aunt moves to Singo I'll be happy!
(Ganda or Luganda: Ssinga Ssenga asinga asenga e Ssingo ssinga nsanyuka!)

 My aunt gave some sauce to my uncle with a silver spoon.
(Urdu: chachi nay chacha ko chandi kay chumchay say chutni chutai.)

 She is gone with your uncle, your Taine (a French writer) and your tuna fish.
(French: Elle est partie avec tonton, ton Taine et ton thon.)

 Fish without a drink is poison.
(French: Poisson sans boisson, c'est poison!)

 A fish is bitting off a fish's tail.
(Croatian, Serbian and Bosnian: Riba ribi grize rep.)

 Uruly"is an utensil made of bronze for high heat cooking which doesn't have a handle. "Kiliroor" is a place: The "uruly" of Kiliroor has "val" ie a tail, meaning handle.

(Malayalam: Kilirooruly valuruly)

 Lady Tailor, are you crying because the hen laid an egg on the dress you made that is lying on the bed? (Akwa=Bed, Akwa=Dress, Akwa=Crying, Akwa=Egg, ikwa-akwa=to make dresses, ikwa-akwa=to cry, iyi-akwa=to lay eggs)
(Igbo or Ibo: Nwanyi n'akwa akwa, ina-akwa akwa na okuko yili akwa nenu akwa ikwalakwa di nenu akwa?)

 I got bored of my beautiful mother-of-pearl castle in Gyor, because the fresh-water crayfish of the Danube, Raba, Rabca chews my feet.
(Hungarian: Meguntam Győrnek gyönyörű gyöngyvárában laktomat, mert a Duna, Rába, Rábca rákja rágja lábamat.)

 (?) Lan went upstairs to get the blade. Lan got the sickle instead of the blade so Lan go upstairs again to get the sickle.
(Vietnamese: Lan leo lên lầu Lan lấy lưỡi lam. Lan lấy lộn lưỡi liềm Lan leo lên lầu lấy lại.)

 Who knows if Sasà got up.
(Sicilian: Sa si si susì Sasà.)

 Those cypreses are so far (away) that one doesn't know if they are there!
(French: Ces cyprès sont si loin qu'on ne sait si c'en sont!)

 Galo arrive at the lake and join later Lugo the ignorant tattler, who arrived at the lake from very far.
(Spanish: Llega Galo al lago y liga luego al lego de Lugo muy largo en lengua que al lago llega tras luengas leguas.)

 Do not drink vermouth if you expect to travel far.
(Dutch: Drink geen vermouth als je vermoedt dat je nog ver moet.)

 Good men, in good wood, were drinking good kwass.

(Lithuanian: Geri vyrai gerą girą girioj gere.)

 How much wood would a woodchuck chuck if a woodchuck could chuck wood?
(Latin: Quantum materiae materietur marmota monax si marmota manax materiam possit materiari?)

 I would rather be in a ship at sea than a naughty boy in an apple tree.
(Latin: Malo malo malo malo.)

 Had I had the hat I had had, I would have had a hat too!
(Norwegian: Hadde jeg hatt den hatten jeg hadde hatt, så hadde jeg hatt en hatt jeg òg!)

 What bad weather again. You are almost blown off the road. You would be better off in the storehouse, with a little box of strawberries.
(Dutch: Wat een weer weer. Je waait haast van de weg weg. Je kunt beter in het magazijn zijn, met een doosje aardbeien bij je.)

 Better one goose neck than two chicken necks.
(Hungarian: Jobb egy lúdnyak két tyúknyaknál.)

 The magpie nests high. The goose nests low. The owl nests neither high nor low.
(French: La pie niche en haut,L'oie niche en bas,L'hibou niche ni haut ni bas.)

 Gohryeogoh uniforms are high quality uniforms; 
Gohryeogoh uniforms are high quality materials
(Korean: 고려고 교복은 고급 교복이고
고려고 교복은 고급 원단을 사용했다)

 The spotted chicken crows over and over; a stool falls upon it that it (the chicken) tumbles upside down.
(Javanese: Pitik blurik kluruk bolak balik ketiban dingklik tiba njempalik.)

 When Thomas' horse fell, How didn't Thomas fall? Has Thomas fallen, Or didn't he fall? Does he fall down, Or he suffer such gambols?
(French: Quand le cheval de Thomas tomba,
Comment Thomas ne tomba-t-il pas?
Thomas tomba-t-il
Ou ne tomba-t-il pas?
Tomba-t-il à bas
Ou patit-il a tel ébat?)

 roasted grams for the blind horse
(Kannada or Kanarese: kurudu kudarege hurida hurakadli)

 Horse cab driver Max is driving with chestnuts (horses) and is cheating with the cab fee.
(Swedish: Droskkusken Max kuskar med fuxar och fuskar med droskkusktaxan.)

 The driver sang every song he knew.
(Jersey: Lé cacheux chantait châque chanson qu'i connaîssait.)

 A starling sat on the starling-house and sang to the rooster: "You cannot sing like I do, I cannot sing like you do!
(Ukrainian: Сів шпак на шпаківню, заспівав шпак півню:
„Ти не вмієш так, як я, - так, як ти, не вмію я!”)

 Unfortunately he sang lots of loud songs to the lute.
(German: Er sang leider lauter laute Lieder zur Laute.)

 The driver sang every song he knew.
(Jersey: Lé cacheux chantait châque chanson qu'i connaîssait.)

 Mr. Malchi was sleeping in the concert. The songs aren't attractive any more, said Mr. Malchi, their author. My work is of no use.
(Hebrew: BAKONZERT MAR MALCHI NAM, HASHIRIM KAMAL CHINAM, SACH MAR MALCHI MALCHINAM, AMALI AMAL CHINAM.)


 A pruner was pruning a grapevine and another pruner that passed by there
asked him: "Pruner that prunes the grapevine, What grapevine do you
prune?" "Do you prune my grapevine or your grapevine do you prune?"
Neither do I prune your grapevine, nor my grapevine; that of my Uncle
Bartholomew I prune.

(Spanish: Un podador podaba la parra y otro podador que por allí pasaba le preguntó: Podador que podas la parra. ¿Qué parra podas? ¿Podas mi parra o tu parra podas? Ni podo tu parra, ni mi parra podo, que podo la parra de mi tío Bartolo.)

 A big demon chased a small demon; a small demon chased a big demon.
(Thai: ยักษ์ใหญ่ไล่ยักษ์เล็กÂ  ยักษ์เล็กไล่ยักษ์ใหญ่.)

 The cape, under the chair; under the chair, the cape. (To be said, at least, ten times in a row)
(Basque, Euskara or Euskera: Alkipean kapa, kapa alkipean; alkipean kapa, kapa alkipean. ...)

 The chair's leg got undone (broken)
(Greek, Modern: Της καρέκλας το ποδάρι ξεκαρεκλοποδαρώθηκε.)

 In the road called Kesthur, a fellow named "Kasthur Rangaray" had a wound due to a pistol and got tired and died.
(Kannada or Kanarese: kesthur rastheli kasthur rangarayaru pistul etu tindu susthagi sathbiddru)

 Fictional ancient Greek dish mentioned in Aristophanes' comedy "Assemblywomen" (Ἐκκλησιάζουσαι 1169); Name of a dish compounded of all kinds of dainties, fish, flesh, fowl, and sauces. (Henry George Liddell. Robert Scott. A Greek-English Lexicon. rev. and aug. throughout by. Sir Henry Stuart Jones. with the ass. of Roderick McKenzie. Oxford. Clarendon Press. 1940.)
(Greek, Ancient: λοπαδο-τεμαχο-σελαχο-γαλεο-κρανιο-λειψανο-δριμ-υπο-τριμματο-σιλφιο-
καραβο-μελιτο-κατακεχυ-μενο-κιχλ-επι-κοσσυφο-φαττο-περιστερ-αλεκτρυον-
οπτο-κεφαλλιο-κιγκλο-πελειο-λαγῳο-σιραιο-βαφη-τραγανο-πτερύγων)

 Thief Titus is thief Titus' father.
(Russian: Тать Тит татю Титу тятя.)

 Well, it really rains, Paul, but it only rains a little.
(Catalan: Com a ploure, prou que plou, Pau, però plou poc.)

 A candy made from sweet potato asked another candy made from sweet potato which candy is sweeter than a candy made from sweet potato. Then the candy made from sweet potato answered to the other candy made from sweet potato that a candy sweeter than a candy made from sweet potato is another candy made from sweet potato being sweeter then this candy made from sweet potato.
(Portuguese: Um doce de batata doce perguntou a um outro doce de batata doce qual o doce mais doce do que um doce de batata doce. Então, o doce de batata doce respondendo ao outro doce de batata doce disse que um doce mais doce do que um doce de batata doce é um outro doce de batata doce que esteja mais doce do que esse doce de batata doce.)

 A hunter who knows how to hunt went out without his hunting dog.
(French: Un chasseur sachant chasser chassait sans son chien de chasse.)

 Saka went to Saka to get his sack, but Saka doesn't care that Saka wants his sack.
(Bulgarian: Сака отиде при Сака да си сака сака, но Сака не сака да сака, че Сака си сака сака.)

 Down a ladder went a bifigafa with seven little bifigafos. A little bifigafo fell down. Because she went to get the little bifigafo, the bifigafa fell down.
(Spanish: Por una ladera abajo iba una bifigafa con siete bifigafitos. Se cayó un bifigafito. Por ir a coger al bifigafito se cayó la bifigafa.)

 Murali went to Olari to study kalari (martial art)
(Malayalam: olariyil murali kalari padikkaan poi)

 Down a ladder went a bifigafa with seven little bifigafos. A little bifigafo fell down. Because she went to get the little bifigafo, the bifigafa fell down.
(Spanish: Por una ladera abajo iba una bifigafa con siete bifigafitos. Se cayó un bifigafito. Por ir a coger al bifigafito se cayó la bifigafa.)

 One lamb, "serella", "merella" [nonsense words which play with "mesell", green person], woolly, full of wool, head and
crowned has six little lambs serells, merells, woolly, full of wool, head and crowned. If the lamb hadn't been serella, merella, woolly, full of wool, head and crowned, its little lambs wouldn't have been serells, merells, woolly, full of wool, head and crowned.
(Catalan: Una ovella, serella, merella, llanuda, llanada cap i coronada tenia sis corderets serells, merells, llanuts, llanats, cap i coronats. Si la ovella no haguera sigut serella, merella, llanuda, llanada cap i coronada, els seus corderets no haurien sigut serells, merells, llanuts, llanats, cap i coronats.)

 The stone splits the goat's head in four, as the goat too had split the stone in four.
(Romanian: Piatra crapă capul caprei în patru, cum a crăpat şi capra piatra în patru.)

 Neighing neighed Swedish horses in the North of River Zvirgzdupite. zvirgzdi = stone chippings, upite = a little river.
(Latvian or Lettish: Zviegtin zviedza zviedru zirgi Zvirgzdupītes ziemeļos.)

 The black bull-hoof knocks on the chequered pharmacy stone floor.
(Hungarian: Fekete bikapata kopog a pepita patika köveken.)

 Dialogue: (A) Did the rabbit pass through the door? (B) It did. (A) Did you catch it? (B) I did. (A) Did you carve it? (B) I did. (A) Did you salt it? (B) I did. (A) Did you cook it? (B) I did. (A) Did you leave some for me? (B) I did. (A) Which cupboard did you put it in? (B) The click-click one. (A) So bring it? (B) I can't. (A) Why? (B) Black cats have eaten it. (A) uhh..ohh..Meuww.
(Turkish: Kapıdan tavşan geçti mi?GeçtiTuttun mu?TuttumKestin mi?KestimTuzladım mı?TuzladımPişirdin mi?PişirdimBana ayırdın mı?AyırdımHangi dolaba koydun?Çık çık dolaba koydumHaydi al getirGetirememNeden getirimezsin?Kara kediler yemiş.Vayı vay, miyav.)

 A Chinese lady brings sugar in ceramic bowl.
(Urdu: aik chinee aurat ne chinee kay pialay main chinee lai)

 Friends, bring friends, eat, leave!
(Greek, Modern: Φίλε, φέρε φίλους, φάτε, φύγετε!)

 Phool brought flowers for me. I said proudly "Why did you bring the flowers? You are a flower yourself.
(Urdu: phool ley ker phool aya phool ker may nay kaha, phool kyoon laay ho sahib tum to khud hi phool ho)

 Parra had a dog, Guerra had a grapevine. Parra's dog climbed on Guerra's grapevine. Guerra hit Parra's dog with a club. And Parra said to Guerra: "Why has Guerra hit Parra's dog with a club?" And Guerra answered: "If Parra's dog wouldn't have climbed on the grapevine of Guerra, Guerra wouldn't have hit Parra's dog with a club.
(Spanish: Parra tenía una perra. Guerra tenía una parra. La perra de Parra subió a la parra de Guerra. Guerra pegó con la porra a la perra de Parra. Y Parra le dijo a Guerra: -¿Por qué ha pegado Guerra con la porra a la perra de Parra? Y Guerra le contestó: -Si la perra de Parra no hubiera subido a la parra de Guerra, Guerra no hubiese pegado con la porra a la perra de Parra.)

 My sister said, my toenails are dirty. Then I shaped my dirty toenails.

(Malay: Kakak ku kata, kuku kaki ku kotor. Ku kikis kuku kotor kaki ku.)

 A pastry chef who made pastries at the house of a tapestry maker who papered, said one day to the tapestry maker who papered: is it better to make pastries at a tapestry maker's who papers or to paper at a pastry chef's who makes pastries.
(French: Un pâtissier qui pâtissait chez un tapissier qui tapissait, dit un jour au tapissier qui tapissait: vaut-il mieux pâtisser chez un tapissier qui tapisse ou tapisser chez un pâtissier qui pâtisse?)

 That saying, that they said that you said that I said, that saying I didn't say, because if I would have said it would have been well said for having been said by me.
(Spanish: Ese dicho, que me han dicho, que tu has dicho, que yo he dicho, ese dicho no lo he dicho porque si lo hubiera dicho, ese dicho estaria bien dicho por haberlo dicho yo.)

 Once I knew someone (a boy),
who knew someone (a girl) 
who had had a child, 
which she had not had from him.
Because he was no longer able. 
But she had known another (boy),
who still had beens able! 
And if she had not had known him, 
she would not have had that child.
(German: I han amôl oin kennd khedd,
der hôdd oine kennd.
Dui hôdd a Kend khedd,
dees hôdd se abbr edd vo sällam khedd.
Där hot nemmlich nemme kennd khedd,
se hôdd abbr nô an andara kennd khedd.
Där hôdd nô kennd khedd.
Ond wenns se deen nedd khennd hedd,
nô hedd se koi Kend khedd.)

 When your heart hurts, it does not feel like telling its agony to anyone, nor is it willing to listen anyone. On the other hand when your heart is listening to someone's agony, it does not feel bad, nor does it cause pain to anyone.
(Panjabi or Punjabi: Dil dikhda dukhre na sunda na sunanda
sunde sunde dukhre dil dukhda no dukhanda)

 Cough like you coughed earlier.
(Welsh: Pesychwch fel y pesychasoch gynt.)

 Mama washed Mila with soap. Mila did not like soap.
(Russian: Мама мыла Милу мылом. Мила мыло не любила.)

 Her's to us! Who's like us? Dammn few and they are all dead.
(Scots or Scottisch: Here's tae us!Wha's like us?Dammn few, an they're all deid.)

 Behind the dead tree, I ate honey and dry grass.
(Spanish: Detrás del palo seco comí miel y hierba seca.)

 Who ate the rum omelet? Cosaks, equal in beauty, smoking like Swiss people and strong at their post.
(French: Quies qui jam angelum laetorum? Sed equos ac ego ambo te, fumans cum de suis et solido post.
"Qui est-ce qui a mangé l'omelette au rhum? C'est des cosaques, égaux en beauté, fumant comme des suisses et solides au poste.")

 Her's to us! Who's like us? Dammn few and they are all dead.
(Scots or Scottisch: Here's tae us!Wha's like us?Dammn few, an they're all deid.)

 Give (it) to us so we can have (it) in order to pass (it) on to Tapu.
(Swahili: Tupe tupate, tumtupie Tapu)

 Please, gradmother give birth to your children so that when taken to court they will all say they are yours.
(Kikuyu: Cucu ciara ciana ciaku ciothe ciathie cira ciuge ciari ciaku ciothe.)

 I'll give you a blow on one of your eyes and on your other eye I'll also give you a blow.
(German: Isch haach der aans uff dei aan Aach un uff dei anner Aach haach isch der aach aans.)

 A friend gave a rose with leaves to a friend. Friend keep the leaves don't give them to another friend.
(Greek, Modern: Φίλος έδωσε σε φίλο τριαντάφυλλο με φίλο. 
Φίλε φύλαγε το φύλλο, μην το δώσεις σε άλλο φίλο.)

 A Constantinopolean violin box maker's friend

(Norwegian: En Konstantinopeliansk fiolinkassemakersvenn)

 Piu (common name), who was mason, when making a well lost a foot. His friend Pau (Paul) said, "Pol (another form for Paul), Piu has one foot in the well.
(Catalan: En Piu que manobra fou,
fent un pou va perdre un peu,
el seu amic Pau digué,
Pol en Piu té un peu al pou.)

 Frans said in French to Frans: "Is Frans Frans in French?" "No", said Frans to Frans in French, "Frans in French is not Frans, Frans in French is François.
(Dutch: Frans zei tegen Frans in het Frans: "Is Frans in het Frans Frans?"  "Nee", zei Frans tegen Frans in het Frans, "Frans in het Frans is niet Frans, Frans in het Frans is François.)

 Didì said to Didò: "Didò tell Didù to tell Didì what Didì told Didò".
(Italian: Didì disse a Didò: "Didò dì a Didù di dire a Didì ciò che Didì disse a Didò".)

 When your heart hurts, it does not feel like telling its agony to anyone, nor is it willing to listen anyone. On the other hand when your heart is listening to someone's agony, it does not feel bad, nor does it cause pain to anyone.
(Panjabi or Punjabi: Dil dikhda dukhre na sunda na sunanda
sunde sunde dukhre dil dukhda no dukhanda)

 The Dung's in the east of the town has a gourd bigger than the
watermelon of the Si's in the west of the town. On the other hand, the
gourd of the Dung's is a little bit bigger than that of the Dung's [N.B.
another Dung] in the east of the town. 
Literally: someone (1-2) / say, rumour (3) / east of the town [the east gate]
(4-5) / Dung's [the family of Dung] (6-7) / [genitive word] (8) / gourd
['winter gourd'] (9-10) / bigger than (11-12) / west of the town [the west
gate] (13-14) / Si's [the family of Si] (15-16) / [genitive word] (17) /
water melon (18-19) / as well, also (20) / bigger than (21-22) / east of
the town [the east gate] (23-24) / Dung's [the family of Dung, N.B.
another Dung] (25-26) / [genitive word] (27) / gourd ['winter gourd']
(28-29) / [interjection, meaning scantily, a little bit]
(Chinese, Yue or Cantonese: 人地話︰東門董家個冬瓜大過西門施家個西瓜又大過東門東家個冬瓜0的。)

 When your heart hurts, it does not feel like telling its agony to anyone, nor is it willing to listen anyone. On the other hand when your heart is listening to someone's agony, it does not feel bad, nor does it cause pain to anyone.
(Panjabi or Punjabi: Dil dikhda dukhre na sunda na sunanda
sunde sunde dukhre dil dukhda no dukhanda)

 Our sugar canes broke our sugar canes' basket. Could your sugar canes brake your sugar canes' basket like our sugar canes did?
(Arabic: kasab afasna kasar afas asabna ye2dar asab afaskom yeksar afas asabkom zay ma asab afasna kasar afas asabna?)

 Lion-Eating Poet in the Stone Room.
Mr. Shi, the poet from a stone room, likes to eat lions. He promises solemnly, that he will eat ten lions. Regularly he goes to the market to look at the lions. ...
(Chinese, Mandarin: 施氏食獅史
石室詩士施氏，嗜獅，誓食十獅。
氏時時適市視獅。
十時，適十獅適市。
是時，適施氏適市。
氏視是十獅，恃矢勢，使是十獅逝世。
氏拾是十獅屍，適石室。
石室濕，氏使侍拭石室。
石室拭，氏始試食是十獅。
食時，始識是十獅，實十石獅屍。
試釋是事。)

 The child saw a frog and ran, told the sibling to run away, the sibling refused to run away, took a stick to hit the frog, the frog ran away and hid under a stone.
(Kikuyu: Kana koona kora koora kera kana kao koore, kana kao karega kuura kooya kamuti karige kora, kora koora keehitha kahigaini.)

 Three round raw tubes and three round raw deer livers teach people to talk the right way.
German: Drei runde rohe Röhrchen und drei runde ruhe Rehleber lehren Leuten recht reden.
(German: Drüi rundi roui Röhrli und drüi rundi roui Rehläberli lehre d Lüüt rächt rede.)

 The right scratches the left; The left scratches the right.
French: La droite gratte la gauche; La gauche gratte la droite.
(Fulah, Fulani or Peulh: Nyaamo nyaanya nano
Nano nyaanya nyaamo)

 A goat climbed upon a stone, so that the stone broke in four pieces; May the goat's head break in four as the stone broke in four. German: Die Ziege ist auf den Stein gestiegen, so ist der Stein in vier Teile gebrochen; So wie der Stein soll auch der Kopf der Ziege in vier Teile brechen.
(Romanian: S-a suit capra pe piatra si a spart-o-n patru, de s-ar sparge capul caprei ca si piatra-n patru.)

 Bright white stone, brighter than the sun.
(Greek, Modern: Άσπρη πέτρα ξέξασπρη κι απ' τον ήλιο ξεξασπρότερη.)

 White rock is white and smooth. Bring white rock to build a white pagoda. The white pagoda is built of white rock. Build the white pagoda with white rock. When the building of the white rock pagoda is completed, the white pagoda is white and smooth.
(Chinese, Yue or Cantonese: 白石白又滑
搬來白石搭白塔
白石塔白石搭
白石搭白塔
搭好白石塔
白塔白又滑)

 Red lorry and white lorry.
(Telugu: Yerra Lorry Tella Lorry.)

 four black lorries and six red lorries
(Telugu: naalugu nalla lorrylu, aaru erra lorrylu.)

 Six casks, six cases: the hand between cases, the finger in the cask's mouth.
Six casks, six cases: the finger in the cask's mouth, the hand between cases.
(French: Six fûts, six caisses: la main entre les caisses, le doigt dans le trou du fût.
Six fûts, six caisses: le doigt dans le trou du fût, la main entre les caisses.)

 One rooster, two chicken, three ducks, four geese, five pigs, six cows, seven oxen, eight nuns, nine knobby, hunchbacked beggar women are spending the night with ten Costantinoplean bagpipe-maker assistants.
(German: Ein Hahn, zwei Hühner, drei Enten, vier Gänse, fünf Schweine, sechs Kühe, sieben Ochsen, acht Nonnen, neun huckelicke, buckelige Bettelmannsweiber übernachten bei zehn konstantinopolitanischen Dudelsackpfeifenmachergesellen.)

 Two peppers in oil. Italian; Due peperoni all'olio.
(Italian: Dui purun bagnà nt'öli)

 One peppercorn in a copper pan, two pepperkorns in a copper pan, two pepperkorns in a copper pan, ...
(Swedish: Ett pepparkorn i en kopparpanna, två pepparkorn i en kopparpanna, tre pepparkorn i en kopparpanna, fyra ..., fem ..., sex ..., sju ..., åtta ..., nio ....)

 Eaves, opposite, eaves, opposite, eaves, opposite ...
(Czech: Okap, opak, okap, opak, okap, opak ...)

 orangutan baby or hippopotamus baby, orangutan baby and hippopotamus baby, orangutan baby or hippopotamus baby ...
(Lithuanian: orangutangiukas ar hipopotamiukas,
orangutangiukas ir hipopotamiukas,
orangutangiukas ar hipopotamiukas ...)

 Fat nieces are composing poetry in thick spruce thicket, ...
(German: Dicke Nichten dichten im dichten Fichtendickicht. Im dichten Fichtendickicht dichten dicke Nichten.)

 Seven small anchovies were tightly packed in small cans ...  poor things!
(Italian: Sette acciughette se ne stavano strette strettenelle scatolette ... poverette)

 If you idiot say idiot to me idiot, ...
(German: Wenn du Trottl zu mir Trottl Trottl sagst, sag ich Trottl zu dir Trottl so lange Trottl, bis du Trottl zu mir Trottl nie mehr Trottl sagst, du Trottl!)

 Rowboat, bread with butter, ...
(German: Ruderboot, Butterbrot, Ruderboot, Butterbrot, Ruderboot, Butterbrot, ...)

 Hey! ... are you messing with Netturaan
(Malayalam: hum! ... ee netturaanodanoda ninde kali.)

 orangutan baby or hippopotamus baby, orangutan baby and hippopotamus baby, orangutan baby or hippopotamus baby ...
(Lithuanian: orangutangiukas ar hipopotamiukas,
orangutangiukas ir hipopotamiukas,
orangutangiukas ar hipopotamiukas ...)


 Eaves, opposite, eaves, opposite, eaves, opposite ...
(Czech: Okap, opak, okap, opak, okap, opak ...)

 cuckoo-dove turtle-dove, cuckoo dove turtle-dove, cuckoo-dove turtle-dove ...
(Malay: Tekukur ketitir, tekukur ketitir, tekukur ketitir ...)

 Cuka (Vinegar), kicap (soy sauce), ...
(Malay: Cuka, kicap, cuka, kicap, cuka, kicap, ...)

 She placed the Czech matchbox on the table. ...
(German: Sie stellte das Tschechische Streichholzschächtelchen auf den Tisch. Auf den Tisch stellte sie das Tschechische Streichholzschächtelchen.)

 Their places of the Llers valley.
(Catalan: Els llurs llocs de les valls de Llers.)

 Who placed (this) bamboo (pole) against this bamboo hedge?
(Japanese: Kono takegaki ni dare take tatekaketa.)

 If you take one fish paral (Poondius maricola) and roll it into a ball and place it on an ural, will the paral roll or will the ural roll?
(Malayalam: Oru paral urulan paraline eduthu urutty oru uralinmel vachal uralurulumo? paralurulumo?)

 Take two sets of three chicken cackles add them together and they make six chicken cackles.
(Japanese: Hyoko pyoko pyoko mi pyoko pyoko Awasete pyoko pyoko mu pyoko pyoko.)

 The six chips chipped by the Carpenter were mere chips.
(Malayalam: Aasari chethiya Aaru poolu verum poole)

 Good day madam sausage-seller, how much are those six sausages? I sell them for six sous (old French monetary unit), six sous here, six sous there, six sous the sausages there.
(French: Bonjour madame la saucissière,combien vendez vous ces six saucisses la?Je les vends six sous, six sous ci, six sous ça, six sous ces six saucisses la.)

 The boasting crane boasted of drinking some good kvass in a good forest.
(Lithuanian: Gervė gyrūnė gyrėsi gerą girą geroj girioj gerai gėrusi.)

 The beaver is good to the little beavers.
(Russian: Добр бобр для бобрят.)


 Little John: I havent seen a billy goat with horns as twisted as Matarrapeis one. (To be said time after time)
(Basque, Euskara or Euskera: Juanikotxu: akerra Matarrapeiko aker adar okerragorik eztot nik ikusi.)

 A black sweatshirt and a little black bag with sixtysix sausages in Sächsische Straße (a street in Berlin).
(German: Ein schwarzes Sweatshirt und ein schwarzes Täschchen mit sechsundsechzig Würstchen in der Sächsischen Straße.)

 The mottled quail is mottled but the little quail chickens are more mottled than the mottled quail.
(Romanian: E pestriţă prepeliţa pestriţă, dar mai pestriţi sunt puii prepeliţei pestriţe.)

 The beaver is good to the little beavers.
(Russian: Добр бобр для бобрят.)

 Four black dirty little devils drew a drawing with black ink.
(Russian: Четыре чёрненких чумазеньких чертёнка чертили чёрными чернилами чертёж.)


 Nicholas' child saw a little frog hide, when the little frog saw Nicholas' child hide, the little frog hid.
(Kikuyu: Kana ka Nikora kona kora kora, nako kora kona kana ka Nikora kora.)

 A little later, Aman will court wealthy Maya probably in front of many people.
(Tagalog or Filipino: Mayamaya'y mamamanhikan si Aman sa mayamang si Maya malamang sa harap ng maraming mamamayan.)

 Oh man, oh man such a lot of people, the people said to the people, when the people saw the other people.
(Dutch: Mensen, mensen wat een mensen zeiden de mensen tegen de mensen toen de mensen de mensen zagen staan.)

 There once were two nightwatchmen, a before-midnight-nightwatchman and an after-midnight-nightwatchman. The before-midnight-nightwtchman said to the after-midnight-nightwatchman: "If you take the before-midnight-nightwatch, I'll take the after-midnight-nighttwatch." "Okay" said the after-midnight-nightwatchman to the before-midnight-nightwatchman "I'll take the before-midnight-nightwatch en then you take the after-midnight-nightwatch." and so it happened that the before-midnight-nightwatchman took the after-midnight-nightwatch and the after-midnight-nightwatchman took the before-midnight-nightwatch.
(Dutch: Er waren eens twee nachtwachten, een voor-middernacht-nachtwacht en een na-middernacht-nachtwacht.  De voor-middernacht-nachtwacht zei tegen de na-middernacht-nachtwacht: "Als jij de voor-middernacht-nachtwacht waakt, waak ik de na-middernacht-nachtwacht." "oke" zei de na-middernacht-nachtwacht tegen de voor-middernacht-nachtwacht  "Ik waak de voor-middernacht-nachtwacht en dan waak jij de na-middernacht-nachtwacht."  Zo kwam het dat de voor-middernacht-nachtwacht de na-middernacht-nachtwacht waakte  en de na-middernacht-nachtwacht de voor-middernacht-nachtwacht waakte.)

 Two astronauts chewed and chwed while the gathered blue-green moonstones.
(German: Zwei Astronauten kauten und kauten während sie blaugrüne Mondsteine klaubten.)

 Under the Araba priest´s hat, two beans.
(Basque, Euskara or Euskera: Arabako abadearen kapelapean baba-garau bi.)

 Fourty mice walked along. They carried fourty pennies. Two broader mice carried two pennies each.
(Russian: Шли сорок мышей Несли сорок грошей. Две мыши поплоше Несли по два гроша.)

 One rooster, two chicken, three ducks, four geese, five pigs, six cows, seven oxen, eight nuns, nine knobby, hunchbacked beggar women are spending the night with ten Costantinoplean bagpipe-maker assistants.
(German: Ein Hahn, zwei Hühner, drei Enten, vier Gänse, fünf Schweine, sechs Kühe, sieben Ochsen, acht Nonnen, neun huckelicke, buckelige Bettelmannsweiber übernachten bei zehn konstantinopolitanischen Dudelsackpfeifenmachergesellen.)

 We long for 88 beautiful nights by 88 beautiful canals.
(Dutch: Wij smachten naar achtentachtig prachtige nachten bij achtentachtig prachtige grachten.)

 Tonight is the night before tuesday, and tomorrow is tuesday. These three days and those three days, all of the three days are tuesdays. (nonesense)
(Persian or Farsi: Emshab shabe seshanbas, farda shabam seshanbas. In se se shabo oon se se shab, har se se shab seshanbas.)

 The lieutenant of Leuthen ordered his people not to ring before the lieutenant of Leuthen ordered his people to ring.
(German: Der Leutnant von Leuthen befahl seinen Leuten, nicht eher zu läuten als der Leutnant von Leuthen seinen Leuten das Läuten befahl.)

 What was laundry before laundry was laundry? Before laundy was laundry, it was clean.
(Dutch: Wat was was voordat was was was? 
Voordat was was was, was was schoon.)

 When mother was doing the laundry, a bee joined (her), which (then) flew away, underneath the door, across the road.
(Dutch: Toen moeder aan de was was, kwam er een bij bij, die vloog onder de deur 'deur', over de weg weg.)

 Five heaps of hemp before the brook, five heaps of hemp across the brook.
(Czech: Před potokem pět kop konopí, za potokem pět kop konopí.)



 From the top of the sky, falls the crane's egg, smashes five pieces of marble, marble with black paint, black marble.
(Greek, Modern: Από τα ύψη τ΄ ουρανού
πέφτει τ΄ αυγό του γερανού,
τσακίζει πέντε μάρμαρα,
μαρμαρομαυρομάρμαρα, μαυρομάρμαρα.)

 Tetramethyldiparadiaminobenzophenol, from now on you will value it at 200 francs the kilogram, because Mr. Millerand wants that to be the lot of all black antraquinon (dyes).
(French: Tetramethyldiparadiaminobenzophenol, vous vaudrez désormais 200 francs le kilo, car monsieur Millerand veut que tel soit le lot de tous les noirs anthraquinones.)

 Dialogue: (A) Did the rabbit pass through the door? (B) It did. (A) Did you catch it? (B) I did. (A) Did you carve it? (B) I did. (A) Did you salt it? (B) I did. (A) Did you cook it? (B) I did. (A) Did you leave some for me? (B) I did. (A) Which cupboard did you put it in? (B) The click-click one. (A) So bring it? (B) I can't. (A) Why? (B) Black cats have eaten it. (A) uhh..ohh..Meuww.
(Turkish: Kapıdan tavşan geçti mi?GeçtiTuttun mu?TuttumKestin mi?KestimTuzladım mı?TuzladımPişirdin mi?PişirdimBana ayırdın mı?AyırdımHangi dolaba koydun?Çık çık dolaba koydumHaydi al getirGetirememNeden getirimezsin?Kara kediler yemiş.Vayı vay, miyav.)

 Seven cats' heads in each sack.
(French Creole: Sèt tèt chat nan chak sak.)

 Seven nurses took care of seven seasick sea-men on the ship Shanghai.
(Swedish: Sju sjuksköterskor skötte sju sjösjuka sjömen på skeppet Shangai.)

 Behind grandmother's little hut seven beetroots grow very close together.
(Dutch: Achter grootmoeders hutje groeien zeven krootjes op een klutje.)

 Little children cannot crack cherry stones.
(German: Kleine Kinder können keine kleinen Kirschkerne knacken. Kleine Kirschkerne können kleine Kinder keine knacken.)

 Chandu's wise uncle fed a tasty pickle of tamarind to chandu's wicked aunt four times by polished silver spoon in the Chandni-chowk of Chalisgaon town.
(Marathi: )

 One, two, three, four. It was at 24th street where the woman broke the dish, the dish melted and the woman died.
(Portuguese: Um dois três quatro foi na rua vinte e quatro que a mulher partiu o prato, o prato derreteu e a mulher morreu.)



 Windows shake because windows shake. Because of windows shaking there is a lot of shaking. Because of a lot of shaking, windows shake.
(Urdu: Khirkyon ke bajne se khirkati hai khirkiyah. Khirkyon ke bajne se bajta hai kharaksingh. Kharaksingh ke bajne se khartkti hai khirkiyan.)

 (A) puff-adder has been killed, coco-yam has been spread (for sale). Because I was watching the killing of the puff-adder I could not collect some coco-yam.
(Hausa: An kashe kasa an kasa gwaza.
Garin kallon kisan kasa na kasa kwashe kashin gwaza.)

 Leroy's watch broke into pieces.
(Tagalog or Filipino: Ang lero ni Leroy ay nagka luray-luray.)

 I would like to see you once dare to stand to stand watch.
(Dutch: Ik had je wel eens hebben willen zien durven blijven staan kijken.)

 The best would be if you carry the most beautiful box and the slimmest shovel into the next barn as soon as you can. German: Am besten schleppst du das schönste Schächtelchen und die schlankeste Schaufel so schnell es geht in den nächsten Schuppen.
(German: 'S beschd schlääwsch' 's schännschd Schächdelche unn 's schlänggschd Schibbche 's schnellschd in 's neggschd Schäbbche.)

 We came to the tinker when the tinker was mending pots with his nine tinker's daughters and the the tinker's old woman was carrying water in a mended pot. French: Nous sommes allés chez le chaudronnier, quand le chaudronnier répare les chaudrons avec ses neuf fils de chaudronnier, mais la vieille femme du chaudronnier leur apporte de l'eau avec des chaudrons rapiécés.
(Croatian, Serbian and Bosnian: Odosmo u kotlokrpa, kad kotlokrp kotle krpi sa svojih devet kotlokrpica, a stara im kotlokrpovka kotlokrpavim kotlovima vodu nosi.)

 The little worm called Irmchen carrying a little umbrella below its little arm is standing on the top of a little tower. There appears a weak storm that blows away the little worm called Irmchen with the little umbrella below its little arm away from the little tower, that poor little worm called Irmchen. German: Das Würmchen Irmchen steht mit dem Schirmchen unter dem Ärmchen auf dem Türmchen. Da kommt ein Stürmchen und weht das Würmchen Irmchen mit dem Schirmchen unter dem Ärmchen von seinem Türmchen, das arme Würmchen Irmchen.
(German: 's Wermche Ermche schdehd mimm Scherrmche unnerm Ärmche uwwm Dermche. Kommd e Schdermche unn bloosd's Wermche Ermche mimm Schermche unnerm Ärmche vumm Dermche, 's arm Wermche Ermche.)

 German: Sitzt ein Würmchen auf dem Türmchen mit einem Schirmchen unter dem Ärmchen, kommt ein Stürmchen und bläst das Würmchen mit dem Schirmchen unter dem Ärmchen vom Türmchen
(German: Sitzt e Wörmsche uff'm Törmsche mim Schermsche unnerm Ärmsche, kemmts Störmsche un blässt's Wörmsche mim Schermsche unner'm Ärmsche vom Törmsche.)

 The little worm called Irmchen carrying a little umbrella below its little arm is standing on the top of a little tower. There appears a weak storm that blows away the little worm called Irmchen with the little umbrella below its little arm away from the little tower, that poor little worm called Irmchen. German: Das Würmchen Irmchen steht mit dem Schirmchen unter dem Ärmchen auf dem Türmchen. Da kommt ein Stürmchen und weht das Würmchen Irmchen mit dem Schirmchen unter dem Ärmchen von seinem Türmchen, das arme Würmchen Irmchen.
(German: 's Wermche Ermche schdehd mimm Scherrmche unnerm Ärmche uwwm Dermche. Kommd e Schdermche unn bloosd's Wermche Ermche mimm Schermche unnerm Ärmche vumm Dermche, 's arm Wermche Ermche.)

 Little children cannot crack cherry stones.
(German: Kleine Kinder können keine kleinen Kirschkerne knacken. Kleine Kirschkerne können kleine Kinder keine knacken.)

 Grandmother all children of school drank tea and finished.
(Kikuyu: Cucu ciana ciothe cia cukuru cianyua cai cianina.)

 Children, go home with Dzislawek's grandfather! German: Geht, Kinder, mit Dźisławkecs Großvater heim!
(Sorbian, Upper: Dźiće, dźěći, z Dźisławkec dźědom dom!)

 Hey Toni, go down, or I will hit you down! If Toni doesn't go down, I will take Toni and hit him down. German: He Toni, geh hinunter! Geht der Toni nicht hinunter, dann pack ich den Toni und hau ihn um.
(German: Geh Toni geh dauni, sonst hau i di dauni! Geht da Toni ned dauni, nimm i in Toni und hau eam dauni, daß da Toni dauni fliagt.)

 That sheep is hers, I take it.
(Romanian: Oaia aia e a ei, eu i-o iau.)

 I open the furniture and take the fruit/orange section, I close the furniture and drop the fruit section.
(Sicilian: Grapo u stipo e pigghio u spicchio, chiuio u stipo e poso u spicchio.)

 That was close, said the priest, when the priest's horse stepped on the sock of the priest.
(Norwegian: Det var nesten, sa presten, da hesten til presten tråkket på lesten til presten.)

 The cat scratches the curls from the steps.
(Dutch: De kat krabt de krullen van de trap.)

 A big fat grey cat in a big fat grey hole.
(Jersey: Un gros gras gris cat dans un gros gras gris creux.)

 I have roasted the quail and eaten it, I even tried a pastry made of quail stomach fat. German: Ich habe Wachtel gebraten und gegessen, ich habe sogar ein Gebaeck aus Wachtelmagenfett probiert.
(Georgian or Kartveli: მწყერი ვწვი და მწყერი ვჭამე, მწყერის კუჭის ქონის ქადაც მიჭამია)

 What a shame to try to touch, to suck the tits of Aunty when Uncle is not there ...
(French: C'est pas beau mais tentant de tenter de tâter, de téter les tétons de tata quand tonton n'est pas là.)

 A librarian with a diploma ...
(German: Eine Diplombibliothekarin ist Bibliothekarin mit Diplom, eine Bibliothekarin mit Diplom ist eine Diplombibliothekarin.)

 Goat's beard, ...
(Welsh: Barf gafr, barf gafr, barf gafr, ...)

 Lorry, lorry, lorry, ... (Truck in American English)
(Malay: Lori, lori, lori, lori, ...)

 ... you are blind in your ears, your mind and your eyes.
(Greek, Modern: ... τυφλός τα τ' ώτα, τον τε νουν, τα τ' όμματ' εί.)

 I'll give you a blow on one of your eyes and on your other eye I'll also give you a blow.
(German: Isch haach der aans uff dei aan Aach un uff dei anner Aach haach isch der aach aans.)

 Do you want an egg now? If you don't want it now, I'll give it to you tomorrow.
(Italian: I wew j'ew mew? Sì 'nni wew mew, t'ij deng adduman.)

 A friend gave a rose with leaves to a friend. Friend keep the leaves don't give them to another friend.
(Greek, Modern: Φίλος έδωσε σε φίλο τριαντάφυλλο με φίλο. 
Φίλε φύλαγε το φύλλο, μην το δώσεις σε άλλο φίλο.)

 A tiny vole poked the tummy of another tiny vole, then the tiny vole who got his tummy poked also poked the tummy of the tiny vole who had poked his tummy.
(Hungarian: Egy icike-picike pocok pocakon pöckölt egy másik icike-picike pockot, mire a pocakon pöckölt icike-picike pocok is jól pocakon pöckölte az őt pocakon pöckölő icike-picike pockot.)

 Chandu's wise uncle fed a tasty pickle of tamarind to chandu's wicked aunt four times by polished silver spoon in the Chandni-chowk of Chalisgaon town.
(Marathi: )

 Seven small anchovies were tightly packed in small cans ...  poor things!
(Italian: Sette acciughette se ne stavano strette strettenelle scatolette ... poverette)

 On the butcher's shop sign the space between "Cheese" and "and" and "and" and "Sausage" was to small.
(German: Auf des Fleischhauers Schild war der Abstand zwischen "Käse" und "und" und "und" und "Wurst" zu klein geraten.)

 Sometimes there are spaces between gaps and gaps between the gaps.
(Estonian: Vahetevahel on ka vahede vahel ja nende vahede vahel asuvatel vahedel vahed vahel.)

 Like ” Fruit and Vegetables” but with bigger spaces between Fruit and and and and and Vegetables!
(Swedish: Som ”Frukt och Grönt” men med större mellanrum mellan Frukt och och och och och Grönt!)

 The traditional names of the clan MacLean are like a dog slurping soup: (said under breath) Hector, Lachlann, Lachlann, Hector, Hector, Lachlann, Charles. Hector, Lachlann, Lachlann, Hector, Hector, Lachlann, Charles.
(Scottish Gaelic: Mar chù ag ol eanbhruich, tha ainmean Chloinn 'Ill Eathain: (fon anail) Eachann, Lachann, Lachann, Eachann, Eachann, Lachann, Teàrlach. Eachann, Lachann, Lachann, Eachann, Eachann, Lachann, Teàrlach.)

 Who ate the rum omelet? Cosaks, equal in beauty, smoking like Swiss people and strong at their post.
(French: Quies qui jam angelum laetorum? Sed equos ac ego ambo te, fumans cum de suis et solido post.
"Qui est-ce qui a mangé l'omelette au rhum? C'est des cosaques, égaux en beauté, fumant comme des suisses et solides au poste.")

 Why did féfé have fifi have fofo make strong coffee, why?
(French Creole: Ka féfé fè fifi fè fofo fè kafé for fè?)

 The Archbishop of Parangaricutirimicuaro wants to be the Archbishop of Parangaricutirimicuaro no more, the one who makes The Archbishop of Parangaricutirimicuaro an Archbishop of Parangaricutirimicuaro no more will be a good at it and will be paid for making The Archbishop of Parangaricutirimicuaro an Archbishop of Parangaricutirimicuaro no more.
(Spanish: El arzobispo de Parangaricutirimicuaro se quiere desarzobisparangaricutirimicuarizar, aquel que lo desarzobisparangaricutirimicuarice un buen desarzobisparangaricutirimicuarizador será, y se le pagará por su dezarsobisparangaricutirimicuarizadura.)

 You turned out to be one of those whom we may not be able to quickly make a person who makes other people unsuccessful

(Turkish: muvaffakiyetsizleştiricileştiriveremeyebileceklerimizdenmişsiniz)

 Once I knew someone (a boy),
who knew someone (a girl) 
who had had a child, 
which she had not had from him.
Because he was no longer able. 
But she had known another (boy),
who still had beens able! 
And if she had not had known him, 
she would not have had that child.
(German: I han amôl oin kennd khedd,
der hôdd oine kennd.
Dui hôdd a Kend khedd,
dees hôdd se abbr edd vo sällam khedd.
Där hot nemmlich nemme kennd khedd,
se hôdd abbr nô an andara kennd khedd.
Där hôdd nô kennd khedd.
Ond wenns se deen nedd khennd hedd,
nô hedd se koi Kend khedd.)

 A goat cannot eat coconut because it cannot climb up a ladder to reach the coconuts up in the coconut tree.
(Swahili: Mbuzi hali nazi kwa vile hawezi kupanda ngazi ndipo azifikie nazi.)

 Who can repeat this seven times: "a goat is eating a black thorn" (to be repeated seven times in one breath)
(Croatian, Serbian and Bosnian: Tko će reći sedam puta "koza brsti crn trn" (napomena: ponoviti sedam puta u jednom dahu))

 As time passed, the wall decayed, a hole appeared in which a rat settled; A cat saw it, the rat fled, the cat followed, the rat was caught.
(French: Temps passa, mur usa, creux s'y fit, rat s'y mit; chat l'y vit, rat s'enfuit; chat suivit, rat fut pris.)

 (?) Nazar saw Nazar carefully
(Urdu: Nazar ney nazar ko nazar bhar key deykha, Nazar ki nazar ko nazar lag gai)

 Heaven, if this is known these cares are without success.
(French: Ciel, si ceci se sait ces soins sont sans succès.)

 Seven nurses took care of seven seasick sea-men on the ship Shanghai.
(Swedish: Sju sjuksköterskor skötte sju sjösjuka sjömen på skeppet Shangai.)

 Saka went to Saka to get his sack, but Saka doesn't care that Saka wants his sack.
(Bulgarian: Сака отиде при Сака да си сака сака, но Сака не сака да сака, че Сака си сака сака.)

 The angling dean, who is a nice dean, was angling carefully.
(Finnish: Onkiva rovasti, joka on kiva rovasti, onki varovasti.)

 (?) Nazar saw Nazar carefully
(Urdu: Nazar ney nazar ko nazar bhar key deykha, Nazar ki nazar ko nazar lag gai)

 Rat saw roats. Roast tempted rat. Rat put a paw on the roast. The roast burned the paw of the rat. The rat pulled back its paw and left the roast.
(French: Rat vit rotrôt tenta ratrat mit patte à rôtrôt brula patte à ratrat secoua patte et quitta rôt.)

 Put the rack in the rack-stand in the stable instead.
(Swedish: Ställ stället i ställ-stället i stallet istället.)

 Sam put a drug there.
(Hebrew: SAM SAM SHAM SAM.)

 Docter Chit's drug cures lices and moles. Docter Mee's drug cures moles and lices.
(Thai: ยานัตถุ์หมอชิตแก้หิดแก้ฝี ยานัตถุ์หมอมีแก้ฝีแก้หิด)

 Who cured the snake that healed?
(Hungarian: Ki gyógyította ki a kígyót, aki kigyógyult?)

 Love is a crazy thing that only a priest can cure, but the priest who cures it comits a great error.
(Spanish: El amor es una locura que solo el cura lo cura, pero el cura que lo cura comete una gran locura.)

 Such six as we five are, can't be found among four, because we three are the two only ones. German: Solche sechs wie wir fünf gibt es keine vier weil wir drei die zwei einzigen sind. Bayrische logik :-)
(German: Soiche sechse wia mia fünfe gibt's koane viere weil mia drei die zwoa oanzigen san.)

 Her sister and she can't stand each other.
(Czech: Nesnese se se sestrou.)

 Seven fools from Zaventem will swim six sundays in the summer without swimming trousers. The dead sister of fat Julien said: "Such fools, they are nuts, they'll sink!
(Dutch: Zeven Zaventemse zotten zullen zes zomerse zondagen zwemmen zonder zwembroek. Zware Julien zijn zuster zaliger zei: "Zo'n zeveraars! Ze zijn zijle zeker zot zeg! Ze zullen zinken!)


 A pipe hit a pipe and another pipe stopped it. There are pipes that have pipes but this pipe had no pipe.
(Spanish: Un tubo tiró un tubo y otro tubo lo detuvo. Hay tubos que tienen tubos pero este tubo no tuvo tubo.)

 Chandu's wise uncle fed a tasty pickle of tamarind to chandu's wicked aunt four times by polished silver spoon in the Chandni-chowk of Chalisgaon town.
(Marathi: )

 The magpie nests high. The goose nests low. The owl nests neither high nor low.
(French: La pie niche en haut,L'oie niche en bas,L'hibou niche ni haut ni bas.)

 Where does the magpie build its nest? The magpie nests high. Where does the goose build its nest? The goose nests low. Where does the owl build its nest? The owl nests neither high nor low.
(French: Où niche la pie? La pie niche haut. Où niche l'oie? L'oie niche bas. Où niche l'hibou? L'hibou niche ni haut ni bas !)

 Paco Pino Ponte Pascual Perez paints precious paintings for wealthy people. For the poor he paints little because they pay low prices.
(Spanish: Paco Pino Ponte Pascual Pérez pinta pinturas preciosas para personas pudientes. Para pobres pinta poco porque pagan poco precio.)

 Pedro Pablo Pérez Pereira, poor portuguese painter paints pictures for little money to survive in Paris.
(Spanish: Pedro Pablo Pérez Pereira pobre pintor portugués pinta pinturas por poca plata para pasar por París.)

 A black sweatshirt and a little black bag with sixtysix sausages in Sächsische Straße (a street in Berlin).
(German: Ein schwarzes Sweatshirt und ein schwarzes Täschchen mit sechsundsechzig Würstchen in der Sächsischen Straße.)

 Tell me about your purchases! What purchases? About purchases, purchases, your little purchases!
(Russian: Раскажи мне про покупки!
Про какие про покупки?
Про покупки, про покупки, про покупочки твои!)

 Didì said to Didò: "Didò tell Didù to tell Didì what Didì told Didò".
(Italian: Didì disse a Didò: "Didò dì a Didù di dire a Didì ciò che Didì disse a Didò".)

 A Greek asked me how many rivers there are in Greece, and I told him that I'm not Greek to tell him how many rivers there are in Greece.
(Czech: Jeden Řek mi řek, kolik je v Řecku řeckých řek a já mu řek, že nejsem Řek, abych mu řek, kolik je v Řecku řeckých řek.)

 Selma the chimney sweep collects buns. See so many buns Selma has collected.
(Swedish: Sotaren Selma samlar semlor. Se så många semlor Selma samlat.)

 Uncle Adam seeing a peacock with wide open mouth shaking its leg also turns into a peacock.

(Hungarian: Ádám bátyámpávát látvánszáját tátvánlábát rázvánpávává vált.)

 If your uncle shaves/cuts the hair your uncle, your uncle will be shaved/cut by your uncle.
(French: Si ton tonton tond ton tonton, ton tonton sera tondu par ton tonton.)

 Uncle asked auntie to take out raw mango from a glass cabinet and to make salad from it.
(Gujarati: Kaka ae kaki ne kaach na kabat mathi kachi keri katdhi ne kachumber karava kahnyu.)

 Bob makes cow-soap out of cow-grease.
(Loglan or Lojban: la bab. zbasu loi bakyzbabu loi bakygrasu)

 Don't make simple things complex; then, to uncomplex the simple complexed things, it's a very complex complex!
(Portuguese: Não comprique as coizas simpres; depôs para descompricar as coizas simpres compricadas, é compricação compricadíssima!)

 Such things depress you anyway.
(German: Derartige Dinge deprimieren dich denn doch.)

 Things of his or her sons
(Hungarian: Fiaiéi)

 children are children and children do childish things
(Latin: Sunt pueri pueri, pueri puerilia tractant.)

 Children's rhyme with some nonsense adjectives about a hen and her little chicks.
(Spanish: Tengo una gallina pinta pipiripinta gorda pipirigorda pipiripintiva y sorda que tiene tres pollitos pintos pipiripintos gordos pipirigordos pipiripintivos y sordos. Si la gallina no hubiera sido pinta pipiripinta gorda pipirigorda pipiripintiva y sorda los pollitos no hubieran sido pintos pipiripintos gordos pipirigordos pipiripintivos y sordos.)

 A tica-xica-mica (nonsense words), short-legged and dancing hen, had three tics-xics-mics, short-legged and dancing chicks. If the hen hadn't been tica-xica-mica, short-legged and dancing hen, the chicks wouldn't have been tics-xics-mics, short-legged and dancing chicks.
(Catalan: Una gallina tica-xica-mica, cama-curta i ballarica, va tenir tres pollets, tics-xics-mics, cama-curts i ballarics. Si la gallina no hagués estat tica-xica-mica, cama-curta i ballarica,  els tres pollets no serien tics-xics-mics, cama-curts i ballarics.)

 I would rather be in a ship at sea than a naughty boy in an apple tree.
(Latin: Malo malo malo malo.)

 Tata the apple tarte tempts Tonton; Tonton has touched the apple tart, Tata.
(French: Tata, ta tarte tatin tenta Tonton; Tonton tâta ta tarte tatin, Tata.)

 When Khadak Singh shakes, the windows shake; when the windows shake, Khadak Singh shakes.
(Hindi: Khadak Singh ke khadakane se khadakati hain khidkiyan, khidkiyon ke khadakane se khadakata hai Khadak Singh.)

 6 dong bank book savings book is the yellow bank savings book;
8 dong bank book savings book is the green bank savings book
(Korean: 육통 통장 적금통장은 황색 적금통장이고
팔통 통장 적금통장은 녹색 적금통장이다)


 In a small pot there's little food. ItalianIn piccola pignatta ci sono poche pappe.
(Italian: In pegnatélo pìcolo poche pape ghé.)

 With no bran and no germ, no small grain can germinate.
(German: Mit keiner Kleie und keinem Keim kann kein kleines Korn keimen.)

